Massachusetts, session 194th, H4761.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriation act
2 and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2025, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby
3 appropriated from the General Fund or the Transitional Escrow Fund established in section 16 of
4 chapter 76 of the acts of 2021, as amended by section 4 of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022, unless
5 specifically designated otherwise in this act or in those appropriation acts, for the several
6 purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this act or in those appropriation acts, and
7 subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30,
8 2025. These sums shall be in addition to any amounts previously appropriated and made
9 available for the purposes of those items. These sums shall be made available through the fiscal
10 year ending June 30, 2026.
1 of 146

11 SECTION 2.
12 JUDICIARY
13 Commission on Judicial Conduct
14 0321-0001 Commission on Judicial Conduct……………………………...$100,000
15 Committee for Public Counsel Services
16 0321-1520 Indigent Persons Fees and Court Costs……………………......$2,500,000
17 DISTRICT ATTORNEYS
18 Suffolk District Attorney's Office
19 0340-0100 Suffolk District Attorney……………………............................$700,000
20 Massachusetts District Attorneys’ Association
21 0340-8908 District Attorneys’ Wide Area Network…………………….....$90,663
22 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
23 1595-6153 Communications Access Trust Fund Transfer………………..$12,500,000
24 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION
25 Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
26 1596-2422 School Meals……………………...…..………………….........$12,000,000
27 Education and Transportation Fund…100%
2 of 146

28 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL AFFAIRS
29 Office of the Secretary
30 1599-0093 Clean Water Trust Contract Assistance……………………......$6,779,246
31 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
32 Office of the Secretary
33 4000-0700 MassHealth Fee for Service Payments…………..............$2,046,164,359
34 Department of Public Health
35 4590-0915 Public Health Hospitals..............................................................$18,500,000
36 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY
37 Department of State Police
38 8100-1001 Department of State Police…………………….....……………$3,500,255
39 Department of Correction
40 8900-0001 Department of Correction Facility Operations………………...$7,184,865
41 LEGISLATURE
42 House of Representatives
43 9600-0000 House of Representatives…………………….....……………..$8,100,000
44 SECTION 2A. To provide for certain unanticipated obligations of the commonwealth, to
45 provide for an alteration of purpose for current appropriations, and to meet certain requirements
3 of 146

46 of law, the sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the General Fund or the
47 Transitional Escrow Fund established in section 16 of chapter 76 of the acts of 2021, as amended
48 by section 4 of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022, unless specifically designated otherwise in this
49 section, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions specified in this section, and
50 subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30,
51 2025. Except as otherwise stated, these sums shall be made available through the fiscal year
52 ending June 30, 2026.
53 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
54 Department of Revenue
55 1233-1818 For fiscal year 2023 and fiscal year 2024 payments due to cities and towns
56 pursuant to section 5 of chapter 64N of the General Laws……………………........ $1,250,000
57 Marijuana Regulation Fund…100%
58 Reserves
59 1599-1214 For a reserve for expansion, upgrades or enhancements to staffing,
60 operations or infrastructure for new and existing facilities that treat men with an alcohol or
61 substance use disorder under sections 1 and 35 of chapter 123 of the General Laws; provided,
62 that the secretary of administration and finance may transfer funds from this item to state
63 agencies as defined in section 1 of chapter 29 of the General Laws…………………$14,000,000
64 1599-0300 For a reserve to fund an awareness campaign on new federally imposed
65 reporting requirements and vaccine outreach and education efforts; provided, that not less than
66 $10,000,000 shall be expended for Health Care for All, Inc. to work with community-based
4 of 146

67 organizations to conduct health coverage enrollment assistance in targeted areas at risk of losing
68 coverage due to new federally imposed reporting requirements, as well as support vaccine
69 outreach and education efforts; and provided further, that funds appropriated in this item shall be
70 made available for these purposes through June 30, 2027…………………….............$10,000,000
71 OFFICE OF THE COMPTROLLER
72 Executive Office of Housing and Livable Communities
73 1595-0604 For an operating transfer to the Housing Preservation and Stabilization
74 Trust Fund established in section 60 of chapter 121B of the General Laws………….$50,000,000
75 Executive Office for Administration and Finance
76 1595-0605 For an operating transfer to the Sports and Entertainment Events Fund
77 established in section 13W of chapter 23A of the General Laws; provided, that not less than
78 $10,000,000 shall be expended to support transportation, public safety, wayfinding and signage,
79 services for individuals with disabilities, equity, inclusion and sustainability efforts and volunteer
80 support costs related to 2026 World Cup matches hosted in the commonwealth; provided further,
81 that said funds shall be subject to all requirements set forth in said Sports and Entertainment
82 Events Fund; and provided further, that the office of travel and tourism, in consultation with the
83 executive office for administration and finance, shall submit monthly reports to the clerks of the
84 house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on tourism, arts and cultural
85 development and the house and senate committee on ways and means detailing expenditures
86 under this item…………………….....…………………….....…………………….$10,000,000
87 MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
5 of 146

88 1596-2527 For the cost of snow and ice removal services incurred by the Massachusetts
89 Department of Transportation; provided, that funds in this item may be transferred to the
90 Massachusetts Transportation Trust Fund established in section 4 of chapter 6C of the General
91 Laws…………………….....…………………….....…………………….....……… $60,727,344
92 Education and Transportation Fund…100%
93 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
94 Office of the Secretary
95 4000-0010 For direct supports to reproductive health care providers to maintain
96 continuity of access to services at risk of federal funding reductions including, but not limited to,
97 Medicaid reimbursements…………………….....…………………….....……………..$5,000,000
98 Department of Transitional Assistance
99 4400-0709 For operational enhancements at the department of transitional assistance
100 in response to upcoming changes to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; provided,
101 that the department shall expend funds for enhancements including, but not limited to,
102 information technology and infrastructure improvements to reduce the commonwealth’s payment
103 error rate; provided further, that at the direction of the commissioner of transitional assistance,
104 funds may be transferred from this item to item 4400-1000 of section 2 of the general
105 appropriation act for fiscal year 2026 and fiscal year 2027; provided further, that not later than
106 March 15, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the joint committee on children, families
107 and persons with disabilities and the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing
108 strategies for reducing payment error rates and summarizing departmental responses to recent
6 of 146

109 policy changes to the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; and provided further, that
110 funds appropriated in this item shall be made available until June 30, 2027............$10,000,000
111 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION
112 Department of Higher Education
113 1596-2528 For a reserve to provide financial assistance to Massachusetts students
114 enrolled in and pursuing a program of higher education at any public institutions of higher
115 education in the commonwealth; provided, that funds shall be expended to restore financial aid
116 allocations to public institutions of higher education in fiscal year 2026 at an amount not less
117 than that allocated in fiscal year 2025; provided further, that funds shall be expended to increase
118 awards for MassGrant recipients in fiscal year 2026 at an amount not less than that allocated in
119 fiscal year 2025; provided further, that funds shall be expended to increase award allowances for
120 Pell Grant recipients in fiscal year 2026 at an amount not less than that allocated in fiscal year
121 2025; provided further, that funds shall be expended to restore the allowance of up to $1,200 per
122 academic year, adjusted by number of credits, for books, supplies and other expenses for
123 students whose household income is at or below 125 per cent of the standard median income and
124 who are attending a community college program pursuant to section 5B of chapter 15A of the
125 General Laws; provided further, that funds may be expended for programs or activities during
126 summer months; and provided further, that at the discretion of the secretary of education, funds
127 may be transferred from this item to items 7070-0065, 1596-2414 and 1596-2501 of the general
128 appropriation act........................................$18,300,000
129 Education and Transportation Fund…100%
7 of 146

130 SECTION 2B. To provide for supplementing certain intragovernmental chargeback
131 authorizations in the general appropriation act and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2025,
132 to provide for certain unanticipated intragovernmental chargeback authorizations, to provide for
133 an alteration of purpose for current intragovernmental chargeback authorizations and to meet
134 certain requirements of law, the sum set forth in this section is hereby authorized from the
135 Intragovernmental Service Fund established in section 2Q of chapter 29 of the General Laws for
136 the several purposes specified in this section or in the appropriation acts and subject to the
137 provisions of law regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30,
138 2025. This sum shall be in addition to any amounts previously authorized and made available for
139 the purposes of this item. These sums shall be made available through the fiscal year ending June
140 30, 2026.
141 TREASURER AND RECEIVER-GENERAL
142 Office of the Treasurer and Receiver-General
143 0699-0018 Agency Debt Service Programs…………………….....…………… $21,000,000
144 SECTION 2C.I. For the purpose of making available in fiscal year 2026 balances of
145 appropriations which otherwise would revert on June 30, 2025, the unexpended balances of the
146 appropriations listed below, not to exceed the amount specified below for each item, are hereby
147 re-appropriated for the purposes of and subject to the conditions stated for the corresponding
148 item in sections 2 or 2F of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024; provided, however, that for items
149 which do not appear in said sections 2 or 2F of said chapter 140 of the general appropriation act,
150 the amounts in this section are re-appropriated for the purposes of and subject to the conditions
151 stated for the corresponding item in sections 2 or 2A of this act or in prior appropriation acts.
8 of 146

152 Amounts in this section are re-appropriated from the fund or funds designated for the
153 corresponding item in said sections 2 or 2F of said chapter 140; provided, however, that for items
154 which do not appear in said sections 2 or 2F of said chapter 140, the amounts in this section are
155 re-appropriated from the fund or funds designated for the corresponding item in sections 2 to 2F,
156 inclusive, of this act or in prior appropriation acts. The unexpended balance of each
157 appropriation in the Massachusetts management accounting and reporting system with a
158 secretariat code of 01 or 17 is hereby re-appropriated for the purposes of and subject to the
159 conditions stated for the corresponding item in said section 2 of said chapter 140. The sums re-
160 appropriated in this section shall be in addition to any amounts available for said purposes.
161 JUDICIARY
162 Supreme Judicial Court
163 0320-0003 Supreme Judicial Court…………………….....…………………….....$400,000
164 Appeals Court
165 0322-0100 Appeals Court…………………….....…………………….....………...$175,000
166 DISTRICT ATTORNEYS
167 Northwestern District Attorney
168 0340-0600 Northwestern District Attorney...............................................................$225,000
169 District Attorneys’ Association
170 0340-9111 District Attorneys’ Association…………………….....……………….$307,101
9 of 146

171 TREASURER AND RECEIVER-GENERAL
172 Office of the Treasurer and Receiver-General
173 0610-2000 Welcome Home Bill Bonus Payments……………………....................$600,000
174 POLICE REFORM COMMISSIONS
175 0800-0000 Massachusetts Police Officer Standards and Training Commission……..$73,853
176 OFFICE OF THE CHILD ADVOCATE
177 0930-0100 Office of the Child Advocate…………………….....…………………….$200,000
178 0930-0101 Center on Child Wellbeing and Trauma…………………….....….……$1,900,000
179 CENTER FOR HEALTH INFORMATION AND ANALYSIS
180 4100-0060 Center for Health Information and Analysis………………………..........$693,500
181 4100-0063 Betsy Lehman Center……………………..................................................$395,450
182 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
183 Health Policy Commission
184 1450-1200 Health Policy Commission…………………….......................................$750,000
185 Reserves
186 1599-4448 Collective Bargaining Reserve…………………….....……………….$34,000,000
187 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY SERVICES AND SECURITY
10 of 146

188 1790-1700 Core Technology Services and Security…………………….....………$355,089
189 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
190 Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
191 4125-0100 Massachusetts Commission for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing…………$170,000
192 Department of Transitional Assistance
193 4400-1000 Department of Transitional Assistance Administration and Operation..$2,813,484
194 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF VETERANS’ SERVICES
195 Veterans’ Services
196 1410-0630 Agawam and Winchendon Veterans’ Cemeteries…………………….....$185,000
197 Veterans’ Home in Chelsea
198 4180-0100 Veterans’ Home in Chelsea Administration and Operations…..……….$916,018
199 Veterans’ Home in Holyoke
200 4190-0100 Veterans’ Home in Holyoke Administration and Operations..................$150,018
201 MASSACHUSETTS DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
202 1596-2401 Federal Matching Funds.......................................................................$23,000,000
203 1596-2406 Regional Transit Funding and Grants...................................................$11,155,416
204 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
11 of 146

205 Division of Insurance
206 7006-0020 Division of Insurance…………………….....…………………….........$1,274,008
207 Massachusetts Marketing Partnership
208 7008-0900 Massachusetts Office of Travel and Tourism…………………….........$100,000
209 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF HOUSING AND LIVABLE COMMUNITIES
210 7004-0102 Homeless Individual Shelters…………………….....…………………$2,100,000
211 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION
212 Department of Early Education and Care
213 3000-1000 Department of Early Education and Care……………………...............$7,500,000
214 Department of Elementary and Secondary Education
215 7061-9805 Teacher Diversity Initiative …………………….....…………………..$8,300,000
216 1596-2436 Mental Health Supports and Wraparounds.............................................$4,657,078
217 Department of Higher Education
218 7066-0025 Performance Management Set Aside…………………….....…………$2,000,000
219 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY
220 Department of State Police
221 8100-0515 New State Police Class…………………….....……………………......$9,600,000
12 of 146

222 Department of Fire Services
223 8324-0000 Department of Fire Services Administration……………………..........$560,750
224 8324-0050 Local Fire Department Projects and Grants ……………………..........$250,000
225 SECTION 2C.II. For the purpose of making available in fiscal year 2026 balances of
226 retained revenue and intragovernmental chargeback authorizations which otherwise would revert
227 on June 30, 2025, the unexpended balances of the authorizations listed below, not to exceed the
228 amount specified below for each item, are hereby re-authorized for the purposes of and subject to
229 the conditions stated for the corresponding item in sections 2 to 2F, inclusive, of chapter 140 of
230 the acts of 2024; provided, however, that for items which do not appear in said sections 2 to 2F,
231 inclusive, of said chapter 140, the amounts in this section are re-authorized for the purposes of
232 and subject to the conditions stated for the corresponding item in sections 2 through 2F,
233 inclusive, of this act or in prior appropriation acts. Amounts in this section are re-authorized
234 from the fund or funds designated for the corresponding item in sections 2 to 2F, inclusive, of the
235 general appropriation act; provided, however, that for items which do not appear in sections 2 to
236 2F, inclusive, of the general appropriation act, the amounts in this section are re-authorized from
237 the fund or funds designated for the corresponding item in sections 2 to 2F, inclusive, of this act
238 or in prior appropriation acts. The sums re-authorized in this section shall be in addition to any
239 amounts available for those purposes.
240 MASSACHUSETTS COMMISSION AGAINST DISCRIMINATION
241 0940-0103 Equal Employment Opportunity Commission Retained Revenue…….$1,205,504
242 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
13 of 146

243 Operational Services Division
244 1775-0800 Chargeback for Purchase Operation and Repair of State Vehicles……….$200,000
245 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
246 Office of the Secretary
247 7002-0018 Chargeback for Economic Development IT Costs…………………….$3,846,468
248 EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF PUBLIC SAFETY AND SECURITY
249 Department of Correction
250 8900-0021 Chargeback for Prison Industries and Farm Program…………………$430,000
251 SECTION 3. Section 44 of chapter 7C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
252 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 1 and 11, each time it appears, the
253 figure “58” and inserting in place thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 57.
254 SECTION 4. Section 46 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
255 striking out, in line 21, the figure “58” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 57.
256 SECTION 5. Section 51 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
257 striking out, in line 29, the figure “58” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 57.
258 SECTION 6. Section 53 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
259 striking out, in line 4, the figure “58” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 57.
14 of 146

260 SECTION 7. Section 54 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
261 striking out, in lines 8, 29 and 45, each time it appears, the figure “58” and inserting in place
262 thereof, in each instance, the following figure:- 57.
263 SECTION 8. Section 56 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
264 striking out, in line 4, the figure “58” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 57.
265 SECTION 9. Section 57 of said chapter 7C, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
266 striking out, in line 3, the figure “58” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 57.
267 SECTION 10. Section 10H of chapter 21A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
268 hereby amended by striking out, in line 33, the words “of $10 per fish” and inserting in place
269 thereof the following words:- for a recreational fisher of $10 per fish or $5 per pound of striped
270 bass or for a commercial fisher of the market value of all catch seized and labeled pursuant to
271 section 12 of said chapter 130 not to exceed $10,000.
272 SECTION 11. Chapter 23A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
273 section 13V the following section:-
274 Section 13W. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
275 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Sports and
276 Entertainment Events Fund, which shall be administered by the office of travel and tourism
277 established in section 13F. The fund shall be credited with: (i) revenue from appropriations and
278 other money authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the
279 fund; (ii) funds from public and private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants and
280 donations; and (iii) interest earned on money in the fund. The unexpended balance in the fund at
15 of 146

281 the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund and shall remain available for
282 expenditure in subsequent fiscal years.
283 (b)(1) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, for
284 a competitive matching grant program administered by the office of travel and tourism for major
285 sports or entertainment events to provide: (i) event services; (ii) sports development; (iii) sports
286 marketing; or (iv) construction, functioning or operation of a sports or entertainment event;
287 provided, however, that in evaluating grant applications, priority shall be given to applicants
288 based upon expected return-on-investment and that clearly identify direct and indirect economic
289 impacts on the tourism industry in the commonwealth and help promote the commonwealth in
290 national and international media; and provided further, that no grant award shall provide more
291 than half of the balance of the fund to any 1 recipient in any calendar year; and provided further,
292 that the office of travel and tourism shall require a match of not less than one-to-one for any
293 grants issued from the fund.
294 (2) Grants under this section shall be awarded in a manner that promotes geographic
295 equity.
296 (c)(1) Any grant awarded pursuant to clause (i) or (iv) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b)
297 shall require an applicant to provide complete and accurate responses and disclosures for itself
298 and for any contractors or vendors to be utilized for the sports or entertainment event which shall
299 include:
300 (i) certification that the applicant and any contractors or vendors it utilizes have complied
301 with chapters 149, 151, 151A, 151B and 152 and 29 U.S.C. 201, et seq. and federal anti-
302 discrimination laws for the last 3 calendar years;
16 of 146

303 (ii) certification that the applicant and any contractors or vendors it utilizes are currently,
304 and shall remain, in compliance with chapters 149, 151, 151A, 151B and 152 and 29 U.S.C. 201,
305 et seq. and federal anti-discrimination laws for the duration of the services or labor;
306 (iii) a disclosure by the applicant as to whether it and any contractors and vendors it
307 utilizes to support sports or entertainment events have previously contracted with a labor
308 organization, as defined by chapter 150A and section 2 of the National Labor Relations Act, in
309 the commonwealth or elsewhere; and
310 (iv) a disclosure by the applicant of its plans for assuring labor harmony for the duration
311 of work to support sports or entertainment events both separately and in conjunction with its
312 contractors and vendors.
313 (2) Any grant awarded pursuant to clause (i) or (iv) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b) for
314 any construction on publicly owned or leased property to support a sports or entertainment event
315 shall require an applicant to provide complete and accurate responses and disclosures for itself
316 and any contractors or sub-contractors to be utilized for the sports or entertainment event which
317 shall include:
318 (i) certification that the applicant and any contractors and sub-contractors are in
319 compliance with the commonwealth’s public procurement and bidding statutes, pursuant to
320 chapters 30, 149 and 149A;
321 (ii) disclosures in which the applicant shall specify whether it and any contractors and
322 subcontractors on the project participates in a state or federally certified apprenticeship program
323 and the number of apprentices the apprenticeship program has trained to completion for each of
324 the last 5 calendar years;
17 of 146

325 (iii) a requirement that the applicant provide a statement of intent concerning the extent to
326 which the applicant and any contractors and sub-contractors on the project intend to utilize
327 apprentices on the project if a grant is awarded; and
328 (iv) certification that the applicant and any contractors or sub-contractors have not been
329 debarred by the federal government or the commonwealth.
330 (3) Any grant awarded pursuant to clauses (i) or (iv) of paragraph (1) of subsection (b)
331 for the procurement of services, labor, equipment or supplies pursuant to chapter 30B on publicly
332 owned or leased property to support a sports or entertainment event shall require an applicant to
333 provide complete and accurate responses and disclosures for the applicant and any vendors to be
334 utilized for the sports or entertainment event which shall include:
335 (i) certification that the applicant and each of its vendors are in compliance with chapter
336 30B;
337 (ii) disclosures in which the applicant shall specify whether it and each of its vendors on
338 the project has established or participates in workforce development programs within the
339 commonwealth and the number of residents of the commonwealth the workforce development
340 programs have trained to completion for each of the last 5 years; and
341 (iii) a statement of intent concerning the extent to which the applicant and its vendors
342 intend to utilize workers in the commonwealth to fulfill services and labor requirements.
343 (4)(A) All applicants shall timely provide the documentation, certifications and
344 disclosures pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) as part of their initial application. Failure to
18 of 146

345 provide the documentation, certifications and disclosures shall disqualify the applicant from
346 receiving grant funding.
347 (B) A successful applicant’s good faith failure to provide complete and accurate
348 documentation, certifications and disclosures pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) shall result
349 in suspension from the project for a period of 30 days; provided, however, that during said 30
350 days the office of travel and tourism shall provide an opportunity for the applicant to address
351 application deficiencies to the satisfaction of the office of travel and tourism.
352 (C) Failure to cure deficiencies shall result in termination.
353 (D) A successful applicant’s willful failure to provide accurate documentation,
354 certification and disclosures pursuant to paragraphs (1), (2) and (3) shall result in permanent
355 termination of grant funding and shall trigger the return of all funds awarded within 30 days.
356 (5) The attorney general shall enforce this subsection for any project awarded a grant
357 pursuant to this section.
358 (d) Annually, not later than January 1, the office of travel and tourism shall submit a
359 report to the house and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on
360 tourism, arts and cultural development providing: (i) the number of grant awards; (ii) the
361 geographic location of the grant award; (iii) the dollar amount of the grant awards; (iv) data
362 pertaining to return-on-investment; and (v) information and analysis pertaining to the impacts on
363 the economy in the region receiving the grant award and the commonwealth overall.
19 of 146

364 SECTION 12. Section 3 of chapter 23I of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
365 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 42, the word “Six” and inserting in
366 place thereof the following word:- Five.
367 SECTION 13. Section 2HHHH of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
368 hereby amended by inserting after the figure “71”, in lines 6 and 15, the following words:- ,
369 section 74E of chapter 112, section 18 of chapter 112A.
370 SECTION 14. Section 2YYYY of said chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
371 striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
372 The secretary may expend, without further appropriation: (i) not more than $160,000,000
373 per fiscal year from the fund to expand and support the residential treatment system to treat
374 individuals with a substance use disorder or co-occurring mental health and substance use
375 disorder and to expand and increase access to the 24-hour diversionary system; (ii) not more than
376 $135,000,000 per fiscal year from the fund to reduce stigma, expand access, support
377 implementation and increase competencies for medications for substance use disorder; (iii) not
378 more than $35,000,000 per fiscal year from the fund to support access to evidence-based
379 recovery services through peer and paraprofessional services; and (iv) not more than
380 $85,000,000 per fiscal year from the fund to ensure appropriate assessment for levels of care
381 utilizing American Society of Addiction Medicine or other evidence-based modalities and to
382 support integration of physical health, mental health and substance use disorder care across all
383 provider settings. To accommodate timing discrepancies between the receipt of revenues and
384 related expenditures, the fund may incur expenses, and the comptroller shall certify for payment,
385 amounts not to exceed the most recent revenue estimate as certified by the MassHealth director,
20 of 146

386 as reported in the state accounting system. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be subject to
387 further appropriation and money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert
388 to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in the subsequent fiscal year.
389 SECTION 15. Section 2AAAAA of said chapter 29, as so appearing, is hereby amended
390 by striking out the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
391 There shall be credited to the fund: (i) any transfers from the Health Safety Net Trust
392 Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E; (ii) any revenue from appropriations or other
393 money authorized by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (iii)
394 an amount equal to any federal financial participation revenues claimed and received by the
395 commonwealth for eligible expenditures made from the fund; and (iv) interest earned on any
396 money in the fund. Money from the fund shall be expended for payments to providers that
397 qualify under an approved federal waiver and in accordance with said waiver. Amounts credited
398 to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation. At the end of each fiscal year, the
399 secretary of health and human services shall determine, in the secretary's sole discretion, the
400 amount of any money in the fund that is in excess of the money needed to make payments from
401 the fund in accordance with said waiver; provided, however, that the money needed to make
402 such payments shall include any money needed to make any payments that are unearned as of the
403 end of such year but potentially earned in a subsequent year. Subject to the terms of said waiver:
404 (i) for periods applicable to the waiver beginning on or after January 1, 2025, the secretary of
405 health and human services shall transfer to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in said
406 section 66 of said chapter 118E the state share of any such excess money, excluding any federal
407 funds; and (ii) for periods applicable to the waiver through December 31, 2024, the secretary of
408 health and human services shall transfer to said Health Safety Net Trust Fund the state share of
21 of 146

409 any such excess money, multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is $62,500,000 and the
410 denominator of which is the total amount transferred to or deposited in the fund for such fund
411 year, excluding federal funds. Money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not
412 revert to the General Fund and shall be available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. To
413 accommodate timing discrepancies between the receipt of revenue and related expenditures, the
414 comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the most recent revenue estimates as
415 certified by the secretary of health and human services to be transferred, credited or deposited
416 under this section.
417 SECTION 16. Section 2TTTTT of said chapter 29 is hereby amended by striking out
418 subsection (c), as appearing in section 51 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024, and inserting in
419 place thereof the following subsection:-
420 (c)(1) The secretary shall expend money in the fund, including all amounts credited to the
421 fund, for payments to qualifying acute hospital providers under contract with the executive office
422 of health and human services or under subcontracts with care organizations that contract with the
423 executive office in connection with the MassHealth program as provided in this subsection.
424 (2) The secretary shall annually expend amounts from the fund averaging, for the 2-year
425 period from October 1, 2025 to September 30, 2027, inclusive, not less than $2,264,500,000 per
426 year; provided, however, that all such payments shall fall into 1 of the following categories: (i)
427 health equity incentive payments; (ii) clinical quality incentive payments; (iii) other incentive
428 payments; (iv) rate payments for services provided to MassHealth members; or (v) targeted
429 payments to: (A) freestanding pediatric acute hospitals; (B) nonprofit teaching acute hospitals
430 that provide medical, surgical, emergency and obstetrical services and are affiliated with a state-
22 of 146

431 owned medical school; (C) freestanding cancer hospitals; (D) the acute hospital that had the
432 lowest statewide commercial relative price in fiscal year 2019 as reported by the center for health
433 information and analysis; (E) the independent group 1 safety net hospital that had the largest
434 percentile of operating loss in fiscal year 2022 as reported by the center for health information
435 and analysis; (F) the acute hospital that had the highest statewide public payer mix in fiscal year
436 2023 as determined by the secretary; (G) the acute hospital affiliated with a health system with 2
437 or more critical access hospitals operating in the commonwealth in calendar year 2025, as
438 determined by the secretary; or (H) to any non-state-owned public hospital in the
439 commonwealth, as determined by the secretary. The secretary may determine funding allocations
440 among and within each such category within a given year; provided, however, that such
441 allocations shall be consistent with all approved federal waivers and state plan provisions; and
442 provided further, that the secretary shall allocate an average of not less than $1,280,000,000 per
443 year, for the 2-year period from October 1, 2025 to September 30, 2027, inclusive, for the rate
444 payments described in clause (iv), with an average of not less than $92,000,000 allocated for
445 group 1 safety net hospitals for such 2-year period, an average of not less than $460,000,000
446 allocated for group 2 safety net hospitals for such 2-year period and an average of not less than
447 $728,000,000 allocated across all acute hospitals for such 2-year period.
448 (3) Of the targeted payments described in clause (v) of paragraph (2), the secretary shall
449 expend annually from the fund: (i) $70,000,000 to freestanding pediatric acute hospitals, of
450 which at least 98 per cent shall be paid to the freestanding pediatric hospital that had the largest
451 volume of inpatient discharges in fiscal year 2019; (ii) $35,000,000 to nonprofit teaching acute
452 hospitals that provide medical, surgical, emergency and obstetrical services and are affiliated
453 with a state-owned medical school; (iii) $14,000,000 to the acute hospital that had the lowest
23 of 146

454 statewide commercial relative price in fiscal year 2019 as reported by the center for health
455 information and analysis; (iv) $6,000,000 to freestanding cancer hospitals; (v) $10,000,000 to the
456 independent group 1 safety net hospital that had the largest operating percentile loss in fiscal
457 year 2022 as reported by the center for health information and analysis; (vi) $6,000,000 to the
458 acute hospital that had the highest statewide public payer mix in fiscal year 2023, as determined
459 by the secretary; (vii) $6,000,000 to the acute hospital affiliated with a health system with 2 or
460 more critical access hospitals operating in the commonwealth in calendar year 2025, as
461 determined by the secretary; and (viii) $2,000,000 to any non-state-owned public hospital in the
462 commonwealth, as determined by the secretary.
463 (4) Of the incentive payments described in clauses (i) and (ii) of paragraph (2), the
464 secretary shall make interim payments to qualifying hospitals based on the secretary’s estimate
465 of each such hospital’s final payment for the measurement period. As soon as practicable after
466 the close of the measurement period, the secretary shall determine the final amount of each
467 qualifying hospital’s incentive payments and shall reconcile each hospital’s interim payment
468 with its final payment.
469 (5) If, in any fiscal year, the commonwealth fails to secure federal financial participation
470 necessary to make expenditures described in this section, or if the total hospital assessment
471 amount described in section 67 of chapter 118E is insufficient to support the distributions to the
472 fund required to be made from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of said
473 chapter 118E, or if such distributions are otherwise not made due to limitations on federal
474 matching, applicable payment ceilings or other restrictions under state or federal law, then the
475 expenditures otherwise required to be made from the fund shall be reduced proportionally based
476 on the total amount available for expenditure.
24 of 146

477 SECTION 17. Subsection (c) of section 2UUUUU of said chapter 29, as appearing in the
478 2024 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
479 (3) If, in any fiscal year, the commonwealth fails to secure federal financial participation
480 necessary to make expenditures described in this section, or if the total hospital assessment
481 amount described in section 67 of chapter 118E is insufficient to support the distributions to the
482 fund required to be made from the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of said
483 chapter 118E, or if such distributions are otherwise not made due to limitations on federal
484 matching, applicable payment ceilings, or other restrictions under state or federal law, then the
485 expenditures otherwise required to be made from the fund shall be reduced proportionally based
486 on the total amount available for expenditure.
487 SECTION 18. Section 2FFFFFF of said chapter 29, inserted by section 58 of chapter 140
488 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (c) and inserting in place
489 thereof the following subsection:-
490 (c) The secretary shall annually expend money in the fund, including all amounts credited
491 to the fund, for payments to Medicaid managed care organizations, as such term is defined in
492 section 64 of chapter 118E; provided, however, that such amounts expended annually shall be
493 not less than the Medicaid managed care organization revenue amount, as such term is defined in
494 said section 64 of said chapter 118E; and provided further, that such expenditures shall be
495 consistent with all approved federal waivers and state plan provisions.
496 SECTION 19. Said chapter 29 is hereby further amended by inserting after section
497 2LLLLLL, inserted by section 18 of chapter 14 of the acts of 2025, the following 2 sections:-
25 of 146

498 Section 2MMMMMM. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
499 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Western
500 Massachusetts Hospital Fund, which shall be administered by the commissioner of public health.
501 (b) There shall be credited to the fund: (i) appropriations or other money authorized or
502 transferred by the general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds
503 from public and private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants and donations; and
504 (iii) any interest earned on money in the fund.
505 (c) Amounts credited to the fund may be expended without further appropriation by the
506 commissioner of public health for any purpose related to the operation of the Western
507 Massachusetts hospital. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficit
508 at any point.
509 Section 2NNNNNN. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
510 commonwealth a separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund known as the Public Higher
511 Education Student Support Fund, which shall be administered by the secretary of education. The
512 fund shall be credited with: (i) appropriations or other money authorized or transferred by the
513 general court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund; (ii) funds from public and
514 private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants and donations; and (iii) interest earned
515 on any money in the fund.
516 (b) Amounts credited to the fund shall be expended, without further appropriation, to: (i)
517 supplement financial aid awards to students at public institutions of higher education to prevent a
518 reduction in aid relative to the amount awarded in the prior fiscal year or relative to amounts
519 established subject to appropriation in statute or regulation, which shall include, but not be
26 of 146

520 limited to, the maintenance of the no cost community college program under section 5B of
521 chapter 15A of the General Laws; (ii) supplement allocations to public institutions of higher
522 education for financial aid programs to prevent a reduction in allocation from the prior fiscal
523 year; or (iii) otherwise maintain financial aid benefits to students relative to prior year benefit
524 levels. The secretary of education shall provide notice to the secretary of administration and
525 finance, the clerks of the house of representatives and senate and the house and senate
526 committees on ways and means not less than 15 days prior to expending funds from the Public
527 Higher Education Student Support Fund, including, but not limited to, the purpose and amount of
528 each expenditure.
529 (c) The unexpended balance in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain available
530 for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure made from the fund shall cause the
531 fund to be in deficit.
532 SECTION 20. Chapter 31 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
533 following section:-
534 Section 79. Following their original appointment and oath as a permanent full-time
535 environmental police officer in the police force of the office of law enforcement established by
536 section 10A of chapter 21A, a person shall perform the duties of such position on a full-time
537 basis for a probationary period of 12 months before they shall be considered a full-time tenured
538 employee in such position. The administrator, with the approval of the commission, may
539 establish procedures to ensure the evaluation by appointing authorities, prior to the end of such
540 probationary period, of the performance of persons appointed as police officers in such force.
541 Unless otherwise provided by civil service rule, and with appropriate adjustments to the timing
27 of 146

542 of performance evaluations called for therein, the second paragraph of section 34 shall apply to
543 persons covered by this section.
544 SECTION 21. Section 1 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
545 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Violent act injury” and
546 inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
547 “Violent act injury”, a catastrophic or life-threatening permanent bodily injury sustained
548 as a direct and proximate result of a violent attack upon a person by means of a dangerous
549 weapon, which is used in a manner intended to cause serious injury or death, including, but not
550 limited to, a firearm, knife, automobile or explosive device.
551 SECTION 22. Paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 26 of said chapter 32, as so
552 appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- This subdivision shall not
553 apply to a member in service who is physically not able to perform the essential duties of the
554 member’s job by reason of violent act injury.
555 SECTION 23. Said section 26 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is hereby further
556 amended by inserting after subdivision (2) the following subdivision:-
557 (2½) Section 7 shall apply to any member in service classified in Group 3 who is an
558 officer of the department of state police if the rating board, after an examination of such officer
559 by a registered physician appointed by it, reports in writing to the state board of retirement that
560 such officer is physically incapacitated for the performance of duty by reason of violent act
561 injury occurring during the performance and within the scope of the officer’s duty and without
562 contributory negligence on the officer’s part, and that such incapacity is likely to be permanent.
28 of 146

563 SECTION 24. Section 7 of chapter 66 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
564 amended by adding the following sentence:- Subject to the Health Insurance Portability and
565 Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104–191, the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act
566 of 2009, Public Law 111–5, 42 C.F.R. Part 2, 42 U.S.C. 290dd-2 and 45 C.F.R. Parts 160, 162
567 and 164, all records from state institutions for individuals with intellectual or developmental
568 disabilities or mental health conditions in the commonwealth shall be open to public inspection
569 and available for copying after the expiration of 75 years from creation of the record.
570 SECTION 25. Section 1 of chapter 75 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
571 amended by striking out, in line 14, the figure “58” and inserting in place thereof the following
572 figure:- 57.
573 SECTION 26. Subsection (a) of section 24N of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as so
574 appearing, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Routine childhood
575 immunizations” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
576 “Routine childhood immunizations”, immunizations for children until their nineteenth
577 birthday as determined by the commissioner.
578 SECTION 27. Subsection (c) of said section 24N of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is
579 hereby amended by striking out the last 5 sentences and inserting in place thereof the following
580 words:- The council shall recommend the types of vaccines to be purchased based on a list of
581 routine childhood immunizations and shall take into account provider preference, cost,
582 availability and other factors as determined by the council. The commissioner shall recommend
583 the amount of funding needed each fiscal year by calculating the total non-federal program cost.
584 The council shall make recommendations to the commissioner on whether the commissioner
585 may authorize provider choice of more than 1 comparable brand or type for a routine childhood
29 of 146

586 immunization vaccine. In its recommendations, the council shall examine the feasibility, costs
587 and benefits of authorizing provider choice, provide a schedule of the cost of each comparable
588 brand or type of a vaccine recommended for provider choice and demonstrate that the estimated
589 vaccine cost of authorizing provider choice would not be substantially greater than the estimated
590 vaccine cost of purchasing a single brand or type of a vaccine. The commissioner of public
591 health shall determine the final vaccines to be purchased. The council shall also consider other
592 vaccine-related questions presented by the commissioner.
593 There shall be a committee on immunization recommendations consisting of the
594 following members of the vaccine program advisory council established pursuant to this
595 subsection: the commissioner of public health or a designee, who shall serve as chair; the
596 medical director of the universal immunization program of the department of public health
597 established under section 24I; the member of the Massachusetts Medical Society; the member of
598 the Massachusetts Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics; the member of the
599 Massachusetts Academy of Family Physicians; and the 3 physicians licensed to practice in the
600 commonwealth who have expertise in the area of childhood vaccines. The committee shall
601 consider vaccine related questions posed by the commissioner and may make recommendations
602 to and advise the commissioner regarding childhood immunizations.
603 SECTION 28. Said section 24N of said chapter 111, as so appearing, is hereby further
604 amended by striking out, in lines 109 to 111, inclusive, the words “Advisory Committee on
605 Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention” and inserting in place
606 thereof the following word:- commissioner.
607 SECTION 29. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
608 section 12C, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
30 of 146

609 Section 12C. No physician, nurse or other health care professional licensed under this
610 chapter or otherwise authorized within their scope of practice, by statewide standing order or by
611 department of public health designation to prescribe, dispense or administer vaccines shall be
612 liable for any injury caused by an act or omission in prescribing, dispensing, ordering, furnishing
613 or administering a vaccine or other immunizing agent, including the residual effects of the
614 vaccine or immunizing agent if the immunization is: (i) required by state law; (ii) administered in
615 accordance with guidance from the department of public health; or (iii) authorized under public
616 health programs and the act or omission does not constitute willful misconduct or gross
617 negligence.
618 SECTION 30. Said chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby further amended by
619 inserting after section 74D the following section:-
620 Section 74E. (a) The board of registration in nursing may obtain a state and national
621 fingerprint-based criminal background check, as authorized by Public Law 92-544, to determine
622 the suitability of an applicant for a license to practice nursing pursuant to sections 74, 74A, 76
623 and 80B.
624 (b) Registered nurses subject to background checks pursuant to this section shall be
625 individuals who hold ultimate responsibility for direct and indirect nursing care and are seeking:
626 (i) licensure as a registered nurse pursuant to this chapter; and (ii) to provide nursing care, health
627 maintenance, teaching, counseling, planning and restoration for optimal functioning and comfort
628 of patients they serve within the commonwealth. For the purposes of this section, “advanced
629 practice registered nurse” shall mean a registered nurse authorized by the board of registration in
31 of 146

630 nursing to perform an expanded scope of practice when caring for patients in the commonwealth
631 consistent with section 80B.
632 (c) Licensed practical nurses subject to background checks pursuant to this section shall
633 be individuals who are seeking: (i) licensure as a practical nurse pursuant to this chapter; and (ii)
634 to provide nursing care and health maintenance services to patients within the commonwealth.
635 (d) An individual applying to the board of registration in nursing for a license to practice
636 nursing shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the identification section of the department of
637 state police to obtain a state and national fingerprint-based criminal background check, as
638 authorized by Public Law 92-544, to determine the suitability of any applicant for licensure.
639 (e) Fingerprints submitted pursuant to this section shall be used by the department of state
640 police to conduct a state criminal history check and forwarded to the Federal Bureau of
641 Investigation for a national criminal history check in accordance with the policies and procedures
642 established by the state identification section of the department of state police and by the
643 department of criminal justice information services. Fingerprint submissions may be retained by
644 the Federal Bureau of Investigation, the state identification section of the department of state
645 police and the department of criminal justice information services to assist the board of
646 registration in nursing to ensure the continued suitability of these licensees and persons subject to
647 criminal background checks under this section. The department of criminal justice information
648 services may disseminate the results of the state and national criminal background checks to
649 authorized staff employed by the department of public health and board of registration in
650 nursing.
32 of 146

651 (f) Each applicant shall pay a fee, as established by the secretary of administration and
652 finance, in consultation with the secretary of public safety and security, to offset the costs of
653 operating and administering a fingerprint-based criminal background check system. The
654 secretary of administration and finance, in consultation with the secretary of public safety and
655 security, may increase the fee accordingly if the Federal Bureau of Investigation increases its
656 services fees for processing fingerprint background checks. Any fees collected from
657 fingerprinting activity under this section shall be deposited into the Fingerprint-Based
658 Background Check Trust Fund established in section 2HHHH of chapter 29.
659 (g) The board of registration in nursing may use the results of the criminal history record
660 check solely for the purpose of determining the applicant’s eligibility for a license to practice
661 nursing pursuant to sections 74, 74A, 76 and 80B. The department of public health and board of
662 registration in nursing shall not disseminate the criminal history record check information to any
663 other entity.
664 (h) The department of public health and board of registration in nursing may receive all
665 available criminal offender record information, juvenile adjudications and delinquency matters,
666 sealed records and the results of checks of state and national criminal history information
667 databases under Public Law 92-544. Upon receipt of the results of the state and national criminal
668 background checks, the department of public health, board of registration in nursing and
669 authorized staff shall treat the information according to sections 167 to 178, inclusive, of chapter
670 6 and the regulations thereunder regarding criminal offender record information.
671 (i) The board of registration in nursing may promulgate regulations necessary to carry out
672 this section.
33 of 146

673 SECTION 31. Sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of chapter 113 of the General Laws are hereby
674 repealed.
675 SECTION 32. Section 64 of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
676 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the definition of “Assessed charges” and
677 inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
678 ''Assessed charges'', gross patient service revenue attributable to all patients less gross
679 patient service revenue attributable to Title XVIII, XIX and XXI programs, as such revenues are
680 reported to the center for health information and analysis and as determined by the secretary.
681 SECTION 33. Said section 64 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby further
682 amended by striking out the definition of “Managed care organization reinvestment revenue
683 amount” and inserting in place thereof the following 3 definitions:-
684 “Managed care organization services assessment rate”, the rate calculated annually by
685 dividing the non-Medicaid managed care organization revenue amount by the total managed care
686 organization services subject to assessment that are not Medicaid managed care organization
687 services subject to assessment.
688 “Medicaid managed care organization revenue amount”, an amount calculated annually
689 by multiplying the Medicaid managed care organization services subject to assessment by the
690 managed care organization services assessment rate.
691 “Non-Medicaid managed care organization revenue amount”, an amount equal, for each
692 calendar year, to the sum of the following in the same year less $20,000,000: (i) the health safety
693 net managed care organization revenue amount; (ii) the Massachusetts Child Psychiatry Access
34 of 146

694 Project revenue amount; (iii) the immunization revenue amount; (iv) the health policy
695 commission revenue amount; (v) the center for health information and analysis revenue amount;
696 (vi) the amount transferred, pursuant to section 66, to the Behavioral Health Access and Crisis
697 Intervention Trust Fund established in section 2WWWWW of chapter 29; and (vii) the amounts
698 necessary to incorporate prospectively all adjustments or reconciliations to account for under-
699 assessments in the prior year.
700 SECTION 34. Said section 64 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby further
701 amended by striking out the definition of “Total managed care organization services assessment
702 amount” and inserting in place thereof the following definition:-
703 “Total managed care organization services revenue amount”, an amount equal, for each
704 calendar year, to the sum of the following in the same year: (i) the Medicaid managed care
705 organization revenue amount; and (ii) the non-Medicaid managed care organization revenue
706 amount.
707 SECTION 35. Said section 64 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby further
708 amended by striking out, in line 189, the figure “$1,484,050,000” and inserting in place thereof
709 the following figure:- $1,534,050,000.
710 SECTION 36. Section 66 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
711 striking out, in lines 55 and 56, the words “managed care organization reinvestment” and
712 inserting in place thereof the following words:- Medicaid managed care organization.
713 SECTION 37. Said section 66 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby further
714 amended by striking out, in lines 85 and 86, the words “total managed care organization services
35 of 146

715 assessment” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- non-Medicaid managed care
716 organization revenue.
717 SECTION 38. Said section 66 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby further
718 amended by striking out subsection (b) and inserting in place thereof the following 2
719 subsections:-
720 (b) The fund shall consist of: (i) all amounts paid by hospitals and managed care
721 organizations under sections 67 and 68; (ii) all appropriations for the purpose of payments to
722 acute hospitals or community health centers for health services provided to uninsured and
723 underinsured residents; (iii) any transfers from the Commonwealth Care Trust Fund established
724 in section 2OOO of chapter 29; (iv) any transfers from the Safety Net Provider Trust Fund
725 established in section 2AAAAA of chapter 29; (v) any transfers from the Hospital Investment
726 and Performance Trust Fund established in section 2TTTTT of chapter 29; (vi) any transfers
727 from the Managed Care Organization Services Reinvestment Fund established in section
728 2FFFFFF of chapter 29; and (vii) all property and securities acquired by and through the use of
729 money belonging to the fund and all interest thereon. There shall also be credited to the fund an
730 amount equal to any federal financial participation claimed and received by the commonwealth
731 for eligible expenditures made from the fund and financed by money transferred from the
732 Hospital Investment and Performance Trust Fund established in section 2TTTTT of chapter 29,
733 the Managed Care Organization Services Reinvestment Fund established in section 2FFFFFF of
734 chapter 29, or from the Safety Net Provider Trust Fund established in section 2AAAAA of
735 chapter 29. To accommodate timing discrepancies between the receipt of such revenue and
736 related expenditures, the comptroller may certify for payment amounts not to exceed the most
737 recent revenue estimates as certified by the secretary of health and human services to be
36 of 146

738 transferred, credited or deposited under this subsection. Annually, the office shall transfer from
739 the non-federal money in the fund: (A) $149,300,000 to the Safety Net Provider Trust Fund
740 established in section 2AAAAA of chapter 29; (B) $1,041,170,000 to the Hospital Investment
741 and Performance Trust Fund established in section 2TTTTT of chapter 29; (C) $115,500,000 to
742 the Population Health Investment Trust Fund established in section 2UUUUU of chapter 29; (D)
743 $ 33,169,685 to the Non-Acute Care Hospital Reimbursement Trust Fund established in section
744 2WWWW of chapter 29; (E) an amount equal to the managed care reinvestment revenue amount
745 to the Managed Care Organization Services Reinvestment Fund established in section 2FFFFFF
746 of chapter 29; (F) an amount equal to the Massachusetts Child Psychiatry Access Project revenue
747 amount to the Massachusetts Child Psychiatry Access Project Fund established in section
748 2EEEEEE of chapter 29; (G) an amount equal to the health policy commission revenue amount
749 to the Healthcare Payment Reform Fund established in section 100 of chapter 194 of the acts of
750 2011; (H) an amount equal to the immunization revenue amount to the Vaccine Purchase Fund
751 established in section 24N of chapter 111; (I) $33,700,000 to the Behavioral Health Access and
752 Crisis Intervention Trust Fund established in section 2WWWWW of chapter 29; (J) an amount
753 equal to the center for health information and analysis revenue amount to the Center for Health
754 Information and Analysis Fund established in section 7A of chapter 12C; and (K) $35,000,000 to
755 the Essential Community Provider Trust Fund established in section 2PPP of chapter 29. The
756 office shall expend amounts in the fund, except for amounts transferred to the Safety Net
757 Provider Trust Fund, the Hospital Investment and Performance Trust Fund, the Population
758 Health Investment Trust Fund, the Non-Acute Care Hospital Reimbursement Trust Fund, the
759 Managed Care Organization Services Reinvestment Fund, the Massachusetts Child Psychiatry
760 Access Project Fund, the Vaccine Purchase Fund, the Center for Health and Information
37 of 146

761 Analysis Fund, the Healthcare Payment Reform Fund and the Behavioral Health Access and
762 Crisis Intervention Trust Fund, for payments to hospitals and community health centers for
763 reimbursable health services provided to uninsured and underinsured residents, consistent with
764 the requirements of this section, section 69 and the regulations adopted by the office. The
765 amount collected pursuant to clause (vii) of the definition of total managed care organization
766 services revenue amount in section 64 shall be dedicated to reducing the shortfall, as described in
767 subsection (b) of section 69, for the year prior to the assessment year. The office shall also
768 annually expend money from the fund for the expenses of the executive office, including the
769 health safety net office under subsection (a), for the administration of the health safety net and
770 related assessments. The office shall also expend not more than $6,000,000 annually from the
771 fund for demonstration projects that use case management and other methods to reduce the
772 liability of the fund to acute hospitals. Any annual balance remaining in the fund after these
773 payments have been made shall be retained in the fund and shall not revert to the General Fund.
774 All interest earned on the amounts in the fund shall be deposited or retained in the fund. The
775 director shall from time-to-time requisition from the fund amounts that the director considers
776 necessary to meet the current obligations of the office for the purposes of the fund and estimated
777 obligations for a reasonable future period.
778 (c) For each fiscal year, in the event that federal financial participation is not available for
779 any of the Medicaid expenditures made or to be made from this fund or from amounts transferred
780 from the fund pursuant to clauses (A), (B), (C), (D) or (K) of subsection (b), or hospital
781 assessment funding serving as the non-federal share of such expenditures is not available due to
782 the application of any federal law, regulation or policy, such as federal expenditure limits or
783 federal health care-related tax rules, or for any other reason, the amount of each such
38 of 146

784 forementioned transfer from the fund shall be reduced on a pro-rata basis by multiplying each
785 such expenditure or transfer by a fraction, the numerator of which is the aggregate amount of the
786 transfers from the fund pursuant to said clauses (A), (B), (C), (D) or (K) of said subsection (b)
787 for which federal financial participation will be available and the denominator of which is the
788 aggregate amount the expenditures and transfers from the fund pursuant to said clauses (A), (B),
789 (C), (D) or (K) of said subsection (b) that would otherwise be made.
790 SECTION 39. Said chapter 118E is hereby further amended by striking out section 67, as
791 so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
792 Section 67. (a) Subject to all required federal approvals, including any required waivers
793 under 42 CFR 433.68, a hospital’s annual liability to the fund shall be calculated in accordance
794 with this section. The annual aggregate liability of all hospitals to the fund shall equal the total
795 hospital assessment amount.
796 (b) [reserved].
797 (c) The office shall promulgate regulations establishing an appropriate mechanism for
798 enforcing each hospital’s liability to the fund if a hospital does not make a scheduled payment to
799 the fund.
800 (d) For the purposes of the assessment in this section, all hospitals in the commonwealth
801 shall be divided into the following groups, as determined by the secretary: (i) large group 1
802 safety net hospitals which, for the purposes of this section, shall mean, any group 1 safety net
803 hospital that had not less than 355 staffed beds in fiscal year 2022, as reported by the center for
804 health information and analysis; (ii) small group 1 safety net hospitals which, for the purposes of
805 this section, shall mean any group 1 safety net hospital that had less than 355 staffed beds in
39 of 146

806 fiscal year 2022 as reported by the center for health information and analysis; (iii) large group 2
807 safety net hospitals which, for the purposes of this section, shall mean any group 2 safety net
808 hospital that had not less than 355 staffed beds in fiscal year 2022 as reported by the center for
809 health information and analysis; (iv) small group 2 safety net hospitals which, for the purposes of
810 this section, shall mean any group 2 safety net hospital that had less than 355 staffed beds in
811 fiscal year 2022 as reported by the center for health information and analysis; (v) freestanding
812 pediatric acute hospitals; (vi) academic, teaching and specialty hospitals which, for the purposes
813 of this section, shall mean an academic medical center, teaching hospital or specialty hospital as
814 determined by the center for health information and analysis as of September 30, 2019, but
815 excluding any high public payer hospital; (vii) private acute hospitals which, for the purposes of
816 this section, shall mean a private hospital licensed under section 51 of chapter 111 that contains a
817 majority of medical-surgical, pediatric, obstetric and maternity beds as defined by the department
818 of public health and operating as of September 30, 2019, but excluding any safety net hospital or
819 academic, teaching and specialty hospital; (viii) non-state public hospitals which, for the
820 purposes of this section, shall mean any non-state-owned public hospital in the commonwealth as
821 determined by the secretary; and (ix) non-acute hospitals which, for the purposes of this section
822 shall mean any nonpublic hospital licensed by the department of public health under said section
823 51 of said chapter 111; provided, however, that non-acute hospital shall not include an acute care
824 hospital under section 25B of said chapter 111 or a nonpublic hospital licensed as an inpatient
825 facility by the department of mental health under section 19 of chapter 19 and regulations
826 promulgated thereunder but not categorized as a class VII licensee under the regulations.
827 (e) Each of the groups described in subsection (d) shall be subject to the following
828 assessment rates: (i) large group 1 safety net hospitals shall be subject to a rate of 16.510per cent
40 of 146

829 for inpatient services and 8.000 per cent for outpatient services; (ii) small group 1 safety net
830 hospitals shall be subject to a rate of 14.500 per cent for inpatient services and 5.500 per cent for
831 outpatient services; (iii) large group 2 safety net hospitals shall be subject to a rate of 8.100 per
832 cent for inpatient services and 16.200 per cent for outpatient services; (iv) small group 2 safety
833 net hospitals shall be subject to a rate of 16.450 per cent for inpatient services and 9.100 per cent
834 for outpatient services; (v) freestanding pediatric acute hospitals shall be subject to a rate of
835 3.300 per cent for inpatient services and 2.600 per cent for outpatient services; (vi) academic,
836 teaching and specialty hospitals shall be subject to a rate of 4.675 per cent for inpatient services
837 and 1.290 per cent for outpatient services; (vii) private acute hospitals shall be subject to a rate of
838 8.299 per cent for inpatient services and 0.720 per cent for outpatient services; (viii) non-state
839 public hospitals shall be subject to a rate of 1.250 per cent for inpatient services and 1.250 per
840 cent for outpatient services; and (ix) non-acute hospitals shall be subject to a rate of 3.300 per
841 cent for inpatient services and 3.300 per cent for outpatient services; provided, however, that the
842 office shall increase each such rate by the amount necessary to generate 50 per cent of the
843 estimated cost as determined by the secretary of administration and finance, of administering the
844 health safety net and related assessments in accordance with sections 65 to 69, inclusive. If
845 hospital closures or hospital changes in status to a different type of provider would result in a
846 reduction of total hospital assessment amount, the secretary may, by regulation, adjust the
847 assessment rates to ensure the total hospital assessment amount is not reduced by more than
848 $10,000,000 on an annual basis; provided, however, that any such adjustments to the rates shall
849 ensure the rates remain in the same proportion to each other as established herein. If the total
850 hospital assessment amount collected for the hospital assessment year exceeds the amount
851 necessary to support the non-federal share of amounts transferred pursuant to clauses (A), (B),
41 of 146

852 (C), (D) or (K) of subsection (b) of section 66, the secretary shall, by regulation, adjust the
853 assessment rates for the subsequent hospital assessment year to ensure the total hospital
854 assessment amount does not exceed the amount necessary to support such expenditures;
855 provided, however, that any such adjustments shall ensure the rates remain in the same
856 proportion to each other as established herein and provided that any such adjustment does not
857 jeopardize federal financial participation. In order to adjust the assessment rates by regulation as
858 described in this subsection, the secretary of health and human services shall seek all required
859 federal approvals the secretary deems necessary.
860 (f) The assessment rates described in subsection (e) shall be applied to each hospital’s
861 fiscal year 2023 assessed charges for inpatient and outpatient services as determined by the
862 secretary of health and human services; provided, however, that the term “assessed charges”
863 shall have the meaning ascribed to it in section 64. The total of the resulting products shall equal
864 a hospital’s annual assessment liability.
865 (g) Subject to receipt of all required federal approvals, the executive office shall
866 implement the assessment structure described in this section and shall promulgate regulations,
867 after consultation with Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc., necessary to support
868 implementation of said assessment structure. In promulgating such regulations, and in
869 consultation with Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc., the executive office shall,
870 at a minimum: (i) specify an appropriate mechanism for determination and payment of an acute
871 hospital's liability to the fund; (ii) identify the hospitals that belong to each group identified in
872 subsection (d); (iii) specify an appropriate mechanism for the determination of a hospital’s
873 liability in cases of merger or transfer of ownership; and (iv) specify an appropriate mechanism
874 by which any amounts paid by a hospital in excess of a hospital’s total annual assessment
42 of 146

875 liability may be refunded or otherwise credited to the hospital. The executive office shall also
876 publish or otherwise make available to Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc. the
877 data and methodology used in setting the tax rates and group classification prior to the
878 promulgation of any such regulations.
879 (h) The secretary of health and human services may enforce the payment of required
880 assessments under this section: (i) for hospitals licensed by the department of health, by
881 notifying the department of the unpaid assessments and such information shall be considered by
882 the department in determining suitability in accordance with section 51 of chapter 111 for the
883 hospital or its affiliate provider entities; (ii) by offsetting payments from the office of Medicaid
884 against the claims for payment by the delinquent hospital, against other hospitals or MassHealth-
885 contracted entities under common ownership as the delinquent hospital or against any successor
886 in interest to the hospital or such provider entities under common ownership, in the amount of
887 the delinquent fees owed, including any interest, penalties and reasonable attorneys’ fees, and by
888 transferring such funds into the fund; or (iii) creating, after demand for payment, a lien in favor
889 of the commonwealth in an amount not to exceed the delinquent fees owed, including any
890 interest, penalties and reasonable attorneys’ fees, encumbering the building in which the
891 delinquent hospital is located, encumbering the real property upon which the delinquent hospital
892 is located, including fixtures, equipment or goods used in the operation of the delinquent
893 hospital, or encumbering any real property in which the delinquent hospital holds an interest.
894 SECTION 40. Section 74 of said chapter 118E, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
895 striking out subsection (k) and inserting in place thereof the following 2 subsections:-
43 of 146

896 (k) The council may contract with a provider of a pooled employer plan, as defined in 29
897 U.S.C. § 1002(43), on behalf of consumers and their personal care attendants.
898 (l) The council may perform other acts necessary or convenient to execute the powers
899 expressly granted to it.
900 SECTION 41. Section 36 of chapter 123 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
901 amended by inserting after the second sentence the following 3 sentences:- There shall be a
902 rebuttable presumption that disclosure of patient records more than 50 years after the death of the
903 patient is in the best interest of the patient; provided, however, that: (i) the records are facility
904 records; and (ii) the requestor is a close relative or engaged in academic research. The
905 department shall make best efforts to redact any personal identifying information of living
906 individuals in such patient records in order to avoid undue invasion of privacy. The department
907 shall promulgate regulations in collaboration with the department of developmental services to
908 implement this rule.
909 SECTION 42. Section 17 of chapter 123B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
910 hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following 3 sentences:- There shall be
911 a rebuttable presumption that disclosure of patient records more than 50 years after the death of
912 the patient is in the best interest of the patient; provided, that the: (i) records are facility records;
913 and (ii) requestor is a close relative or engaged in academic research. The department shall make
914 best efforts to redact any personal identifying information of living individuals in such patient
915 records in order to avoid undue invasions of privacy. The department shall promulgate
916 regulations in collaboration with the department of mental health to implement this rule.
44 of 146

917 SECTION 43. Said section 17 of said chapter 123B, as so appearing, is hereby further
918 amended by adding the following 3 sentences:- Each facility, subject to this chapter and section 7
919 of chapter 19B, shall maintain resident records for not less than 20 years after the closing of the
920 record due to discharge, death or last date of service. A facility shall not destroy such records
921 until after the retention period has elapsed and only upon notifying the department of public
922 health that the records will be destroyed; provided, however, that the department of
923 developmental services shall promulgate regulations further defining an appropriate notification
924 process. Each notice of privacy practices by a facility shall include, but not be limited to: (i)
925 information concerning the provisions of this section; and (ii) the facility’s records termination
926 policy.
927 SECTION 44. Section 2 of chapter 130 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
928 amended by inserting after the word “chapter”, in line 39, the following words:- or any rule or
929 regulation made under authority of this chapter.
930 SECTION 45. The second paragraph of section 21 of said chapter 130, as so appearing, is
931 hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- The refusal or failure to submit a statistical
932 report, or the knowing submission of a false statistical report, shall constitute a violation of this
933 chapter.
934 SECTION 46. The first paragraph of section 80 of said chapter 130, as so appearing, is
935 hereby amended by inserting after the first sentence the following sentence:- No person shall fish
936 for or take fish for commercial purposes in the coastal waters, or land raw fish, whether frozen or
937 unfrozen, in the commonwealth, for the purpose of sale, in violation of a commercial fisherman
938 permit.
45 of 146

939 SECTION 47. Section 44H of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
940 hereby amended by striking out, in lines 6 and 7, the words “38C to 38N, inclusive, of chapter 7”
941 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- 44 to 57, inclusive, of chapter 7C.
942 SECTION 48. Said section 44H of said chapter 149, as so appearing, is hereby further
943 amended by striking out, in line 14, the words “38C to 38N, inclusive” and inserting in place
944 thereof the following words:- 44 to 57, inclusive, of chapter 7C.
945 SECTION 49. Section 7 of chapter 161A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
946 amended by striking out, in line 34, the figure “4” and inserting in place thereof the following
947 figure:- 5.
948 SECTION 50. Said section 7 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby further
949 amended by striking out subsection (f) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
950 (f) The board shall establish subcommittees, which shall include at a minimum a
951 subcommittee on: (i) safety, health and environment; (ii) planning, workforce development and
952 compensation; and (iii) audit and finance. Each member shall participate on not more than 2
953 subcommittees of the board. Each subcommittee shall have not less than 3 board members. The
954 appointee of the governor who has experience in safety shall chair the subcommittee on safety,
955 health and environment. The appointee of the governor who has experience in public or private
956 finance shall chair the subcommittee on audit and finance. In the case of a vacancy of either the
957 appointee who has experience in safety or the appointee who has experience in public or private
958 finance, the board chair shall designate a subcommittee member to serve as acting subcommittee
959 chair until such time as the vacancy has been filled.
46 of 146

960 SECTION 51. Said section 7 of said chapter 161A, as so appearing, is hereby further
961 amended by striking out subsection (i) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
962 (i) The board shall meet as determined by the chair, but not less than 10 times per
963 calendar year.
964 SECTION 52. Section 2 of chapter 176Q of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
965 amended by striking out, in lines 24 and 25, the words “Massachusetts chapter of the National
966 Association of Health Underwriters” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
967 National Association of Benefits and Insurance Professionals – Massachusetts Chapter, Inc.
968 SECTION 53. Chapter 210 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out
969 section 13, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
970 Section 13. (a) The court shall, before decreeing a change of name, request a report from
971 the commissioner of probation on the person filing the petition, and, upon entry of a decree, the
972 name as established thereby shall be the legal name of the petitioner. The register may issue a
973 certificate, under the seal of the court, of the name as so established. The court may, for good
974 cause shown, require public notice of the petition to be given and any person to be heard thereon.
975 No decree shall be entered, however, until there has been filed in the court a copy of the
976 birth record of the person whose name is sought to be changed, and, in case such person's name
977 has previously been changed by decree of court or at marriage pursuant to section 1D of chapter
978 46, either a copy of: (i) the record of such person’s birth amended to conform to the previous
979 decree changing the person’s name; (ii) such decree; or (iii) the record of marriage; provided,
980 however, that the filing of any such copy may be dispensed with if the judge is satisfied that it
981 cannot be obtained.
47 of 146

982 (b) The petition for name change, all pleadings, papers or documents filed in connection
983 therewith and docket entries in the permanent docket and record books, online and otherwise,
984 shall not be available for inspection unless the court, for good cause shown, otherwise orders or
985 unless requested by the petitioner. The petition, reports, pleadings, papers, documents and
986 permanent docket and record books shall be segregated.
987 SECTION 54. Chapter 239 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
988 following section:-
989 Section 17. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
990 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
991 “Federal government shutdown”, any period in which all non-essential federal
992 government functions cease as a result of a failure to enact a regular appropriations bill or
993 continuing resolution.
994 “Impacted federal worker”, a resident of the commonwealth who, as a result of a federal
995 government shutdown, is furloughed or excepted pursuant to 31 U.S.C. § 1342 or any other
996 federal law requiring the person to continue to work without pay during a federal government
997 shutdown, including, but not limited to, service members or employees of the active-duty
998 military, national guard and reserve components.
999 “Non-essential eviction”, an eviction of an impacted federal worker for nonpayment of
1000 rent during a federal government shutdown.
1001 “Tenant”, any resident whose tenancy began before a federal government shutdown.
48 of 146

1002 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, regulation or order to the contrary, a
1003 landlord or owner of a property shall not, for the purposes of a non-essential eviction for a
1004 residential dwelling unit: (i) terminate a tenancy; or (ii) send any notice, including a notice to
1005 quit, requesting or demanding that a tenant of a residential dwelling unit vacate the premises if
1006 the tenant provides notice and documentation to the landlord or owner that they are experiencing
1007 a significant financial impact from a federal government shutdown. A landlord or owner of a
1008 property shall include, on any complaint for summary process filed during a federal government
1009 shutdown, a statement that the landlord has not received notice that the defendant is an impacted
1010 federal worker.
1011 (c)(1) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, regulation or order to the
1012 contrary, a court having jurisdiction over an action for summary process pursuant to this chapter,
1013 including the Boston municipal court department, shall not, in a non-essential eviction for a
1014 residential dwelling unit accept for filing a writ, summons or complaint unless the plaintiff
1015 includes in the complaint a statement that the defendant is not an impacted federal worker.
1016 (2) Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule, regulation or order to the contrary, a
1017 court having jurisdiction over an action for summary process pursuant to this chapter, including
1018 the Boston municipal court department, shall not, in a non-essential eviction for a residential
1019 dwelling unit initiated during a federal government shutdown: (i) enter a judgment for a plaintiff
1020 for possession of a residential dwelling unit if the defendant provides the court with
1021 documentation that they are an impacted federal worker who suffered a significant financial
1022 impact due to a federal government shutdown; (ii) enter a default judgment for a plaintiff for
1023 possession of a residential dwelling unit unless the court has determined that the defendant is not
1024 an impacted federal worker; (iii) deny, upon the request of a defendant, a continuance of a
49 of 146

1025 summary process case of not more than 30 days if the defendant provides the court with
1026 documentation that they are an impacted federal worker who suffered a significant financial
1027 impact due to a federal government shutdown; or (iv) schedule a court event, other than a status
1028 hearing, if the defendant provides the court documentation that they are an impacted federal
1029 worker who suffered a significant financial impact due to a federal government shutdown.
1030 (d) A deadline or time period for action by a defendant to a non-essential eviction for a
1031 residential dwelling unit initiated during a federal government shutdown, shall be tolled if the
1032 defendant provides the court documentation that they are an impacted federal worker who
1033 suffered a significant financial impact due to a federal government shutdown.
1034 (e) A landlord shall not impose a late fee for nonpayment of rent for a residential
1035 dwelling unit or furnish rental payment data to a consumer reporting agency, as defined in
1036 section 50 of chapter 93 of the General Laws, related to the nonpayment of rent, if, not later than
1037 30 days after the missed rent payment, the tenant provides notice and documentation to the
1038 owner or landlord that the tenant is an impacted federal worker and the nonpayment of rent was
1039 due to a significant financial impact from a federal government shutdown. The executive office
1040 of housing and livable communities shall develop forms and recommendations for the provision
1041 of notice and documentation to a landlord that the nonpayment of rent was due to a significant
1042 financial impact of a federal government shutdown.
1043 (f) Nothing in this section shall relieve a tenant from the obligation to pay rent or restrict
1044 a landlord’s or owner’s ability to recover rent.
1045 (g) Notwithstanding section 15B of chapter 186 or any other general or special law to the
1046 contrary, in order to address disruptions caused by a federal government shutdown, a lessor who
50 of 146

1047 received rent in advance for the last month of tenancy pursuant to said section 15B of said
1048 chapter 186, may access and utilize the funds received from said last month’s rent in advance if
1049 the tenant is an impacted federal worker who is unable to pay rent as a result of a federal
1050 government shutdown. A lessor may utilize such funds to pay for expenses, which may include,
1051 but shall not be limited to, mortgage payments, utilities, repairs and required upkeep; provided,
1052 however, that a lessor shall not deduct from said last month’s rent in advance any amount to
1053 account for the tenant’s nonpayment of rent; provided further, that the lessor shall notify the
1054 tenant in writing that: (i) the lessor utilized such funds before the last month of the tenancy; and
1055 (ii) the lessor remains obligated to apply such funds to its intended application as rent for the last
1056 month of tenancy.
1057 (h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve a lessor of their obligations to
1058 apply said rent in advance to its intended application as rent for the last month of tenancy and to
1059 pay to the tenant any interest due as required pursuant to section 15B of chapter 186.
1060 (i) A landlord or owner shall not be liable for actions taken in good faith reliance on
1061 documentation provided by a tenant pursuant to this section.
1062 (j) The executive office of housing and livable communities shall issue regulations and
1063 guidance as necessary to implement this section.
1064 (k) This section shall be in effect during a federal government shutdown until 30 days
1065 after a federal government shutdown has ended; provided, however, that the governor may
1066 postpone such expiration by not more than 75 days after a federal shutdown has ended; and
1067 provided further, that any deadline or time period for action that is tolled under subsection (d)
1068 shall begin to run upon the expiration date.
51 of 146

1069 SECTION 55. Chapter 244 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
1070 following section:-
1071 Section 42. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
1072 clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
1073 “Federal government shutdown”, any period in which all non-essential federal
1074 government functions cease as a result of a failure to enact a regular appropriations bill or
1075 continuing resolution.
1076 “Impacted federal worker”, a resident of the commonwealth who, as a result of a federal
1077 government shutdown, is furloughed or excepted pursuant to 31 U.S.C. § 1342 or any other
1078 federal law requiring the person to continue to work without pay during a federal government
1079 shutdown, including, but not limited to, active-duty military, national guard and reserve
1080 components.
1081 “Mortgagor”, a person whose mortgage obligations began before a federal government
1082 shutdown.
1083 “Non-essential eviction”, an eviction of an impacted federal worker for nonpayment of
1084 rent during a federal government shutdown.
1085 (b) Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, a creditor,
1086 mortgagee or person having estate in the land mortgaged, a person authorized by a power of sale
1087 pursuant to section 14 or right of entry or the attorney duly authorized by a writing under seal or
1088 the legal guardian or conservator of such mortgagee or person acting in the name of such
1089 mortgagee or person shall not, for the purposes of foreclosure of a residential property as defined
52 of 146

1090 in section 35B that is not vacant or abandoned and for which the mortgagor is an impacted
1091 federal worker or the tenants of the mortgagor are impacted federal workers: (i) cause notice of a
1092 foreclosure sale to be published pursuant to said section 14; (ii) exercise a power of sale; (iii)
1093 exercise a right of entry; or (iv) initiate a judicial or non-judicial foreclosure process; provided,
1094 however, that the mortgagor shall provide notice and documentation that they are an impacted
1095 federal worker or the tenants of the mortgagor are impacted federal workers and as a result the
1096 mortgagor is experiencing a significant financial impact from a federal government shutdown.
1097 (c) A creditor or mortgagee shall grant a forbearance to a mortgagor of a mortgage loan
1098 for a residential property as defined in section 35Bof the General Laws if the mortgagor submits
1099 a request to the mortgagor’s servicer, which includes an attestation made under pains and
1100 penalties of perjury that the mortgagor is an impacted federal worker or the tenants of the
1101 mortgagor are impacted federal workers and as a result the mortgagor has experienced a
1102 significant financial impact from a federal government shutdown. The forbearance shall be for
1103 not more than 180 days. Fees or penalties beyond the amounts scheduled and calculated as if the
1104 mortgagor made all contractual payments on time and in full under the terms of the mortgage
1105 contract shall not accrue during the period of forbearance granted under this subsection. A
1106 payment subject to the forbearance shall be added to the end of the term of the loan unless
1107 otherwise agreed to by the mortgagor and mortgagee. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a
1108 mortgagor and mortgagee from entering into an alternative payment agreement for the payments
1109 subject to the forbearance. The mortgagee shall not furnish negative mortgage payment
1110 information to a consumer reporting agency related to mortgage payments subject to forbearance
1111 under this act; provided, however, that the mortgagee shall comply with the Fair Credit
1112 Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. §§ 1681, et. seq.
53 of 146

1113 (d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve a mortgagor from the obligation
1114 to pay their mortgage or restrict the ability of a creditor, mortgagee, person having estate in the
1115 land mortgaged, a person authorized by a power of sale or right of entry, an attorney duly
1116 authorized or a person acting in the name of such mortgagee or person from recovering mortgage
1117 payments.
1118 (e) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, a creditor or mortgagee
1119 shall not be required to grant a forbearance to a mortgagor of a mortgage loan for a residential
1120 property under subsection (b) if the mortgagor’s request for such forbearance is made after the
1121 expiration date under subsection (g).
1122 (f) A mortgagee or servicer shall not be liable for actions taken in good faith reliance on
1123 documentation provided by a mortgagor pursuant to this section.
1124 (g) This section shall be in effect during a federal government shutdown until 30 days
1125 after a federal government shutdown has ended; provided, however, that the governor may
1126 postpone such expiration by not more than 75 days after a federal government shutdown has
1127 ended.
1128 SECTION 56. Section 33 of chapter 268 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
1129 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “revenue”, in line 10, the
1130 following words:- or an officer or employee acting under the authority of the United States or
1131 any department, agency or officer thereof.
1132 SECTION 57. Said section 33 of said chapter 268, as so appearing, is hereby further
1133 amended by striking out, in lines 11 to 13, inclusive, the words “shall be punished by a fine of
1134 not more than four hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than one year” and inserting
54 of 146

1135 in place thereof the following words:- shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000 or by
1136 imprisonment for not more than 2 1/2 years.
1137 SECTION 58. The first paragraph of section 12A of chapter 494 of the acts of 1978 is
1138 hereby amended by striking out the words “and until December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 7
1139 of chapter 26 of the acts of 2023, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and until
1140 December 15, 2027.
1141 SECTION 59. The last paragraph of said section 12A of said chapter 494 is hereby
1142 amended by striking out the words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 8 of said chapter
1143 26, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
1144 SECTION 60. The introductory paragraph of section 13 of said chapter 494 is hereby
1145 amended by striking out the words “and until December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 9 of said
1146 chapter 26, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and until December 15, 2027.
1147 SECTION 61. Section 15 of said chapter 494 is hereby amended by striking out the
1148 words “and until December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 10 of said chapter 26, and inserting in
1149 place thereof the following words:- and until December 15, 2027.
1150 SECTION 62. The first paragraph of section 9 of chapter 277 of the acts of 1986 is
1151 hereby amended by striking out the words “and until December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 11
1152 of said chapter 26, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and until December 15,
1153 2027.
1154 SECTION 63. The first sentence of the first paragraph of section 3 of chapter 114 of the
1155 acts of 1991 is hereby amended by striking out the words “and until December 15, 2025”,
55 of 146

1156 inserted by section 12 of said chapter 26, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and
1157 until December 15, 2027.
1158 SECTION 64. The last paragraph of said section 3 of said chapter 114 is hereby amended
1159 by striking out the words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 13 of said chapter 26, and
1160 inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
1161 SECTION 65. The first paragraph of section 4 of said chapter 114 is hereby amended by
1162 striking out the words “and until December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 14 of said chapter 26,
1163 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and until December 15, 2027.
1164 SECTION 66. The last paragraph of said section 4 of said chapter 114 is hereby amended
1165 by striking out the words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 15 of said chapter 26, and
1166 inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
1167 SECTION 67. The first paragraph of section 5 of said chapter 114 is hereby amended by
1168 striking out the words “and until December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 16 of said chapter 26,
1169 and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and until December 15, 2027.
1170 SECTION 68. Chapter 301 of the acts of 1998, as most recently amended by chapter 291
1171 of the acts of 2014, is hereby further amended by striking out sections 1 to 36, inclusive, and
1172 inserting in place thereof the following 36 sections:-
1173 Section 1. It is hereby found that the closure of the Naval Air Station hereinafter referred
1174 to as NAS South Weymouth, by the United States Government in September of 1997 is
1175 detrimental to the economic welfare of the citizens of the commonwealth and, in particular, the
1176 towns of Abington and Rockland and the city known as the town of Weymouth. The closure of
56 of 146

1177 this military installation imposes upon the commonwealth and its citizens an increased fiscal
1178 burden in addition to that incurred by the commonwealth on account of the closure of various
1179 other military installations in the commonwealth. It is further found that the full redevelopment
1180 of NAS South Weymouth remains essential for the benefit of the towns of Abington, Rockland
1181 and Weymouth, the region and the commonwealth and, to that end, chapter 291 of the acts of
1182 2014 reconstituted the South Shore Tri-Town Development Corporation, or SSTDC, as the
1183 Southfield Redevelopment Authority, and this act shall reinforce applicable control over land use
1184 and development decisions affecting Abington, Rockland and Weymouth that constitute NAS
1185 South Weymouth and strengthen the alignment of interests between the authority, the towns and
1186 the master developer as defined herein. Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to promote the
1187 expeditious and orderly conversion and redevelopment of NAS South Weymouth for nonmilitary
1188 purposes including, but not limited to, commercial, housing, industrial, institutional, educational,
1189 governmental, recreational, conservation or manufacturing uses in order to prevent blight,
1190 economic dislocation and additional unemployment and to aid and strengthen the local economy,
1191 the regional economy and the economy of the commonwealth. In order to achieve these
1192 objectives, it is deemed necessary and appropriate to continue the structure of SSTDC, as
1193 renamed and reconstituted pursuant to chapter 291 of the acts of 2014, with full powers and
1194 authority to carry out this act.
1195 Section 2. It shall be the goal of this act to promote the expeditious acquisition and
1196 redevelopment of NAS South Weymouth while addressing the economic, social and
1197 environmental needs of the region. Except as otherwise provided in this act, this goal shall be
1198 accomplished in a manner consistent with the zoning by-laws. The redevelopment is designed to
1199 minimize and mitigate negative off-base impacts on the area such as those on water resources, air
57 of 146

1200 quality, traffic and noise, and to limit the impacts to those necessary to achieve community reuse
1201 goals and objectives. The redevelopment shall be integrated with the United States government's
1202 cleanup of hazardous materials on the base to ensure effective, expeditious and efficient
1203 environmental remediation and protection of public health and welfare in accordance with
1204 federal and state law and regulation.
1205 Section 3. There was created by chapter 291 of the acts of 2014 a body politic and
1206 corporate, to be known as the Southfield Redevelopment Authority, to carry out this act. The
1207 authority is deemed to be a public instrumentality and the exercise by the authority of the powers
1208 conferred by this act shall be deemed and held to be the performance of public functions. The
1209 authority shall be included within the definition of a “local government unit or local
1210 governmental unit”, as defined in section 1 of chapter 29C of the General Laws, and its bonds
1211 and notes shall be included within the definition of “local governmental obligations”, as defined
1212 in said section 1 of said chapter 29C. The authority shall be included within the definition of a
1213 “governmental entity” for purposes of owning public infrastructure improvements pursuant to
1214 chapter 293 of the acts of 2006. The authority shall be an “eligible applicant” and a municipality
1215 for the purposes of the General Laws and the authority, the town of Rockland, the town of
1216 Weymouth and the town of Abington shall be eligible for any financial or other assistance from
1217 the Massachusetts School Building Authority and the Massachusetts Department of
1218 Transportation pursuant to chapter 90 of the General Laws.
1219 To achieve its primary purpose of securing the redevelopment of NAS South Weymouth
1220 for the benefit of the towns of Abington, Rockland and Weymouth, the authority shall be guided
1221 in its financing activities with the goal of generating fiscal benefit to the towns stemming from
1222 the redevelopment. The authority, during its existence, and the master developer, giving
58 of 146

1223 consideration to its economic interests, shall pursue the redevelopment of the underutilized land
1224 within NAS South Weymouth in a manner that, in the aggregate, generates revenue for the towns
1225 that exceeds the costs that the towns incur for the provision of those municipal services that the
1226 towns are obligated to provide to NAS South Weymouth pursuant to this act. The authority shall,
1227 to the maximum extent feasible and consistent with the zoning by-laws, dispose of all of the
1228 property within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area through sale or other transfer
1229 prior to the authority's termination as provided in section 33.
1230 Section 4. As used in this act, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
1231 requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
1232 “Abington appointee”, the member of the board appointed by the town of Abington.
1233 “Advisory board”, the advisory board to the authority established in section 11.
1234 “Affordable and workforce housing plan”, the Affordable and Workforce Housing Plan
1235 for NAS South Weymouth, as adopted by South Shore Tri-Town Development Corporation on
1236 January 24, 2011, and as may be amended.
1237 “Affordable and workforce housing regulations”, the NAS South Weymouth Affordable
1238 and Workforce Housing Regulations, as adopted by South Shore Tri-Town Development
1239 Corporation on January 24, 2011, and as may be amended.
1240 “Agency”, the Massachusetts Development Finance Agency, a Massachusetts body
1241 politic and corporate established in section 2 of chapter 23G of the General Laws, which is the
1242 successor-in-interest to the government land bank under chapter 289 of the acts of 1998.
59 of 146

1243 “Authority”, the authority established in section 3 and, as the context requires, the South
1244 Shore Tri-Town Development Corporation created pursuant to chapter 301 of the acts of 1998.
1245 “Base rate”, the ad valorem property tax rate levied by the town in which the subject
1246 property is located.
1247 “Base revenue”, revenue generated through assessment and collection of the base rate.
1248 “Board”, the board of directors of the Southfield Redevelopment Authority established in
1249 section 9.
1250 “Bond termination date”, the latest date on which all amounts outstanding under bonds or
1251 notes issued by the authority pursuant to this act or by the agency pursuant to section 6 of chapter
1252 293 of the acts of 2006, including all obligations of the authority undertaken in connection with
1253 the issuance of such bonds of the agency, have been paid in full, which date shall be no later than
1254 December 31, 2075.
1255 “Chamber appointee”, the member of the board appointed pursuant to clause (vi) of
1256 subsection (a) of section 9.
1257 “Commercial development”, all nonresidential, nonrecreational and noninstitutional land
1258 uses permissible under the zoning by-laws, including retail, general office, medical office and
1259 industrial uses.
1260 “DDA”, the then-current disposition and development agreement entered into between
1261 the authority and the master developer, as defined herein, as the same may be re-negotiated, re-
1262 stated or amended.
60 of 146

1263 “Dissolution and administration agreement”, the dissolution and administration
1264 agreement authorized pursuant to section 33.
1265 “ENA”, the then-current exclusive negotiation agreement entered into between the
1266 authority and the master developer, as defined herein, as the same may be re-negotiated, re-stated
1267 or amended.
1268 “Executive”, the mayor of Weymouth or the boards of selectmen of the towns of
1269 Abington and Rockland, as applicable.
1270 “Infrastructure”, all infrastructure included in the project.
1271 “Labor appointee”, the member of the board appointed pursuant to clause (iv) of
1272 subsection (a) of section 9.
1273 “Major zoning revision”, a “substantial revision” to the zoning by-laws as that term is
1274 defined and used in the zoning by-laws.
1275 “Master developer”, the master developer as designated pursuant to the most current
1276 ENA and finalized under a DDA.
1277 “Minor zoning revision”, any revision to the zoning by-laws that does not constitute a
1278 major zoning revision as defined herein.
1279 “NAS South Weymouth”, the military base formerly known as the Naval Air Station
1280 South Weymouth, which was disestablished in accordance with the recommendation of the 1995
1281 Base Realignment and Closure Commission, pursuant to 10 U.S.C. § 2687, as amended.
61 of 146

1282 “NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area”, the geographic area delineated in the plans
1283 and maps referenced in section 5.
1284 “NAS South Weymouth region”, (i) towns as defined in this act; and (ii) municipalities
1285 contiguous to the towns; and (iii) all municipalities contiguous to the municipalities in subsection
1286 (ii); provided, however, that the NAS South Weymouth region shall not include the city of
1287 Boston.
1288 “New regulations”, the regulations applicable to all projects at the NAS South Weymouth
1289 redevelopment area for which construction commences after the effective date of this act, which
1290 are adopted pursuant to subsection (i) of section 14.
1291 “Parkway”, the east-west parkway connecting Weymouth street in the town of Rockland
1292 to state highway route 18, Main street, in the town of Weymouth.
1293 “Parkway financing MOA”, the Memorandum of Agreement on Financing for the South
1294 Shore Tri-Town Development Corporation’s Parkway entered into as of March 4, 2010 by and
1295 between the commonwealth and South Shore Tri-Town Development Corporation, as amended
1296 by the First Amendment thereto dated June 15, 2010, and as may be further amended.
1297 “Permanent water and wastewater infrastructure”, (i) water supply, treatment and
1298 distribution; and (ii) sewer collection, treatment and disposal capacity for the project that does
1299 not exist as of the effective date of this act and that may be financed, designed, constructed,
1300 operated and maintained by the master developer pursuant to, and to the extent provided in,
1301 section 15.
62 of 146

1302 “Pledged revenue”, property tax revenue subject to the pledge established in that certain
1303 Amended and Restated Trust Indenture dated as of December 1, 2020 between Southfield
1304 Redevelopment Authority and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., as Trustee, and relating to Southfield
1305 Redevelopment Authority Revenue Refunding Bonds, Series 2020A, as the same may be
1306 amended from time to time.
1307 “Prior enabling act”, chapter 291 of the acts of 2014.
1308 “Project”, the acquisition, development, improvement, construction, expansion,
1309 reduction, destruction and renovation of all real and personal property and infrastructure,
1310 buildings, structures, utilities and utility services located on, conducted within or otherwise
1311 directly associated with the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area for all uses that may now
1312 or in the future be contemplated or allowed pursuant to the zoning by-laws, which shall be
1313 owned by the authority, the towns, the commonwealth or any other political subdivision or
1314 public instrumentality of the commonwealth including, but not limited to, all infrastructure for
1315 the provision of gas; cable television; telephone; storm drainage systems; dams; sewage
1316 treatment plants; sewers; water and well systems; roads; highways; bridges; culverts; tunnels;
1317 streets; sidewalks; lighting; parking, including garages; schools; public safety; public works and
1318 administration buildings; parks; cultural and performing arts facilities; recreational facilities;
1319 transportation stations and related facilities; shuttle transportation equipment; fiber and
1320 telecommunication systems; facilities to produce and distribute electricity, including alternate
1321 energy sources such as co-generation and solar installations; the investigation and remediation
1322 associated with the cleanup of actual or perceived environmental contamination in accordance
1323 with applicable governmental regulations; and all other programs, services, systems and other
63 of 146

1324 activities associated therewith, located on, conducted within or otherwise directly associated with
1325 the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area.
1326 “Resident appointees”, the members of the board appointed pursuant to clause (v) of
1327 subsection (a) of section 9.
1328 “Rockland appointees”, the members of the board appointed by the town of Rockland.
1329 “Secretary”, the secretary of administration and finance.
1330 “Series 2020A bonds”, the Southfield Redevelopment Authority Revenue Refunding
1331 Bonds, Series 2020A issued pursuant to the Amended and Restated Trust Indenture dated as of
1332 December 1, 2020 between Southfield Redevelopment Authority and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A.,
1333 as Trustee.
1334 “Southfield rate”, ad valorem property tax rate levied within NAS South Weymouth
1335 pursuant to section 19, in excess of the base rate and at only that level necessary to fund the
1336 operations of the authority as determined by the board pursuant to said section 19, subject to the
1337 approval of the department of revenue.
1338 “Southfield revenue”, revenue generated in a single tax year through the assessment and
1339 collection of the Southfield rate.
1340 “Taxation plan”, the plan established pursuant to section 19.
1341 “Town appointees”, the Abington, Rockland and Weymouth appointees, collectively.
1342 “Towns”, the towns of Abington and Rockland and the city known as the town of
1343 Weymouth.
64 of 146

1344 “Trust Indenture”, the trust indenture referred to in the definition of “pledged revenue”.
1345 “Weymouth appointees”, the members of the board appointed by the town of Weymouth.
1346 “Zoning by-laws”, the “zoning and land use by-laws for NAS South Weymouth,” in the
1347 form approved by: (i) unanimous vote of the Weymouth Town Council on June 26, 2023; (ii) a
1348 two-thirds majority vote at Abington Special Town Meeting on October 14, 2023 and: (iii) a
1349 two-thirds majority vote at Rockland Special Town Meeting on November 7, 2023, and as they
1350 may be amended.
1351 “Zoning map”, the zoning district map referenced in section 4.3 of the zoning by-laws, in
1352 the form approved by: (i) unanimous vote of the Weymouth Town Council on June 26, 2023; (ii)
1353 a two-thirds majority vote at Abington Special Town Meeting on October 14, 2023 and; (iii) a
1354 two-thirds majority vote at Rockland Special Town Meeting on November 7, 2023, and as they
1355 may be amended.
1356 Section 5. The NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area shall be comprised of the
1357 lands, including all easements, reservations and rights appurtenant thereto, and all buildings,
1358 structures, utilities and improvements located thereon, comprised of the former military base of
1359 that name presently located in the towns of Abington, Rockland and Weymouth and now or
1360 formerly within the ownership, control and jurisdiction of the United States, including, without
1361 limitation, those portions of the base property that have been transferred as of the effective date
1362 of this act to the United States Coast Guard, Federal Aviation Administration or the authority.
1363 Plans and descriptions detailing the precise boundaries and configuration of the NAS South
1364 Weymouth redevelopment area were filed with the secretary and recorded in the Plymouth
65 of 146

1365 registry of deeds as plan number 760 in plan book 42 and the Norfolk registry of deeds as plan
1366 number 525 in plan book 467.
1367 Section 6. Except as otherwise provided in, directed by or limited by this act, the
1368 authority shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes and
1369 provisions of this act, including the power to:
1370 (a) exercise the rights provided to municipal governments and agencies under federal
1371 laws and regulations and under the constitution, laws and regulations of the commonwealth
1372 subject to section 31 of chapter 44 of the General Laws;
1373 (b) sue and be sued in all courts and to initiate or participate in actions and proceedings,
1374 whether judicial, administrative, arbitrative or otherwise;
1375 (c) adopt a seal and alter such seal at its pleasure and use it by causing it or a facsimile to
1376 be affixed or impressed or reproduced in any manner;
1377 (d) own, acquire, manage, maintain, modify, operate, convey or lease infrastructure
1378 improvements or any facilities for the project, including the infrastructure for the distribution of
1379 public utilities, including, but not limited to, electricity, gas, water, waste water and sewer and
1380 sewage treatment and disposal, refuse collection and disposal, telecommunications and cable
1381 services and the transportation infrastructure, including, but not limited to, the parkway;
1382 (e) develop, own, manage, operate, regulate or lease wells to procure water from
1383 productive aquifers underlying the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area in accordance
1384 with sections 38 and 39A of chapter 40 of the General Laws and determine and collect or
1385 authorize the collection on its behalf of assessments and other charges related to constructing and
66 of 146

1386 maintaining such systems, as provided in said chapter 40; provided, however, that the
1387 procurement of such water shall not materially adversely affect the supply of water available to a
1388 town;
1389 (f) own, manage, operate, regulate, convey or lease facilities of common sewers and main
1390 drains and facilities for wastewater and sewage treatment and disposal and determine and collect
1391 or authorize the collection on its behalf, or on behalf of the master developer, of assessments and
1392 other charges related to financing, laying out, constructing, operating and maintaining such
1393 systems, as provided in this act and pursuant to chapter 83 of the General Laws;
1394 (g) own, manage, operate, regulate or lease surface water reservoirs within the NAS
1395 South Weymouth redevelopment area or connect to or otherwise purchase or lease water from
1396 the water system of a town, any other municipality or any other governmental or quasi-
1397 governmental agency or any other public or private entity, including, without limitation, the
1398 Massachusetts water resource authority, for the provision of water within the NAS South
1399 Weymouth region, and manage, operate, regulate, convey or lease any and all systems for the
1400 delivery of such water within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area; provided,
1401 however, that the procurement of such water shall not materially adversely affect the supply of
1402 water available to any of the towns;
1403 (h) exercise the power of eminent domain within the NAS South Weymouth
1404 redevelopment area as provided in chapters 79, 79A, 80 and 80A of the General Laws;
1405 (i) appoint, prescribe the qualifications and fix the compensation of employees and pay
1406 the same out of funds of the authority;
1407 (j) appoint legal counsel and fix compensation for such services rendered to the authority;
67 of 146

1408 (k) appoint qualified boards, commissions, committees or subcommittees, including those
1409 responsible for zoning, subdivision and other land use or permitting approvals whose members
1410 need not be directors of the board, and individuals, in addition to the advisory board established
1411 pursuant to section 11, to serve as unpaid advisors under such terms and conditions as it may
1412 deem necessary; provided, however, that such boards, commissions, committees, subcommittees
1413 and individuals may be reimbursed for incidental expenses determined by the authority to be
1414 necessary and incurred while performing the business of the authority;
1415 (l) acquire, hold and dispose of personal property within the NAS South Weymouth
1416 redevelopment area for its corporate purposes;
1417 (m) acquire easements and other interests in land directly associated with the NAS South
1418 Weymouth redevelopment area in connection with the project;
1419 (n) purchase, receive, take by grant, gift, devise, bequest, lease, or otherwise acquire,
1420 own, hold, improve, employ, use or otherwise manage real and personal property or any interest
1421 therein, whether tangible or intangible, for its purposes, located within the NAS South
1422 Weymouth redevelopment area, except for any federally-owned property of the former NAS
1423 South Weymouth which shall be or has been transferred to the United States Coast Guard and
1424 Federal Aviation Administration; provided, however, that when any of the excepted property is
1425 declared to be surplus to the needs of the United States government, the authority may obtain any
1426 and all like interest in the property as described herein;
1427 (o) sell, convey, lease, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of all or any of its real or
1428 personal property or any interest therein, using procedures adopted by the authority;
68 of 146

1429 (p) apply for and, for the purposes of this act, accept gifts, loans, grants of property,
1430 funds, money, materials, labor, supplies or services from a person or from the United States
1431 government or its departments or agencies or from an agency of the commonwealth or a political
1432 subdivision thereof, or make agreements with respect to any such gifts, loans or grants, and to do
1433 any and all things necessary, useful, desirable or convenient in connection with procuring,
1434 accepting or disposing of such gifts, loans or grants;
1435 (q) purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, hold, make a tender offer
1436 for, vote, employ, sell, lend, lease, exchange, transfer or otherwise dispose of, mortgage, pledge
1437 or grant a security interest in, use or otherwise deal in and with, bonds and other obligations,
1438 shares or other securities or interests therein issued by others, whether engaged in a similar or
1439 different business or activity;
1440 (r) make and execute agreements, contracts, project labor agreements and other
1441 instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of the authority
1442 under this act, including contracts with a person, firm, corporation, municipality, commonwealth
1443 agency, governmental unit or other entity, foreign or domestic;
1444 (s) assess and collect taxes, assessments, special assessments, betterments and fees within
1445 the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area under the General Laws and the powers granted
1446 by this act, in order to generate revenues to pay the cost of operations of the authority, amounts
1447 due on outstanding indebtedness of the authority, maintenance of the property, environmental
1448 remediation and monitoring of the property and the maintenance of the project, infrastructure
1449 improvements within or associated with the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area in
1450 accordance with this act, the General Laws, and zoning by-laws, including the funding
69 of 146

1451 provisions thereof and for all other purposes for which cities and towns may assess and collect
1452 such taxes, assessments, special assessments, betterments and fees, and distribute revenues in
1453 accordance with section 19. In connection with the foregoing, the authority shall have all the
1454 powers and authority of cities and towns under chapters 59, 60, 60A, 61B and section 3A of
1455 chapter 64G of the General Laws, and any powers that require adoption by cities and towns if
1456 adopted by the authority;
1457 (t) administer land use, subdivision, zoning and wetland protection controls and
1458 associated permitting, approval and entitlement activities within the NAS South Weymouth
1459 redevelopment area, and to enter into agreements with the towns whereby any such activities
1460 which the authority may determine shall be more effectively administered by a town shall be
1461 within such town’s administration, subject to such town’s agreement to enter into such
1462 agreement(s); provided, further, that any town’s administration of such activities pursuant to any
1463 such agreement(s) shall be consistent with any expedited permitting standards or requirements
1464 then-applicable to the authority’s conduct of such activities. Except as otherwise expressly
1465 provided in the zoning by-laws: (i) in the administration of the activities authorized under this
1466 section in the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area, the authority may take action and
1467 issue permits, approvals, orders of conditions, and other land-use entitlements in accordance with
1468 the procedures and standards from time to time applicable to municipalities and their boards,
1469 commissions and agencies so authorized to take such action or to issue any such permit, order of
1470 conditions, approval or other entitlement under the General Laws; provided, however, that the
1471 regulations developed and adopted by the authority under section 14 may provide for expedited
1472 permitting under which the time frames for action applicable to municipalities and their boards,
1473 commissions and agencies under the provisions of the General Laws are shortened; and (ii) all
70 of 146

1474 such actions, including a failure to take action, and such permits, approvals, orders of conditions
1475 or other land-use entitlements shall have the legal effect and duration as provided in the General
1476 Laws, except for any shortened time frames expressly provided in such regulations. Upon
1477 termination of the authority under section 33, the authority to administer such activities shall be
1478 vested in the towns in accordance with the dissolution and administration agreement and the
1479 General Laws, but no permit, approval, or other entitlement issued by the authority prior thereto
1480 pursuant to this act or pursuant to the prior enabling act or any activity undertaken or
1481 improvement made in accordance therewith shall be affected thereby. As further provided in
1482 subsection (i) of section 14, administration of the following municipal powers pursuant to the
1483 General Laws that do not involve the administration by the authority of such land use,
1484 subdivision, zoning and wetland controls and related entitlement activities shall remain with the
1485 towns in which the applicable real property is located unless expressly granted to said authority
1486 in this act or elsewhere: issuance of building permits by the inspectional services department;
1487 public-health and safety-related matters under the jurisdiction of the local board of health; and
1488 issuance of liquor licenses. For the portions of the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area
1489 located within each of the towns, the respective town shall be responsible for providing all
1490 services, including police and fire protection, normally and customarily provided by a
1491 municipality within their jurisdiction. In the event that a town does not provide a service it is
1492 required to provide in accordance with this subsection, the authority may provide such service
1493 and charge the town for the cost of providing such a service. With respect to any utilities or
1494 services provided as of the effective date of this act or to be provided in the future within the
1495 NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area by the authority or the towns: (i) an intermunicipal
1496 agreement shall not be required in any circumstance, even to the extent that the provision of such
71 of 146

1497 utilities or services crosses town boundaries, and (ii) the authority or any of the towns shall be
1498 permitted to provide utilities or services to land located outside of a particular town’s boundaries
1499 without entering into any additional agreement;
1500 (u) develop, adopt, amend, implement and enforce by-laws and regulations for the
1501 general administration of the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area pursuant to sections 21
1502 to 33, inclusive, of chapter 40 of the General Laws or as otherwise permitted by law, including
1503 the new regulations;
1504 (v) borrow money at such rate or rates of interest as the authority may determine; issue its
1505 notes, bonds or other obligations to evidence such indebtedness, and secure any of its obligations
1506 by pledging any of its assessments, betterment fees, rents, fees or other revenues or by mortgage
1507 or pledge of all or any of its property, or any interest therein, tangible or intangible, whether then
1508 owned or thereafter acquired, as provided in this act and exercise all other rights and powers of
1509 cities and towns under chapter 44 of the General Laws; provided, however, that said chapter 44
1510 shall not be applicable to the manner of voting or the limitations as to the amount and time of
1511 payment or other details of debts incurred by the authority and, in the event of a conflict between
1512 the provisions of this act and said chapter 44, the provisions of this act shall apply;
1513 (w) arrange for guaranties of its notes, bonds or other obligations by the federal
1514 government, the commonwealth, the towns or by any private insurer or otherwise, and to pay any
1515 premiums therefor;
1516 (x) issue such short and long term notes, bonds or other obligations, whether or not the
1517 interest to the holders is exempt from taxation;
72 of 146

1518 (y) purchase notes, bonds or other obligations of the authority at such price or prices, in
1519 such manner, and upon such terms, as the authority may determine;
1520 (z) invest and reinvest its funds in such investments as may be lawful for fiduciaries in
1521 the commonwealth, and take and hold property as security for the payment of funds so invested,
1522 as provided in section 55 of chapter 44 of the General Laws;
1523 (aa) procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property or the project in
1524 such amounts and from such insurers, including the federal government, and directors and
1525 officers liability insurance, as it may deem necessary or desirable, and to pay any premiums
1526 therefor;
1527 (bb) enter into and perform contracts, project labor agreements, and other agreements,
1528 whether or not they may be deemed to constitute indebtedness under applicable law, for the joint
1529 or separate planning, financing, construction, purchase, operation, maintenance, use, sharing
1530 costs of, ownership, mortgaging, leasing, sale, disposal of, or other participation in facilities,
1531 products or services of any person who engages in business on property owned or controlled by
1532 the authority;
1533 (cc) maintain a principal office within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area;
1534 (dd) make any inquiry, investigation, survey, feasibility study or other study which the
1535 authority may deem necessary or advisable to enable it to carry out effectively this act;
1536 (ee) apply to the appropriate agencies and officials of the federal government and the
1537 commonwealth for licenses, permits or approvals, as are ordinarily applied for by cities and
1538 towns, of its plans or the project as it may deem necessary or advisable, and to accept such
73 of 146

1539 licenses, permits or approvals as may be tendered to it by such agencies or officials, upon such
1540 terms and conditions as it may deem appropriate;
1541 (ff) make by-laws and establish committees for the management and regulation of its
1542 affairs as it may deem necessary or advisable and, subject to agreement with bondholders, make
1543 rules pursuant to its own procedures for the use of the project and its property, and establish and
1544 collect assessments, rentals, fees and all other charges for the use of the project under the
1545 jurisdiction of the authority and for services or commodities sold, furnished or supplied by the
1546 authority;
1547 (gg) contract for the environmental remediation, construction, operation or maintenance
1548 of any part of the project, or for services to be performed thereon, and rent parts thereof and
1549 grant concessions thereon, on such terms and conditions as the authority may determine;
1550 provided, however, that any such transaction shall be exempt from the public bidding and
1551 procurement requirements applicable to bodies politic and corporate of the commonwealth
1552 imposed by general or special law, including without limitation, the requirements of chapters 7,
1553 30 and chapter 149 of the General Laws, but excluding sections 28 and 29 of said chapter 149,
1554 and regulations promulgated thereunder so long as the authority has, pursuant to an affirmative
1555 vote and by stating the public convenience and necessity therefor, exempted any such transaction
1556 from such requirement;
1557 (hh) designate the depositories of its money within the commonwealth;
1558 (ii) establish its fiscal year to commence on July 1 and end on June 30 of each year and
1559 change the fiscal year from time to time as the authority may deem necessary and appropriate;
74 of 146

1560 (jj) take such other actions and exercise such other powers as it may deem necessary,
1561 advisable and convenient in the furtherance of the purposes of this act;
1562 (kk) apply for and be eligible for any and all available financial and other assistance
1563 without further approval of any agency of the commonwealth or any other enabling authority
1564 pursuant to any current or future economic development districts or special designations that are
1565 intended to attract new growth, enhance infrastructure investment or incentives, or provide other
1566 economic development benefit to priority areas of the commonwealth; provided however, that
1567 the authority shall meet the same basic eligibility requirements as a municipality or entity
1568 applying for any such financial and other assistance;
1569 (ll) maintain, regulate, and otherwise own, manage and operate any street, public way or
1570 public use of a private way within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area, including any
1571 sewers, drains, sidewalks and other utilities and infrastructure located in any streets and ways,
1572 until such time any such street, public way, or public use of a private way is transferred to a
1573 town, the master developer, or other third party pursuant to this act or pursuant to land
1574 disposition agreements entered into between the authority, the United States Navy, or the master
1575 developer; and
1576 (mm) assume responsibility for maintaining, monitoring and conducting other activities
1577 imposed by any condition of any license, permit or approval, or by any institutional control
1578 arising under any environmental law or regulation with respect to the project.
1579 Section 7. The authority shall not be obligated to maintain, operate, improve or provide
1580 services, including police and fire protection, for those portions of the NAS South Weymouth
1581 which remain in federal ownership, nor shall the authority bear any responsibility or be liable for
75 of 146

1582 any injury, damage or loss arising out of or in connection with any activities which may occur on
1583 such federal property, nor as a result of any improvements, damage, deterioration or
1584 environmental hazards occurring thereon.
1585 Section 8. In addition to any other duties set forth in this act, the authority shall
1586 coordinate with, and provide information to, the United States and any officials or employees
1587 thereof, regarding any matter relating to the ownership, condition, closure, conversion,
1588 redevelopment or future use or operations of the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area as
1589 required by the Defense Base Realignment and Closure Act. Notwithstanding any other
1590 provision of law, the authority shall be the only person or entity in the commonwealth authorized
1591 to negotiate, purchase or otherwise obtain on behalf of itself, the commonwealth or any of its
1592 political subdivisions, any fee ownership, easement, lease, license or other interest in any
1593 property in or on the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area from the United States, except
1594 that a governmental entity of the commonwealth may acquire an interest from the authority to
1595 such property, if such acquisition and use of the property by a governmental entity of the
1596 commonwealth is consistent with the zoning by-laws.
1597 Section 9. (a) The powers and management of the authority, which include all rights and
1598 powers of a town council or board of selectmen or mayor of a city or town except as otherwise
1599 provided in, directed by, or limited by this act, shall be vested in a board of 9 directors to be
1600 appointed as follows: (i) 1 member appointed by the board of selectmen of the town of Abington;
1601 (ii) 2 members appointed by the board of selectmen of the town of Rockland; (iii) 2 members
1602 appointed by the mayor of the town of Weymouth; (iv) 1 member, who is an experienced labor
1603 representative and selected by the president of the Norfolk County Labor Council; (v) 2
1604 members, each of whom shall have legal residency at NAS South Weymouth, 1 of whom shall
76 of 146

1605 be appointed by the Southfield Neighborhood Association and 1 of whom shall be appointed
1606 jointly by the mayor of the town of Weymouth and board of selectmen of Rockland from 4
1607 candidates nominated by the Southfield Neighborhood Association, provided, however, that if
1608 such mayor and board have not jointly appointed a candidate within 14 days of becoming
1609 eligible to make such appointment, the board of the authority shall appoint this member by an
1610 affirmative vote of at least 5 members from the 4 candidates nominated under this clause; and
1611 (vi) 1 member, who shall be a member of the board of the South Shore Chamber of Commerce,
1612 selected by said chamber. The board shall appoint a chairman from among its members who
1613 shall serve in that capacity at the pleasure of the board.
1614 (b) The terms of all 9 members serving on the board, as constituted on the date hereof,
1615 shall expire 3 years following the date of appointment.
1616 Any town appointee may also be removed from the board by the executive of the town
1617 from which he or she was appointed for reasons deemed by such executive to be sufficient and
1618 proper. The resident appointee appointed by the Southfield Neighborhood Association may be
1619 removed from the board by the Southfield Neighborhood Association. The other resident
1620 appointee may be removed from the board by a vote of the executive authority of town of
1621 Weymouth and Rockland for reasons deemed to be sufficient and proper; provided, however,
1622 that if the appointee is appointed by the board of the authority, the appointee may only be
1623 removed by a majority vote of the board of the authority.
1624 The labor representative or chamber representative may be removed by a vote of the
1625 executive authority of at least 2 of the towns. All board members shall be eligible for
1626 reappointment to additional terms at the expiration of their current terms. Vacancies shall be
77 of 146

1627 filled, as applicable, by the respective appointing authority for each such vacancy.
1628 Notwithstanding anything to the contrary, to the extent that any board member’s term expires, a
1629 renewal is not affirmatively enacted and a replacement is not immediately identified, the existing
1630 board member shall remain on the board until the vacancy is filled.
1631 (c) The town appointees shall have demonstrated expertise and education and experience
1632 in 1 or more of the following areas: real estate development, housing, finance, planning, or
1633 engineering. The towns shall cooperate to assure the appointment of directors from as many of
1634 the foregoing disciplines as possible. The chamber and labor appointees shall have demonstrated
1635 expertise in large-scale real estate development and demonstrated expertise in 1 or more of the
1636 following areas: housing, finance, business, planning, environment, transportation or municipal
1637 government.
1638 (d) Five members of the board shall constitute a quorum. The board may act only when a
1639 quorum is present, and then only by a majority of those actually voting, which must in all events
1640 include at least 4 affirmative votes.
1641 (e) Directors may receive compensation as determined from time to time by the advisory
1642 board established by section 11. Directors shall receive reimbursement of such incidental
1643 expenses determined by the board to be necessary; provided, however, that the annual
1644 compensation of the directors shall not exceed $6,250 or 80 per cent of the total combined
1645 average of the annual salaries of the town councilors of the town of Weymouth, whichever is
1646 higher.
1647 (f) Directors shall be residents of the commonwealth. No director or employee of the
1648 authority shall be a local elected public official of the town of Abington, Rockland or
78 of 146

1649 Weymouth, except that residents of the towns of Abington and Rockland who participate in their
1650 respective town meetings shall not be restricted from service as a director or employee of the
1651 authority. Each resident appointee shall maintain a legal residence within NAS South
1652 Weymouth, and each town appointee shall maintain a legal residence in his or her appointing
1653 town, at all times during his or her respective term on the board. Any resident or town appointee
1654 who fails to maintain his or her legal residence as required shall be automatically disqualified
1655 from further service on the board without need for further action by the board or the relevant
1656 appointing authority.
1657 (g) Public employees or appointed officials of the federal government and the
1658 commonwealth and its political subdivisions may serve as directors of the authority so long as
1659 their service as director does not constitute a conflict of interest with their duties as public
1660 employees or appointed officials.
1661 (h) Directors shall be subject to chapter 268A of the General Laws.
1662 (i) The directors may, from time to time, by majority vote designate employees of the
1663 authority, consultants and other individuals to participate on boards, commissions, committees
1664 and other organizations established by the authority or otherwise related to the project as a
1665 representative of the directors.
1666 (j) The directors may, from time to time, by majority vote, authorize a person, other than
1667 a majority of the board, to issue endorsements, certificates and other ministerial documents in
1668 furtherance of actions taken by the board.
79 of 146

1669 (k) The officers and directors of the authority shall have the full protections afforded by
1670 section 13 of chapter 258 of the General Laws to the same extent as municipal officers in a city
1671 or town which has accepted said section 13 of said chapter 258.
1672 (l) Sections 18 to 25, inclusive, of chapter 30A of the General Laws shall apply to the
1673 authority.
1674 Section 10. If a director, or member of his immediate family shall be interested either
1675 directly or indirectly, or shall be a director, officer or employee of or have an ownership interest
1676 in a firm or authority interested directly or indirectly, in a contract or other matter involving the
1677 authority, such interest shall be disclosed to the board and shall be set forth in the minutes of the
1678 board. The member having such interest shall not participate on behalf of the authority in any
1679 proceeding or decision relating to such contract or matter. For the purpose of this section,
1680 immediate family shall include spouse, parent, parent-in-law, brother, brother-in-law, sister,
1681 sister-in-law, son, son-in-law, daughter, daughter-in-law and the parent or child of any of such
1682 individuals.
1683 Notwithstanding the foregoing, or the provisions of chapter 268A of the General Laws,
1684 an interest of a resident appointee or of a member of the immediate family of a resident
1685 appointee arising solely on account of the appointee’s or immediate family member’s residing at
1686 NAS South Weymouth shall not be disqualifying and shall not be deemed an impermissible
1687 conflict of interest.
1688 Section 11. (a) There shall be an advisory board to the authority consisting of: (i) 1 voting
1689 representative appointed by the town of Abington and 1 voting representative appointed by the
1690 town of Hingham; (ii) 2 voting representatives appointed by the town of Rockland and 2 voting
80 of 146

1691 representatives appointed by the mayor of Weymouth; (iii) 1 voting representative of the
1692 Metropolitan Area Planning Council who shall be a member of and be designated by the board of
1693 the council and who shall reside in Norfolk county; (iv) 1 voting representative of the Old
1694 Colony Planning Council who shall be a member of and be designated by the board of the
1695 council and who shall reside in Plymouth county; and (v) 3 voting representatives to be
1696 appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be the secretary or a designee, 1 of whom shall be
1697 the secretary of housing and economic development or a designee and 1 of whom shall have
1698 demonstrated skill and expertise in matters relating to real estate development. The members of
1699 the advisory board representing a town shall be appointed by, and serve at the pleasure of, the
1700 mayor of the town of Weymouth or board of selectmen of each such other town. The members of
1701 the advisory board appointed by the Metropolitan Area Planning Council and the Old Colony
1702 Planning Council shall serve at the pleasure of the councils. The members of the advisory board
1703 appointed by the governor shall serve at the pleasure of the governor.
1704 (b) The total voting membership of the advisory board shall be 11 votes, equally
1705 weighted. The advisory board may act at regular periodic meetings called in accordance with its
1706 by-laws or at a special meeting called by the authority or by a quorum of the advisory board. A
1707 quorum of the advisory board shall consist of a majority of its representatives, but in no event
1708 shall it be less than 4 representatives. The advisory board may act by the affirmative vote of a
1709 majority of the representatives present that constitute a quorum.
1710 (c) For the conduct of its business the advisory board shall adopt and may revise and
1711 amend its own by-laws. The advisory board shall elect from among its members a chairperson, a
1712 vice chairperson and a secretary and such other officers as the advisory board may determine.
1713 Each such officer shall serve in such capacity at the pleasure of the advisory board and may be
81 of 146

1714 removed from such position by majority vote of the advisory board. In the event of a vacancy,
1715 the appointing authority shall fill the vacancy for the unexpired term. Each member of the
1716 advisory board shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for all reasonable
1717 expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties as approved by the advisory board and
1718 the authority.
1719 (d) The purposes of the advisory board shall be as follows: (i) to review the annual report
1720 of the authority and to prepare comments thereon for the benefit of the authority, the governor
1721 and the towns, and to make such examinations of the reports on the authority's records and
1722 affairs as the advisory board deems appropriate; (ii) to hold meetings with the board of directors
1723 of the authority and, at the discretion of the advisory board and with the concurrence of the board
1724 of directors of the authority, special meetings with the board of directors of the authority as it
1725 deems necessary and appropriate on matters relating to the authority, and to hold meetings at
1726 other times as the advisory board may determine; (iii) to make recommendations to the authority
1727 on any budget; (iv) to make recommendations to the governor, the general court and the towns
1728 regarding the authority, its programs, and the project; and (v) to determine, from time to time,
1729 compensation for the directors pursuant to section 9.
1730 (e) The authority shall provide such reasonable administrative and staff support to the
1731 advisory board as may be necessary for the efficient discharge of the advisory board's
1732 responsibilities pursuant to this act.
1733 (f) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 268A of the General Laws, an interest of an
1734 advisory board member or of a member of the immediate family of an advisory board member
1735 arising solely on account of the member’s or immediate family member’s residing at NAS South
82 of 146

1736 Weymouth shall not be disqualifying and shall not be deemed an impermissible conflict of
1737 interest.
1738 Section 12. The board may from time to time hire employees and engage outside vendors
1739 or consultants, or both, as necessary to achieve the orderly functioning of the authority.
1740 Employees of the authority shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 30 or section 45, 46,
1741 51 or 52 of chapter 31 of the General Laws. Employees of the authority shall be subject to the
1742 provisions of chapter 268A of the General Laws. Compensation for employees of the authority
1743 shall be set by the board.
1744 Section 13. The board may hire, fix and pay compensation, prescribe duties and
1745 qualifications and establish personnel policies without regard to any personnel or civil service
1746 law or personnel or civil service rule of the commonwealth. The employees of the authority shall
1747 not be classified employees of the commonwealth. An individual employed by the authority shall
1748 be deemed an employee at will and shall serve at the pleasure of the authority.
1749 Section 14. (a) The zoning by-laws shall remain in effect, subject to their modification
1750 pursuant to the procedures set forth in this section. Such zoning by-laws, as they may be
1751 modified in accordance with this section from time to time, shall supersede the zoning by-laws of
1752 the towns with respect to land in the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area.
1753 (b) Consistent with current and prior planning for NAS South Weymouth, NAS South
1754 Weymouth shall be developed in accordance with the following principles:
1755 (1) notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this act or any other general or
1756 special law or bylaw or regulation of the authority, or in any existing agreement between the
1757 master developer and the authority or any other entity, of the residential units at NAS South
83 of 146

1758 Weymouth, a minimum of 10 per cent shall meet the requirements of “affordable” housing or
1759 “workforce” housing, as such terms are defined in the affordable and workforce housing plan
1760 and the affordable and workforce housing regulations or the new regulations, as applicable.
1761 Affordable or workforce housing constructed within NAS South Weymouth prior to the effective
1762 date of this act shall be counted towards the aggregate 10 per cent minimum requirement;
1763 (2) further development at NAS South Weymouth should be planned and built-out to
1764 incorporate smart growth principles to the extent feasible with a mix of housing and commercial
1765 development, and transportation choices. Whenever feasible, uses at the project should be
1766 designed to be located within walking distance of each other, or even in the same building.
1767 Sustainable and environmentally-friendly development should also be integrated into the project
1768 with water conservation and building designs that comply with generally accepted “green”
1769 design standards. The project should incorporate green building technologies into aspects of its
1770 infrastructure design, construction and operation, and promote the use of green building
1771 technologies by its vertical residential and commercial builders as well;
1772 (3) passive and active recreational facilities shall be included in the further development
1773 of NAS South Weymouth, with such facilities to include but not be limited to the existing
1774 recreation complex, bicycle and walking paths, picnic areas and nature trails; provided, however,
1775 that notwithstanding the generality of the preceding sentence, the master developer shall not be
1776 required to construct or operate a golf course; and
1777 (4) the master developer shall submit to the authority no later than 2 months after the
1778 approval of same by the Natural Heritage and Endangered Species Program an open space
1779 preservation plan, which shall include a plan for addressing all existing runways, taxiways,
84 of 146

1780 traffic control towers and other infrastructure located on any land zoned open space as of the
1781 effective date of this act. In connection with existing and proposed development at NAS South
1782 Weymouth, the project will provide a significant open space area subject to restrictions for the
1783 ongoing protection of habitat and rare species. The following existing restrictions are on record
1784 affecting land within NAS South Weymouth: (i) First Amended and Restated Grant of
1785 Restriction, East End Parcels Restriction, dated October 22, 2013, by LNR South Shore, LLC as
1786 declarant thereunder and (ii) Second Amended and Restated Grant of Restriction, Golf Course
1787 Parcels Restriction, dated February 26, 2014, by LNR South Shore, LLC as declarant thereunder;
1788 items (i) and (ii) collectively referred to herein as the “restrictions”. Notwithstanding any general
1789 or special law to the contrary, any modifications to the restrictions in connection with the
1790 reconfiguration of the proposed protected open space at NAS South Weymouth, including
1791 modifications that release certain land from the restrictions, is allowed and shall not be subject to
1792 any requirement of section 5A of chapter 3 of the General Laws, provided that the
1793 reconfiguration of such open space is consistent with any then-current conservation and
1794 management permit issued by the National Heritage and Endangered Species Program, or its
1795 successor, for the project within NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area.
1796 (c) Major zoning revisions shall not be effective until such revisions are approved by: (i)
1797 the town in which the land that is the subject of such revision is located; and (ii) the board. No
1798 town shall consider a major zoning revision except at the initiative of the applicable town
1799 executive, the master developer, the town’s planning board, the town council in the case of
1800 Weymouth or a person owning land to be affected by the revision. In addition to the
1801 requirements of chapter 40A of the General Laws, upon the filing of any application for major
1802 zoning revision to the town council in Weymouth or town meetings in Abington or Rockland, the
85 of 146

1803 town council or respective town meetings shall give notice of such filing to the authority,
1804 whereupon the authority shall publish a notice of a public hearing in a newspaper or general
1805 circulation within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area, and hold at least 1 public
1806 hearing in the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area or in any 1 of the towns at which the
1807 public shall be afforded the opportunity to comment on the proposed revision. Within 90 days of
1808 receipt of a petition for a proposed major zoning revision, the receiving town shall convene a
1809 meeting of the town council in Weymouth or a town meeting if in Rockland or Abington for the
1810 purpose of adopting the proposed major zoning revision. The towns shall notify the authority of
1811 any major zoning revisions they may adopt, such notice to be provided within 30 days of
1812 obtaining the attorney general’s approval of such revision if required pursuant to section 32 of
1813 chapter 40 of the General Laws. All other provisions of chapter 40A of the General Laws shall
1814 apply, except that the towns may reconsider a proposed major zoning revision pursuant to this
1815 act within 6 months of an unfavorable action notwithstanding anything to the contrary in section
1816 5 of said chapter 40A. Pursuant to 53G of chapter 44 of the General Laws, a town may request,
1817 and the master developer may elect to provide, reimbursement for legal fees incurred by the town
1818 in connection with the passage of this act.
1819 (d) The board shall have the authority to make minor zoning revisions as described in the
1820 zoning by-laws. In addition, the board shall within 90 days of the adoption of this act, make all
1821 revisions, if any, to the zoning by-laws necessary to make the zoning by-laws conform to this
1822 act. The authority shall be responsible for maintaining a codification of the zoning by-law that
1823 reflects all major zoning revisions adopted by the various towns and all minor zoning revisions
1824 adopted by the board, and all revisions to the zoning map made pursuant to subsection (e).
86 of 146

1825 (e) Revisions to the zoning map shall be made in accordance with the terms of the zoning
1826 by-laws.
1827 (f) Revisions to the zoning by-laws pursuant to subsection (d) shall be by majority vote of
1828 the board. Prior to approving any minor zoning revision pursuant to said subsection (d), the
1829 authority shall formally notify the Towns, shall publish a notice of public hearing in newspapers
1830 of general circulation within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area, shall hold at least 1
1831 public hearing in the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area or in any 1 of the towns at
1832 which the proposed revision to the zoning by-laws not considered substantial shall be considered
1833 and voted upon, and shall afford the opportunity for public comment at such public hearing. The
1834 administrative provisions of the zoning by-laws or of any other regulation promulgated by the
1835 authority may provide for expedited permitting under which the time frames for actions,
1836 including a failure to take action, applicable to municipalities and their boards, commissions and
1837 agencies under the provisions of the General Laws may be shortened. Nothing in this section
1838 shall require the authority to be governed by the requirements of chapter 30A of the General
1839 Laws.
1840 (g) The procedures set forth in this section for adopting revisions to the zoning by-laws
1841 shall be exclusive notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary.
1842 (h) Regulations for the effective implementation and enforcement of the zoning by-laws
1843 and revisions thereof shall be developed and adopted by the authority, pursuant to section 6. No
1844 regulation shall be adopted by the authority without first publishing notice of same in a
1845 newspaper of general circulation within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area, holding
1846 at least one public meeting in the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area or in any one of the
87 of 146

1847 towns, and affording the opportunity for public comment. Nothing in this section shall require
1848 the authority to be governed by the requirements of chapter 30A of the General Laws.
1849 (i)(1) As authorized in subsection (t) of section 6, the authority shall have exclusive
1850 authority to issue and enforce land use, subdivision and zoning permits, approvals, orders of
1851 conditions and other entitlements pursuant to the zoning by-law, regulations promulgated
1852 pursuant to subsection (h), subdivision regulations, and wetland protection laws in effect within
1853 the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area. Such authority shall include the exclusive
1854 jurisdiction to sit as a permit granting authority pursuant to section 15 of chapter 40A of the
1855 General Laws. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this act or any other
1856 general or special law or bylaw or regulation of the authority, or in any existing agreement
1857 between the master developer or the authority or any other entity, or any combination of the
1858 foregoing parties, for the purposes of all projects at the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment
1859 area for which construction commences after the effective date of this act, there shall be a new
1860 set of regulations developed by the authority governing development, including, without
1861 limitation, regarding affordable and workforce housing, and land use, zoning, subdivision and
1862 wetlands administration, in each case, in place of any existing regulations in place.
1863 Administration of the following municipal powers pursuant to the General Laws that do not
1864 involve the administration by the authority of such land use, subdivision, zoning and wetland
1865 controls and related entitlement activities shall remain with the towns in which the applicable
1866 real property is located unless expressly granted to said authority in this act or elsewhere: (i)
1867 issuance of building permits by the inspectional services department; (ii) public-health and
1868 safety-related matters under the jurisdiction of the local board of health; and (iii) issuance of
1869 liquor licenses. If any building or structure is proposed to be constructed on a lot located within 2
88 of 146

1870 or more towns, the building department or board of health or licensing department, as
1871 appropriate, of the town in which the majority of the gross floor area of the building or structure
1872 is to be located shall have exclusive jurisdiction. Once construction or operation, as appropriate,
1873 has begun pursuant to the applicable permit or license, the town with such jurisdiction shall
1874 retain such jurisdiction, even if subsequent improvements cause the majority of the gross floor
1875 area or operation to be located thereafter in the other town.
1876 (2) The town of Weymouth may issue a maximum of 13 alcoholic beverage licenses
1877 within the portion of the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area located within Weymouth
1878 in accordance with chapter 138 of the General Laws, the town of Abington may issue a
1879 maximum of 2 alcoholic beverage licenses within the portion of the NAS South Weymouth
1880 redevelopment area located within Abington in accordance with chapter 138 and the town of
1881 Rockland may issue a maximum of 13 alcoholic beverage licenses within the portion of the NAS
1882 South Weymouth redevelopment area located within Rockland in accordance with said chapter
1883 138; provided, however, that said licenses shall not diminish the number of licenses permitted by
1884 the commonwealth to be granted elsewhere within the towns of Weymouth or Rockland. None of
1885 the licenses authorized by this section shall be transferable outside the NAS South Weymouth
1886 redevelopment area. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the ability of the towns to
1887 issue entertainment licenses and temporary alcoholic beverage licenses as it deems necessary and
1888 appropriate for activities occurring within their respective borders.
1889 (j) All decisions and determinations of the authority, whether legislative or adjudicatory
1890 in nature, shall be appealable by persons aggrieved by such decision or determination in
1891 accordance with applicable provisions of the General Laws. Where any applicable General Law
1892 requires notice of any such appeal to be filed with a municipal clerk, such filing shall be made
89 of 146

1893 with the clerk of the authority, and with the clerk of the town or towns in which the land subject
1894 to such decision or determination is located.
1895 (k) Nothing in this act shall be interpreted as modifying or abrogating any permit,
1896 approval or entitlement issued by the commonwealth in relation to the project and pursuant to
1897 any law relating to the protection of human health or the environment.
1898 Section 15. Anything developed within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area as
1899 of the effective date of this act shall be governed by the then-existing zoning by-laws and
1900 regulations promulgated by the authority and currently in effect. The board is hereby directed, (i)
1901 within 120 days of the effective date of this act, to revise, re-promulgate, re-issue, re-negotiate
1902 and re-execute, as needed, all regulations promulgated by the authority and currently in effect; or
1903 (ii) prior to commencement of any new development by the master developer at NAS South
1904 Weymouth, to enter into the new regulations or any agreements, including the ENA or DDA, as
1905 mutually determined by the authority and the master developer to be necessary, for the purpose
1906 of governing any development to occur within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area
1907 following the effective date of this act. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the
1908 DDA, as renegotiated pursuant to this section shall:
1909 (a) require that the master developer work with the authority and the towns to develop a
1910 plan for procuring, financing, operating and maintaining the existing and permanent water and
1911 wastewater infrastructure for the project. The permanent water and wastewater infrastructure
1912 may include the construction of a wastewater treatment plant and associated groundwater
1913 discharge facilities. Nothing in this section shall prevent the master developer, the authority or
1914 the towns from mutually agreeing to assign or delegate the operation and maintenance of the
90 of 146

1915 existing or permanent water and wastewater infrastructure to qualified parties including, without
1916 limitation, any of the towns; and
1917 (b) not include any provision imposing monetary penalties or forfeitures on the master
1918 developer in the event the master developer elects not to develop a golf course as part of the
1919 project.
1920 Section 16. The executive office for administration and finance and the executive offices
1921 of housing and livable communities, economic development and labor and workforce
1922 development shall identify a senior staff member who shall assist the towns with establishing a
1923 method for coordinating 1-stop licensing for all businesses and developments to be located
1924 within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area for the purpose of expediting the process
1925 for obtaining commonwealth licenses, permits, certificates, approvals, registrations, charters and
1926 meeting any other requirements of law.
1927 Section 17. Each public agency in the commonwealth, including, without limitation,
1928 agencies such as the Massachusetts Department of Transportation, the department of
1929 environmental protection and the Massachusetts water resources authority, involved in the
1930 development or financing of economic development projects shall develop a coordinated 1-stop
1931 program for businesses, institutions and private parties that may intend to locate in the NAS
1932 South Weymouth redevelopment area in order to enable development activities within the NAS
1933 South Weymouth redevelopment area to be more effectively promoted by the commonwealth.
1934 Further, to promote efficient redevelopment, any construction within or modifications to the
1935 layout of the parkway located within NAS South Weymouth in connection with the project shall
1936 solely require the approval of the authority.
91 of 146

1937 Section 18. (a) The authority may fix, revise, charge, collect, levy and abate betterments,
1938 assessments, special assessments and fees, and other charges for the cost, administration and
1939 operation of the infrastructure improvements. In providing for the payment of the cost of the
1940 infrastructure improvements or for the use of the infrastructure improvements, the authority may
1941 avail itself of the General Laws relative to the assessment, apportionment, division, fixing,
1942 reassessment, revision, abatement and collection of infrastructure charges, including betterments,
1943 assessments, special assessments and fees by municipalities, or the establishment of liens
1944 therefor and interest thereon, and the procedures set forth in sections 5 and 6 of chapter 254 of
1945 the General Laws for the foreclosure of liens, as it shall deem necessary and appropriate for
1946 purposes of the assessment and collection of such infrastructure improvement charges.
1947 Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the authority may pay the entire cost
1948 of any infrastructure improvements, including the acquisition thereof, during construction or
1949 after completion, or the debt service of notes or bonds used to fund such costs, from betterments,
1950 assessments, special assessments, fees, or other charges, and may establish the betterments,
1951 assessments, special assessments, fees or other charges, prior to, during, or a reasonable time
1952 following the completion of the construction of such infrastructure improvements. The authority
1953 may establish a schedule for the payment of betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees
1954 or other charges, not to exceed 40 years. The authority may determine the circumstances under
1955 which the betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges, may be
1956 increased, if at all, as a consequence of delinquency or default by the owner of that parcel or any
1957 other parcel within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area.
1958 (b) The betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges of general
1959 application authorized by this act may be increased in accordance with the procedures to be
92 of 146

1960 established by the authority for assuring that interested persons are afforded notice and an
1961 opportunity to present data, views and arguments. The initial schedule of assessments, special
1962 assessments, fees and other charges, may be adopted by the authority at any scheduled meeting
1963 of the board, provided that notice of the meeting, and the proposed schedule, is sent to each
1964 owner of a parcel within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area, by registered or
1965 certified mail at least 7 days prior to the meeting. Thereafter, the authority shall hold at least 1
1966 public hearing on a revision to its schedule of betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees
1967 and other charges thereof prior to adoption by the authority, notice of which revisions shall be
1968 delivered to the towns and shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in each of the
1969 towns at least 1 month in advance of the hearing. No later than the date of such publications, the
1970 authority shall make available to the public and deliver to the towns the proposed revisions to the
1971 schedule of special assessments, fees, betterments, assessments and other charges. The
1972 betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges established by the
1973 authority shall not be subject to supervision or regulation by any department, division,
1974 commission, board, bureau or agency of the commonwealth or its political subdivisions,
1975 including without limitation, the towns, except for the approval of the taxation plan and any
1976 amendments thereof requiring approval by the secretary and commissioner of revenue.
1977 (c) The betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges established
1978 by the authority in accordance with this act shall be fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate
1979 thereof so as to provide revenues sufficient: (i) to pay the principal of, premium, if any, and
1980 interest on bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness issued by the authority under this act
1981 as the same become due and payable; (ii) to create and maintain such reasonable reserves as may
1982 be reasonably required by a trust agreement or resolution securing bonds or notes; (iii) to provide
93 of 146

1983 funds for paying the cost of necessary repairs, replacements and renewals of infrastructure
1984 improvements; and (iv) to pay or provide for an amount that the authority may be obligated to
1985 pay or provide for by law or contract, including a resolution or contract with or for the benefit of
1986 the holders of its bonds and notes, provided that the authority shall not be required to increase
1987 any mandatory betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees or other charges by virtue of
1988 any individual proprietor delinquencies. Nothing herein shall be deemed to impose a limitation
1989 on the authority’s ability to establish, set, or impose betterments, assessments, special
1990 assessments, fees or charges at levels sufficient to meet any covenant requirements that may be
1991 contained in any resolution or contract with or for the benefit of the holders of its bonds or notes,
1992 or otherwise providing security for the same.
1993 (d) As an alternative to levying betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and
1994 other charges under this act or the General Laws, the authority may levy special assessments on
1995 real estate within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area to finance the cost,
1996 administration and operation of the infrastructure improvements. In determining the basis for and
1997 amount of the special assessment, the cost, administration, maintenance and operation of the
1998 infrastructure improvements, including the cost of the repayment of the debt issued or to be
1999 issued by the authority to finance the improvements, may be calculated and levied using any of
2000 the following methods that result in fairly allocating the costs of the infrastructure improvements
2001 to the real estate in the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area: (1) equally per length of
2002 frontage, or by lot, parcel or dwelling unit, or by the square footage of a lot, parcel or dwelling
2003 unit; (2) according to the value of the property; or (3) in any other reasonable manner that results
2004 in fairly allocating the cost, administration and operation of the infrastructure improvements,
94 of 146

2005 according to the benefit conferred or use received including, but not limited to, by classification
2006 of commercial or residential use or distance from the infrastructure improvements.
2007 (e) The authority may also provide for the following: (1) a maximum amount to be
2008 assessed with respect to any parcel; (2) a tax year or other date after which no further special
2009 assessments under this section shall be levied or collected on a parcel; (3) annual collection of
2010 the levy without subsequent approval of the authority; (4) the circumstances under which the
2011 special assessment levied against a parcel may be increased, if at all, as a consequence of
2012 delinquency or default by the owner of that parcel or any other parcel within the NAS South
2013 Weymouth redevelopment area; and (5) procedures allowing for the prepayment of betterments,
2014 assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges under this act.
2015 (f) Betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges levied under
2016 this act shall be collected and secured in the same manner as property taxes, betterments,
2017 assessments and fees owed to the towns unless otherwise provided by the authority and shall be
2018 subject to the same penalties and the same procedure, sale and lien priority in case of
2019 delinquency as is provided for such property taxes, betterments and liens owed to the towns.
2020 (g) The appellate tax board shall have jurisdiction within the NAS South Weymouth
2021 redevelopment area pursuant to chapter 58A of the General Laws to the same extent as its
2022 jurisdiction in cities and towns. The authority shall have exclusive responsibility for paying any
2023 reimbursement payments owed under section 69 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, or otherwise,
2024 as a result of the abatement, by such board or another body of competent jurisdiction, of any
2025 property tax assessments made by the authority prior to the complete transition of the assessing
2026 and taxing power to the towns pursuant to subsection (a) of section 19.
95 of 146

2027 Section 19. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, property taxes
2028 upon personal property, persons, residents and estates lying within the NAS South Weymouth
2029 redevelopment area, shall, commencing as of January 1, 2015, for the fiscal year commencing
2030 July 1, 2015, be imposed, levied and administered by each town for its respective portion of
2031 NAS South Weymouth, consistent with the General Laws that are applicable to municipalities.
2032 The towns shall collect upon the estates, real and personal, within NAS South Weymouth a
2033 property tax rate equal to the base rate plus the Southfield rate. In connection with the foregoing,
2034 the towns shall have all the powers and authority of cities and towns under chapters 40, 59, 60,
2035 60A, 61B and section 3A of chapter 64G of the General Laws including, with respect to unpaid
2036 taxes due and owing as a result of prior assessments by the South Shore Tri-Town Development
2037 Corporation, the exclusive power to exercise enforcement and collection rights pursuant to said
2038 chapter 60 of the General Laws and other relevant law, and may accept a local option under a
2039 general or special law related to the assessment, exemption or enforcement of property taxes and
2040 excises that cities and towns may accept. A property tax bill issued by a town pursuant to this
2041 subsection prior to the town’s first opportunity to issue assessments pursuant to section 21 of
2042 said chapter 59 shall be based on the assessed value established by the town in its most recent
2043 assessment of the property in question or such other assessed value as may have been determined
2044 for such property through abatement proceedings. The board shall notify each town of the
2045 Southfield rate to be charged in the next following fiscal year no later than June 1 of each year,
2046 and of the amount of pledged revenue to be remitted to the authority in the next following fiscal
2047 year, as provided below. The Southfield rate shall not be set for any given fiscal year until at
2048 least 45 days after the board provides each executive with written notice of and an opportunity to
2049 comment on the proposed rate and the Authority operating budget on which it is based. During
96 of 146

2050 such 45-day period, the executives in Rockland and Abington, and the town council in
2051 Weymouth to which the rate-setting notice shall be referred by the mayor of Weymouth may
2052 convene a public hearing for the purpose of obtaining public comment on the proposed
2053 Southfield rate. No later than 30 days after collection of property taxes for each fiscal quarter,
2054 each town shall remit to the authority the Southfield revenue collected by such town in the
2055 preceding fiscal quarter. Each town shall also remit to the authority, pledged revenue within 30
2056 days of billing from the authority. Nothing in this act shall be deemed to limit a town’s ability, in
2057 respect of any given fiscal year or other period, to remit property tax revenue in excess of
2058 Southfield revenue to the authority. Southfield revenue shall not be deemed to constitute any part
2059 of “total taxes assessed” by the towns for the purposes of administering section 21C of chapter
2060 59 of the General Laws. Land and improvements located within each town’s respective portion
2061 of NAS South Weymouth shall, in the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2015, be deemed for all
2062 purposes to be additional new growth within that town within the meaning of paragraph (f) of
2063 section 21C of said chapter 59 and section 23D of said chapter 59.
2064 (b) In consideration of the collection and retention of base revenue pursuant to
2065 subsection(a), each town shall be responsible for providing police and fire protection, emergency
2066 services, schools, maintenance of all public ways or ways maintained and used as public ways,
2067 public works, inspectional and other municipal services, including waste collection, to its
2068 respective portion of NAS South Weymouth except for portions owned or controlled by agencies
2069 of the United States government on the same basis and terms as it provides such services to other
2070 parts of the town and as required by applicable law. Notwithstanding the generality of the
2071 preceding sentence, no town shall be required to provide water or sewer services to any portion
2072 of NAS South Weymouth except pursuant to agreement with the authority or the master
97 of 146

2073 developer. For purposes of determining state education assistance, including without limitation
2074 the calculation of each town’s foundation enrollment under chapter 70 of the General Laws, each
2075 school-age child living within NAS South Weymouth shall be counted as a child enrolled in the
2076 town in which the child resides, and all expenses incurred by each respective town on behalf of
2077 such children’s education shall be included as expenses of the town incurring such costs in the
2078 determination of each respective town’s share of such assistance, including without limitation
2079 each town’s foundation budget under said chapter 70.
2080 (c) The authority and the master developer, as the case may be, at its election, shall take
2081 all actions necessary to transfer to the applicable town control of all existing public ways, or
2082 ways maintained and used as public ways, located within NAS South Weymouth, together with
2083 associated infrastructure including public utilities and sewer and storm drain lines located within
2084 or adjacent to the rights of way of such ways, and each town shall, without regard to the
2085 requirements of chapter 82 of the General Laws or other general or special laws, accept the
2086 applicable portion of such way or ways as a public way in said town. The authority and the
2087 master developer, as the case may be, at its election, shall take all actions necessary to transfer to
2088 the applicable town control of, and each town shall accept as a public way, any new public way
2089 and associated infrastructure developed, constructed or acquired by the authority or the master
2090 developer, as the case may be, within NAS South Weymouth following the effective date of this
2091 act provided the board has approved the layout and construction of such way is consistent with
2092 the authority’s subdivision regulations, and provided further that the customary street acceptance
2093 procedures of the town in which the way is to be accepted as a public way are substantially
2094 satisfied and such town agrees that the way has been constructed in accordance with the
2095 authority’s subdivision regulations. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary:
98 of 146

2096 (i) public ways or portions thereof located within NAS South Weymouth and for which a town
2097 accepts pursuant to this subsection shall be included in the apportionment for such town of state
2098 assistance to cities and towns under chapter 90 of the General Laws or under any other statute or
2099 program providing financial assistance to cities and towns of the commonwealth in connection
2100 with transportation matters; (ii) any other attributes of a town located within NAS South
2101 Weymouth including without limitation population and employment shall likewise be included
2102 for purposes of such apportionment; and (iii) improvement, maintenance, repair or other projects
2103 related to said public ways shall be eligible for such assistance.
2104 (d) Any existing agreements or obligations owed between the towns or the authority or
2105 the prior master developer, or any combination of the foregoing parties, as applicable, related to
2106 the development within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area shall be rescinded and
2107 shall have no further force and effect as of January 1, 2020, unless affirmatively assumed by the
2108 authority or the master developer in writing, whether in a new agreement or an amendment or
2109 restatement of such existing agreements or obligation.
2110 (e) Following the termination of the authority in accordance with section 33, each town
2111 shall have the authority to assess, impose, levy and collect property taxes on properties located
2112 within its respective portion of the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area on the same basis
2113 as such town administers its property tax collection system elsewhere within the town.
2114 (f) Taxes within NAS South Weymouth are currently levied and assessed consistent with
2115 the taxation plan dated October 13, 2014 that was approved by the secretary and the
2116 commissioner of revenue, which taxation plan may be revised from time to time. The taxation
2117 plan details the specific powers and duties of the authority and the towns; provide for the timely
99 of 146

2118 transfer of assessment and collection records from the authority to the towns; detail the oversight
2119 to be provided by the commissioner of revenue regarding the base rate and Southfield rate,
2120 including required reports and other information; and address such other pertinent matters as
2121 determined by the secretary and the commissioner of revenue.
2122 Section 20. (a) The authority may provide by resolution of the board for the issuance of
2123 bonds and notes of the authority for the purposes of paying or refinancing all or any part of the
2124 cost of the project and its infrastructure improvements. Such cost shall include the cost of: (1)
2125 construction, reconstruction, renovation and acquisition of all lands, structures, real or personal
2126 property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and interests acquired or to be acquired by
2127 the authority, the towns, the commonwealth or any other political subdivision thereof, including
2128 the costs of any infrastructure and improvements to be transferred to the towns in accordance
2129 with subsection (c) of section 19; (2) all machinery and equipment including machinery and
2130 equipment needed to expand or enhance services from the towns, the commonwealth or a
2131 political subdivision thereof to the authority; (3) financing charges and interest prior to and
2132 during construction, and for a period not exceeding 1 year after completion of the construction,
2133 interest and reserves for principal and interest, including costs of municipal bond insurance and
2134 any other type of financial guaranty and costs of issuance; (4) extensions, enlargements,
2135 additions and enhancements to infrastructure improvements; (5) architectural, engineering,
2136 financial and legal services; (6) plans, specifications, studies, surveys and estimates of costs and
2137 of revenues; (7) administrative expenses necessary or incident to the construction, acquisition,
2138 financing, operation and maintenance of the project; and (8) other expenses as may be necessary
2139 or incident to the construction, acquisition, operation, maintenance and financing of the
2140 infrastructure improvements, including the cost of issuing bonds or notes. The authority may
100 of 146

2141 issue up to $175,000,000 of its bonds. The authority may issue bonds secured in whole or in part
2142 by betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges, notes, debentures, long
2143 term capital leases, grants and governmental assistance and long-term contracts; provided that,
2144 for so long as the 2020A bonds are outstanding, the authority may not secure any bonds or notes
2145 issued after the effective date of this section with a pledge or other commitment of ad valorem
2146 property taxes assessed by the authority or the towns pursuant to said section 19 with respect to
2147 any of the assessable property under the Trust Indenture. The principal of and interest on such
2148 bonds shall be payable solely from the funds which are identified by the authority and are
2149 permitted by this act to provide for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall
2150 bear interest at such rates, which may be variable or fixed, and shall mature at times not
2151 exceeding 35 years from their dates of initial issuance, as the authority may determine, and may
2152 be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the authority, at such prices and under such
2153 terms and conditions as the authority may fix prior to the issuance of the bonds. The authority
2154 shall determine the form of the bonds and the manner of execution of the bonds, and shall fix the
2155 denominations of the bonds and the places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at
2156 a bank or trust company within or without the commonwealth and such other locations as
2157 designated by the authority. In the event an officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose
2158 signature shall appear on any bonds shall cease to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds,
2159 the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if such
2160 officer had remained in office until the delivery. The bonds shall be issued in registered form.
2161 The authority may sell the bonds in a manner and for a price, either at public or private sale, as it
2162 may determine to be for the best interests of the authority.
101 of 146

2163 (b) Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the authority may, under like restrictions,
2164 issue interim receipts or temporary notes, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive
2165 bonds when such bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. The authority may
2166 also provide for the replacement of bonds that shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or
2167 lost. The authority may issue, from time to time, notes of the authority in anticipation of federal,
2168 state or local grants for the cost of the project and acquiring, constructing or improving the
2169 infrastructure improvements. The notes shall be authorized, issued and sold in the same manner
2170 as provided in, and shall otherwise be subject to, this act. Such notes shall mature at such times
2171 as provided by the issuing resolution of the authority and may be renewed from time to time;
2172 provided, however, that all such notes and renewals thereof shall mature on or before 20 years
2173 from their date of issuance. Bonds and notes may be issued under this act subject only to those
2174 proceedings, conditions or things that are specifically required by this act.
2175 (c) The authority may provide by resolution for issuance of refunding bonds of the
2176 authority for the purpose of refunding bonds then outstanding at maturity or upon acceleration or
2177 redemption. Refunding bonds may be issued at such times prior to the maturity or redemption of
2178 the refunded bonds as the authority deems to be in the public interest. Refunding bonds may be
2179 issued in sufficient amounts to pay or provide for the principal of the bonds being refunded under
2180 this act, and the payment of a redemption premium thereon and interest accrued or to accrue to
2181 the date of redemption of such bonds, and, if deemed advisable by the authority, for the
2182 additional purpose of paying any cost of the project, including the acquisition, constructing or
2183 reconstructing of the infrastructure improvements. The issuance of such bonds, the maturities
2184 and other details thereof, the rights of the holders thereof, and the duties of the authority in
2185 respect to the same shall be governed by this act insofar as the same may be applicable.
102 of 146

2186 (d) While bonds issued by the authority remain outstanding, the powers, duties or
2187 existence of the authority shall not be diminished or impaired in any way that will adversely
2188 affect the interests and rights of the holders of such bonds.
2189 (e) The board may by resolution delegate to a person, other than a majority of the board,
2190 the power to determine any of the matters set forth in this section.
2191 (f) Bonds and notes issued under this section, unless otherwise authorized by law, shall
2192 not be deemed to constitute a debt of the commonwealth or of the towns, or a pledge of the faith
2193 and credit of the commonwealth or of the towns, but such bonds shall be payable solely from the
2194 funds of the authority or as otherwise provided in this act. Unless the towns or the
2195 commonwealth subsequently agree to pay the bonds or notes of the authority, such bonds and
2196 notes shall contain on their faces a statement to the effect that neither the commonwealth nor the
2197 towns shall be obliged to pay the same or the interest thereon and that neither the faith and credit
2198 nor taxing power of the commonwealth or the towns is pledged to the payment of the principal of
2199 or the interest on such bonds or notes. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, nothing
2200 in this act shall be construed as imposing on any town any obligation with respect to the
2201 repayment of the series 2020A bonds and any debt issued by the authority pursuant to this act.
2202 (g) All bonds or notes issued under this act shall have all the qualities and incidents of
2203 negotiable instruments as defined in section 3-104 of chapter 106 of the General Laws.
2204 (h) Prior to the issuance of bonds with a maturity date later than the date the authority is
2205 required to be terminated pursuant to section 33, the mayor of the town of Weymouth and boards
2206 of selectmen of the towns of Abington and Rockland, in consultation with the authority, shall
2207 enter into an intermunicipal debt service agreement acceptable to the authority, which shall
103 of 146

2208 provide for the continued payment of principal and interest on such bonds and the maintenance
2209 of all required reserves and any other obligations as may be set forth in the applicable bond
2210 instruments from betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees, other charges and other
2211 revenues generated in the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area and the authority and the
2212 towns may enter into and perform their respective obligations under such debt service
2213 agreement; provided, however, that such agreement shall not extend the duration of the authority
2214 past the date on which it is to be terminated pursuant to section 33.
2215 Section 21. (a) In the discretion of the authority, bonds, refunding bonds or notes may be
2216 secured by a trust agreement by and between the authority and a corporate trustee, which may be
2217 a trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the
2218 commonwealth. Such trust agreement may pledge or assign the revenues to be received, but shall
2219 not convey or mortgage the project or a part thereof.
2220 (b) Either the resolution providing for the issuance of bonds or notes or the trust
2221 agreement may contain provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the
2222 bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including, without
2223 limiting the generality of the foregoing, provisions defining defaults and providing for remedies
2224 in the event thereof, which may include the acceleration of maturities and covenants setting forth
2225 the duties of, and limitations on, the authority in relation to the acquisition, maintenance,
2226 operation, insurance and disposition of property, custody, safeguarding, investment, application
2227 of moneys, use of any surplus bond or note proceeds and establishment of reserves. Such
2228 resolution or trust agreement may contain, but shall not be limited to, covenants by the authority
2229 in relation to the following: (i) the establishment, revision and collection of such betterments,
2230 assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges for services or facilities furnished or
104 of 146

2231 supplied by the authority as shall provide revenues which together with other revenues of the
2232 project, if any, are sufficient to pay: (1) the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating the
2233 project and of making renewals and replacements in connection therewith, (2) the principal of
2234 and the interest on the bonds or notes, as the same shall become due and payable, (3) payments
2235 in lieu of taxes, betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges and (4)
2236 reserves for all such purposes; (ii) the purposes for which the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or
2237 notes shall be applied and the use and disposition thereof; (iii) the use and disposition of the
2238 gross revenues of the authority from the project, additions thereto and extension and the
2239 infrastructure improvements thereof, including the creation and maintenance of funds for
2240 working capital and for renewals and replacements to the project; (iv) the amount, if any, of
2241 additional bonds or notes payable from the revenues of the project and the limitations, terms and
2242 conditions on which such additional bonds or notes may be issued; and (v) the operation,
2243 maintenance, management, accounting and auditing of the project and of the income and
2244 revenues of the authority.
2245 (c) It shall be lawful for a bank or trust company within or without the commonwealth to
2246 act as depository of the proceeds of bonds or revenues and to furnish such indemnifying bonds or
2247 to pledge such securities as may be required by the authority. Such trust agreement may set forth
2248 the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee and may restrict the individual right
2249 of action by bondholders as is customary in trust agreements or trust indentures securing bonds
2250 and debentures of authorities. Such trust agreement may contain other provisions as the authority
2251 may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in
2252 carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement may be treated as a part of the cost of the
2253 operation of the project. The pledge by any such trust agreement or resolution shall be valid and
105 of 146

2254 binding from the time when the pledge is made. The revenues or other moneys so pledged and
2255 then held or thereafter received by the authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such
2256 pledge without a physical delivery thereof or further act. The lien of any such pledge shall be
2257 valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise
2258 against the authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. The financing
2259 document by which any pledge is created by the authority shall not be required to be filed or
2260 recorded to perfect such pledge except in the official records of the authority and no uniform
2261 commercial code filing shall be required to be made. A pledge or assignment made by the
2262 authority is an exercise of its political and governmental powers, and revenues, funds, assets,
2263 property and contract or other rights to receive the same and the proceeds thereof which are
2264 subject to the lien of a pledge or assignment created under this act shall not be applied to
2265 purposes not permitted by the pledge or assignment.
2266 (d) In addition to other security provided herein or otherwise by law, bonds, notes or
2267 obligations issued by the authority under this act may be secured, in whole or in part, by a letter
2268 of credit, line of credit, bond insurance policy, liquidity facility or other credit facility for the
2269 purpose of providing funds for payments in respect of bonds, notes or other obligations required
2270 by the holder thereof to be redeemed or repurchased prior to maturity or for providing additional
2271 security for such bonds, notes or other obligations. In connection therewith, the authority may
2272 enter into reimbursement agreements, remarketing agreements, standby bond purchase
2273 agreements and any other necessary or appropriate agreements. The authority may pledge or
2274 assign the authority’s revenues as security for the reimbursement by the authority to the
2275 providers of such letters of credit, lines of credit, bond insurance policies, liquidity facilities or
106 of 146

2276 other credit facilities of any payments made under the letters of credit, lines of credit, bond
2277 insurance policies, liquidity facilities or other credit facilities.
2278 (e) In connection with, or incidental to, the issuance of bonds, notes or other obligations,
2279 the authority may enter into such contracts as it may determine to be necessary or appropriate to
2280 place the bonds, notes or other obligations of the authority, as represented by the bonds or notes,
2281 or other obligations in whole or in part, on such interest rate or cash flow basis as the authority
2282 may determine, including without limitation, interest rate swap agreements, insurance
2283 agreements, forward payment conversion agreements, futures contracts, contracts providing for
2284 payments based on levels of, or changes in, interest rates or market indices, contracts to manage
2285 interest rate risk, including without limitation, interest rate floors or caps, options, puts, calls and
2286 similar arrangements. Such contracts shall contain such payment, security, default, remedy and
2287 other terms and conditions as the authority may deem appropriate and shall be entered into with
2288 such parties as the authority may select, after giving due consideration, where applicable, for the
2289 creditworthiness of the counter parties, including a rating by a nationally-recognized rating
2290 agency, the impact on a rating on outstanding bonds, notes or other obligations or other criteria
2291 the authority may deem appropriate.
2292 (f) The authority shall have the power to purchase its bonds or notes out of any funds
2293 available therefor. The authority may hold, pledge, cancel or resell such bonds or notes, subject
2294 to and in accordance with agreements with bondholders.
2295 (g) Any moneys received by the authority, whether as proceeds from the issuance of
2296 bonds or notes, or as revenue or otherwise, may be designated by the board as trust funds to be
2297 held and applied solely as provided in this act.
107 of 146

2298 Section 22. Bonds, refunding bonds and notes issued under this act shall be securities in
2299 which all public officers and public bodies of the commonwealth and its political subdivisions,
2300 all insurance companies, trust companies and their commercial departments and within the limits
2301 set forth in chapter 172 of the General Laws, banking associations, investment companies,
2302 executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons whatsoever who are now or may
2303 hereinafter be authorized to invest in bonds or other obligations of a similar nature may properly
2304 and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them; and such bonds
2305 are shall be obligations that may properly and legally be made eligible for the investment of
2306 savings deposits and the income thereof in the manner provided in chapter 168 of the General
2307 Laws. Such bonds shall be securities that may properly and legally be deposited with and
2308 received by a state or municipal officer or an agency or political subdivision of the
2309 commonwealth for a purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the
2310 commonwealth is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.
2311 Section 23. A holder of bonds or notes issued under this act and a trustee under a trust,
2312 except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by the trust agreement, may, either
2313 at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce all rights
2314 under the laws of the commonwealth or granted hereunder or under the trust agreement, and may
2315 enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this act or by the trust agreement,
2316 to be performed by the authority or by an officer thereof.
2317 Section 24. The towns and the commonwealth are pledged to agree with the holders of
2318 the bonds or notes that neither the towns nor the commonwealth shall limit or alter or cause to
2319 limit or alter the rights hereby vested in the authority to acquire or maintain the project or
2320 infrastructure improvements, to establish and collect betterments, assessments, special
108 of 146

2321 assessments, fees and other charges and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the
2322 holders of the bonds or notes nor impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders or
2323 noteholders, until the bonds or notes, together with interest thereon, with interest on any unpaid
2324 installments of interest and all costs and expenses in connection with an action or proceeding by
2325 or on behalf of the bondholders or noteholders, are fully met and discharged.
2326 Section 25. (a) The creation of the authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes
2327 shall be for the benefit of the people of the commonwealth and shall be a public purpose, and the
2328 authority shall be regarded as performing a governmental function in the exercise of the powers
2329 conferred upon it by this act and shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments upon any of the
2330 property acquired by it or under its jurisdiction, control or supervision or upon its activities.
2331 (b) Any bonds issued under this act, including an exchange, sale or transfer of such
2332 bonds, and any income derived therefrom, and the property of the agency shall at all times be
2333 free from taxation by the commonwealth or any political subdivision or entity thereof to the
2334 extent permitted by federal law.
2335 (c) Bonds or notes issued under this act shall be subject to the same reporting and
2336 oversight requirements that apply to a municipality under the General Laws.
2337 Section 26. The authority shall be liable in contract and in tort in the same manner as a
2338 municipal authority. The directors, officers, employees and agents of the authority, including
2339 members of the advisory board established pursuant to section 10, shall not be liable as such on
2340 their contracts or for torts not committed or directly authorized by them. The property or funds of
2341 the authority shall not be subject to attachment or to levy and sale on execution, but if the
2342 authority refuses to pay a judgment entered against it in a court of competent jurisdiction, the
109 of 146

2343 superior court, sitting within and for Norfolk county or Plymouth county, may direct the
2344 treasurer of the authority to pay such judgment. The real estate owned by the authority shall not
2345 be subject to liens under chapter 254 of the General Laws, but sections 28 and 29 of chapter 149
2346 of the General Laws shall be applicable to any construction work by the authority.
2347 Section 27. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the authority shall
2348 be deemed to be a public employer for purposes of chapter 258 of the General Laws.
2349 Section 28. (a) The authority may, if appropriate, make application to the United States
2350 Department of Housing and Urban Development or, as necessary, any other federal agency, to
2351 designate all or a portion of the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area as an enterprise zone,
2352 pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 11501 et seq., as amended, or an existing or successor statute for the
2353 purpose of creating jobs and encouraging development in the NAS South Weymouth
2354 redevelopment area.
2355 (b) The NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area and the towns of Abington, Rockland
2356 and Weymouth are hereby designated economic target areas as defined in section 3G of chapter
2357 23A of the General Laws. Pursuant to such designation, certain development projects within the
2358 NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area and the entirety of the towns of Abington, Rockland
2359 and Weymouth shall be eligible for tax deductions, credits and abatements and other economic
2360 incentives as provided for in sections 3D to 3G of said chapter 23A. The authority shall render
2361 such certifications as are required by law for the project within the NAS South Weymouth
2362 redevelopment area, including the designation of economic opportunity areas, and each town
2363 shall render such certifications within portions of the towns not included in the NAS South
2364 Weymouth redevelopment area. The designation of the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment
110 of 146

2365 area and the towns of Abington, Rockland and Weymouth as economic target areas shall be in
2366 addition to any other economic target areas that may be established pursuant to said section 3G
2367 of said chapter 23A. Further, notwithstanding any other general or special law, (i) the authority
2368 and (ii) any projects undertaken by any party within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment
2369 area shall be eligible for any and all other financial and other assistance authorized by any
2370 general or special law intended to attract new growth, enhance infrastructure investment or
2371 incentives, or provide other economic development benefit to priority areas of the
2372 commonwealth, without the need for any specific designation of or approval of any portion of
2373 the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area as an area suitable for, or having priority with
2374 regard to, economic development, or similar designations, however named or styled, under any
2375 current or future general or special law; provided however, that the authority or project shall
2376 meet the same basic eligibility requirements as a municipality or party applying for any such
2377 financial and other assistance.
2378 Section 29. The authority shall be subject to all laws applicable to municipal
2379 redevelopment authorities created under section 4 of chapter 121B of the General Laws. In no
2380 event shall the authority be considered an “agency” for the purposes of the Massachusetts
2381 Environmental Policy Act Regulations, including as such term is defined in 301 CMR 11.02.
2382 Section 30. The authority or its agents may enter into project labor agreements covering
2383 construction performed by it consistent with its powers under this act.
2384 Section 31. The authority shall keep an accurate account of its activities including its
2385 receipts and expenditures. The authority shall prepare annual reports of its activities in the NAS
2386 South Weymouth redevelopment area during the preceding fiscal year and submit such reports to
111 of 146

2387 the governor, secretary, general court, advisory board, mayor of the town of Weymouth, the
2388 town manager of the town of Abington, the town administrator of the town of Rockland, the
2389 town council of the town of Weymouth, the boards of selectmen of the towns of Abington and
2390 Rockland and the town clerk of each of those towns. Each report shall set forth a complete
2391 operating and financial statement covering the authority’s operations in the NAS South
2392 Weymouth redevelopment area during the previous year. The authority shall cause an audit of its
2393 books and accounts relating to the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area to be made at least
2394 once in each fiscal year by certified public accountants. The audit shall be filed with the state
2395 auditor annually not later than 180 days after the end of the authority’s fiscal year and shall be in
2396 a form prescribed by the state auditor. The state auditor may audit the authority's books and
2397 accounts in accordance with section 12 of chapter 11 of the General Laws. The state auditor may
2398 investigate the budget, finances, transactions and relationships of the authority at any time and
2399 may examine the authority's records and prescribe methods of accounting and the rendering of
2400 periodic reports. The audits of the authority shall be public records; provided, however, that the
2401 mayor of the town of Weymouth, the town manager of the town of Abington, or the town
2402 administrator of the town of Rockland may each conduct annual audits at the expense of the
2403 respective towns.
2404 Section 32. Chapter 40B of the General Laws shall not apply to the provision of
2405 affordable housing within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area. Such affordable
2406 housing within the NAS South Weymouth redevelopment area shall be governed by clause (1) of
2407 subsection (b) of section 14 and the zoning by-laws. None of the land located within the NAS
2408 South Weymouth redevelopment area, nor any of the housing which may be constructed thereon
2409 from time to time, shall be included in any calculation applicable to said chapter 40B with
112 of 146

2410 respect to any of the towns. This section shall continue in full force and effect following the
2411 dissolution of the authority pursuant to section 33.
2412 Section 33. (a) The authority shall be dissolved upon: (i) the bond termination date; and
2413 (ii) the approval of the dissolution and administration agreement by the towns as described in
2414 subsection (b). Within 30 days after: (i) the bond termination date; and (ii) such approval of the
2415 dissolution and administration agreement, the board shall file a certificate acknowledging such
2416 dissolution with the state secretary. The dissolution of the authority shall take effect upon the
2417 filing of such certificate, subject to the applicable provisions of section 51 of chapter 155 of the
2418 General Laws. In connection with the application of said section 51 of said chapter 55, any real
2419 property owned by the authority at the time of dissolution shall be deemed to be distributed
2420 automatically to and become the property of the town in which it is located, consistent with the
2421 dissolution and administration agreement, and the personal property of the authority shall be
2422 equitably allocated to the towns according to the terms of the dissolution and administration
2423 agreement; provided, however, that the authority shall not issue any bonds after the date that is 1
2424 year following the completion of the redevelopment of the NAS South Weymouth
2425 redevelopment area.
2426 (b) At least 24 months prior to the bond termination date, the board shall prepare and
2427 distribute to the towns a dissolution and administration agreement. The dissolution and
2428 administration agreement shall provide, but shall not be limited to, the following: (i) provisions
2429 for the disposition of all real and personal property within the NAS South Weymouth
2430 redevelopment area which the authority owns or has an interest in on the bond termination date;
2431 (ii) provisions for the assumption of all contractual obligations, including all lease agreements of
2432 the authority, which do not expire on the bond termination date; (iii) provisions for the transfer
113 of 146

2433 and assumption by the towns of the authority's zoning administration, licensing and permitting
2434 authorities; and (iv) provisions for the resolution of any other matters relating to the authority
2435 which may affect the interests of the towns. Within 120 days after receipt of the dissolution and
2436 administration agreement, the mayor of the town of Weymouth shall convene a meeting of the
2437 town council of the town of Weymouth and the boards of selectmen of the towns of Abington
2438 and Rockland shall convene a town meeting of their respective towns for the purpose of adopting
2439 by majority vote of the town council and each town meeting the dissolution and administration
2440 agreement. Each town shall vote to adopt or disapprove the agreement as submitted. No
2441 amendments to the agreement shall be made by the towns. Each town shall, within 30 days after
2442 adoption or rejection of the agreement at a town council meeting or a town meeting, as the case
2443 may be, provide the authority with a written notification stating whether the town council or
2444 town meeting adopted or rejected the agreement. Any town that has rejected the agreement shall
2445 have 1 year from the date of such disapproval to reconsider its decision and rescind its rejection
2446 and adopt the dissolution and administration agreement. Once a town adopts the agreement, it
2447 shall not thereafter vote to disapprove or reject it. If all 3 towns have not adopted the agreement
2448 at least 1 year prior to the bond termination date, the authority shall remain in existence and carry
2449 out its functions consistent with this act. If the towns fail to adopt the agreement, the general
2450 court may, at any time after the bond termination date, terminate the authority’s existence,
2451 provide for the distribution of its assets and determine other provisions as required for the
2452 dissolution and administration agreement.
2453 Section 34. (a) Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, the authority
2454 shall perform its obligations under the Parkway Financing MOA, including without limitation,
2455 reimbursement to the commonwealth of any “deficiency payment,” as defined in the Parkway
114 of 146

2456 Financing MOA, which obligation of the authority shall constitute a general obligation of the
2457 authority for which the full faith and credit of the authority shall be pledged for the benefit of the
2458 commonwealth. The betterments, assessments, special assessments, fees and other charges
2459 established by the authority in accordance with this act shall be fixed and adjusted so as to
2460 provide revenues at least sufficient to pay, in addition to all other amounts set forth in section 18,
2461 any amounts that the authority may be obligated to pay or provide for, pursuant to the Parkway
2462 Financing MOA or the financing agreement referenced therein. The corporation may collect the
2463 data described in sections 3 and 4 of the Parkway Financing MOA for the purposes described
2464 therein.
2465 (b) The secretary may enter into amendments to the Parkway Financing MOA to allow
2466 for deficiency payments to be deferred or otherwise addressed if the secretary determines that
2467 such treatment is fiscally responsible and serves the public interest.
2468 (c) Additional financing by the commonwealth of “Parkway-Phase 2” and the “East Side
2469 Connectivity Improvements” shall be subject to the commonwealth’s capital plan and its
2470 statutory debt limit.
2471 Section 35. The authority shall not offer new bonds, including the refunding or
2472 refinancing of any outstanding indebtedness, after December 31, 2045 without first obtaining a
2473 two-thirds majority vote from the town council of the town of Weymouth, and the select boards
2474 of the towns of Abington and Rockland.
2475 Section 36. The authority and SSTDC shall be considered a state authority for the
2476 purposes of section 29K of chapter 29 of the General Laws and shall be considered a state entity
2477 for the purposes of section 97 of chapter 6 of the General Laws.
115 of 146

2478 SECTION 69. Section 45 of chapter 139 of the acts of 2001 is hereby amended by
2479 striking out the words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 17 of chapter 26 of the acts of
2480 2023, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
2481 SECTION 70. Section 20 of chapter 449 of the acts of 2006 is hereby amended by
2482 striking out the words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 18 of said chapter 26, and
2483 inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
2484 SECTION 71. The fifth sentence of subsection (b) of section 83C of chapter 169 of the
2485 acts of 2008, as appearing in section 61 of chapter 179 of the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by
2486 striking out the following words:- and shall specify that any subsequent solicitation shall occur
2487 within 24 months of a previous solicitation.
2488 SECTION 72. Section 92 of chapter 194 of the acts of 2011 is hereby amended by
2489 striking out the words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 19 of said chapter 26, and
2490 inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
2491 SECTION 73. Section 112 of said chapter 194 is hereby amended by striking out the
2492 words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 20 of said chapter 26, and inserting in place
2493 thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
2494 SECTION 74. Section 74 of chapter 10 of the acts of 2015 is hereby amended by striking
2495 out the words “December 15, 2025”, inserted by section 21 of said chapter 26, and inserting in
2496 place thereof the following words:- December 15, 2027.
116 of 146

2497 SECTION 75. Chapter 209 of the acts of 2018, as most recently amended by chapter 364
2498 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by striking out section 89 and inserting in place
2499 thereof the following section:-
2500 Section 89. There shall be established and set up on the books of the commonwealth a
2501 separate, non-budgeted special revenue fund called the Woodlands Partnership of Northwest
2502 Massachusetts Fund, which shall be administered by the Woodlands Partnership of Northwest
2503 Massachusetts Board established pursuant to section 91. Amounts credited to the fund shall be
2504 expended without further appropriation. There shall be credited into the fund revenues or other
2505 financing sources directed to the fund by appropriation or other monies authorized by the general
2506 court and specifically designated to be credited to the fund, any income derived from the
2507 investment of amounts credited to the fund and monies from the repayment of loans from the
2508 fund, funds from public or private sources, including, but not limited to, gifts, federal, state or
2509 private grants, donations, rebates and settlements received by the commonwealth that are
2510 specifically designated to be credited to the fund and all other amounts credited or transferred
2511 into the fund from any other source. Amounts credited to said fund shall be used solely for
2512 implementing the purposes and administration of the Woodlands Partnership of Northwest
2513 Massachusetts established pursuant to section 91. The unexpended balance in the fund at the end
2514 of a fiscal year shall remain available for expenditure in subsequent fiscal years. No expenditure
2515 from the fund shall cause the fund to be in deficit at any point.
2516 SECTION 76. Chapter 279 of the acts of 2018 is hereby amended by striking out the
2517 words “capital expenditure authorizations,”.
117 of 146

2518 SECTION 77. Chapter 4 of the acts of 2021 is hereby amended by striking out section 9
2519 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
2520 Section 9. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the bonds that the
2521 state treasurer may issue pursuant to section 34 of chapter 383 of the acts of 2020 shall be issued
2522 for a term not to exceed 30 years. All such bonds shall be payable not later than June 30, 2065,
2523 as recommended by the governor in a message to the general court dated August 14, 2025 under
2524 section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution.
2525 SECTION 78. Item 7010-1192 of section 2 of chapter 126 of the acts of 2022 is hereby
2526 amended by striking out the figure “2025”, inserted by section 41 of chapter 248 of the acts of
2527 2024, and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
2528 SECTION 79. Section 74 of chapter 2 of the acts of 2023 is hereby amended by striking
2529 out the words “December 31, 2024”, each time they appear, and inserting in place thereof, in
2530 each instance, the following words:- December 31, 2026.
2531 SECTION 80. Item 1599-6090 of section 2A of chapter 268 of the acts of 2022, as most
2532 recently amended by section 44 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by
2533 striking out the words “the June 21, 2022 fire in the city of Revere” and inserting in place thereof
2534 the following words:- fires in the Third Suffolk senatorial district.
2535 SECTION 81. Section 23 of chapter 26 of the acts of 2023 is hereby repealed.
2536 SECTION 82. Item 2000-0100 of section 2 of chapter 28 of the acts of 2023 is hereby
2537 amended by striking out the words “June 30, 2025”, as appearing in section 61 of chapter 248 of
2538 the acts of 2024, and inserting in place thereof the following words:- June 30, 2026.
118 of 146

2539 SECTION 83. Item 2000-0100 of said section 2 of said chapter 28 is hereby amended by
2540 striking out the figure “2025”, as inserted by section 56 of chapter 14 of the acts of 2025, and
2541 inserting in place thereof the following figure:-“2026”.
2542 SECTION 84. Item 2810-0122 of said section 2 of said chapter 28 is hereby amended by
2543 striking out the figure “2025”, inserted by section 76 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, and
2544 inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
2545 SECTION 85. Item 4000-0300 of said section 2 of said chapter 28 is hereby further
2546 amended by striking out the figure “2025”, inserted by section 79 of chapter 248 of the acts of
2547 2024, and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
2548 SECTION 86. Item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 28 is hereby amended by
2549 striking out the figure “2025”, as appearing in section 89 of said chapter 248, and inserting in
2550 place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
2551 SECTION 87. Item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 28 is hereby amended by
2552 striking out the figure “2025”, inserted by section 101 of said chapter 248, and inserting in place
2553 thereof the following figure:- 2026.
2554 SECTION 88. Item 1599-0514 of section 2A of chapter 77 of the acts of 2023 is hereby
2555 amended by inserting after the words “fiscal year 2025” the following words:- and in all
2556 subsequent fiscal years thereafter; provided, that the executive office for administration and
2557 finance, in consultation with the executive office of housing and livable communities, shall
2558 provide a report to the house and senate detailing all fiscal year 2026 spending on the emergency
2559 housing assistance program since July 1, 2025 which has not been previously disclosed in the
2560 offices’ bi-weekly emergency assistance reports.
119 of 146

2561 SECTION 89. Item 0640-0300 of section 2 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby
2562 amended by inserting after the word “donations” the following words:- and such funds shall be
2563 made available until June 30, 2026.
2564 SECTION 90. Item 1233-2401 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2565 by adding the following words:- ; provided, that notwithstanding any general or special law to
2566 the contrary, a city or town that received funding under this item in fiscal year 2024 and that
2567 remains eligible in fiscal year 2025 shall receive not less than the amount of funding that such
2568 city or town received under this item in fiscal year 2024.
2569 SECTION 91. Said item 1233-2401 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby further
2570 amended by striking out the figure “$750,000” and inserting in place thereof the following
2571 figure:- $1,185,432.
2572 SECTION 92. Item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as amended by
2573 section 99 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by inserting after the
2574 words “Fido, Inc.” the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30,
2575 2026.
2576 SECTION 93. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so amended,
2577 is hereby further amended by inserting after the words “development costs” the following
2578 words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2579 SECTION 94. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so amended,
2580 is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Middleton” the following words:- and
2581 such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
120 of 146

2582 SECTION 95. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so amended,
2583 is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Act” the following words:- and such
2584 funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2585 SECTION 96. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so amended,
2586 is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Sharon” the following words:- and such
2587 funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2588 SECTION 97. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so amended,
2589 is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “improvements”, the third time it appears,
2590 the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2591 SECTION 98. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so amended,
2592 is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Abington” the following words:- and such
2593 funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2594 SECTION 99. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so amended,
2595 is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “common” the following words:- and such
2596 funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2597 SECTION 100. Said item 1599-0026 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2598 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Middleton” the following
2599 words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2600 SECTION 101. Item 2810-0122 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2601 by inserting after the word “playground”, the second time it appears, the following words:- and
2602 such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
121 of 146

2603 SECTION 102. Item 3000-4060 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2604 by adding the following words:-
2605 General Fund…83.94%
2606 High-Quality Early Education & Care Affordability Fund…16.06%
2607 SECTION 103. Item 4512-0205 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2608 by inserting after the words “Healthy Lynnfield” the following words:- and such funds shall be
2609 made available until June 30, 2026.
2610 SECTION 104. Item 7002-0010 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2611 by inserting after the words “inclusive community” the following words:- and such funds shall
2612 be made available until June 30, 2026.
2613 SECTION 105. Item 7004-0107 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2614 by inserting after the word “individuals”, the fourth time it appears, the following words:- and
2615 such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2616 SECTION 106. Item 7008-0900 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as amended by
2617 section 100 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by inserting after the
2618 word “organization”, the first time it appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be
2619 made available until June 30, 2026.
2620 SECTION 107. Said item 7008-0900 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2621 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words “Business Association, Inc.” the
2622 following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
122 of 146

2623 SECTION 108. Said item 7008-0900 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2624 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “programming”, the second time
2625 it appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2626 SECTION 109. Said item 7008-0900 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2627 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Springfield”, the first time it
2628 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2629 SECTION 110. Said item 7008-0900 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2630 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “valley” the following words:-
2631 and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2632 SECTION 111. Item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as amended by
2633 section 65 of chapter 14 of the acts of 2025, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
2634 “center”, the first time it appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available
2635 until June 30, 2026.
2636 SECTION 112. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2637 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “veterans”, the second time it
2638 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2639 SECTION 113. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2640 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words “other equipment” the
2641 following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
123 of 146

2642 SECTION 114. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2643 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Middleton” the following
2644 words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2645 SECTION 115. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2646 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “gazebo”, the first time it
2647 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2648 SECTION 116. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2649 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Southbridge”, the second time
2650 it appears, the following words:- , and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2651 SECTION 117. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2652 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Framingham”, the first time it
2653 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2654 SECTION 118. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2655 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Beverly”, the second time it
2656 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2657 SECTION 119. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2658 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words “city of Boston”, the second
2659 time they appear, the following words:- , and such funds shall be made available until June 30,
2660 2026.
124 of 146

2661 SECTION 120. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2662 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Act”, the first time it appears,
2663 the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2664 SECTION 121. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2665 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Sharon” the following words:-
2666 and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2667 SECTION 122. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2668 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Lynn”, the second time it
2669 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2670 SECTION 123. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2671 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “projects”, the fifth time it
2672 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2673 SECTION 124. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2674 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “hospitals” the following
2675 words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2676 SECTION 125. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2677 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “families”, the third time it
2678 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2679 SECTION 126. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2680 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “prevention”, the second time it
2681 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
125 of 146

2682 SECTION 127. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2683 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “programming”, the twenty-first
2684 time it appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30,
2685 2026.
2686 SECTION 128. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2687 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “resources”, the third time it
2688 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2689 SECTION 129. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2690 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “services”, the fifteenth time it
2691 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2692 SECTION 130. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2693 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Boston, Inc.”, the third time it
2694 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2695 SECTION 131. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2696 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “maintenance”, the eighth time it
2697 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2698 SECTION 132. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2699 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “epidemic” the following
2700 words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
126 of 146

2701 SECTION 133. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2702 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “training”, the sixth time it
2703 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2704 SECTION 134. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2705 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “education”, the thirteenth time
2706 it appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2707 SECTION 135. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2708 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “trips” the following words:- and
2709 such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2710 SECTION 136. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2711 amended, is hereby further amended by striking out the words “for the beautification of the
2712 Norfolk street bridge area” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- and such funds
2713 shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2714 SECTION 137. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2715 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “town”, the sixth time it appears,
2716 the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2717 SECTION 138. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2718 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Sutton” the following words:-
2719 and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2720 SECTION 139. Item 7010-1192 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as most recently
2721 amended by section 101 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by inserting
127 of 146

2722 after the words “New Bedford”, the first time they appear, the following words:- and such funds
2723 shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2724 SECTION 140. Said item 7010-1192 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2725 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “programs”, the second time it
2726 appears, the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2727 SECTION 141. Said item 7010-1192 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as so
2728 amended, is hereby further amended by inserting after the word “Harwich” the following words:-
2729 and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2730 SECTION 142. Item 8000-0313 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2731 by inserting after the word “Millbury”, the second time it appears, the following words:- and
2732 such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2733 SECTION 143. Said item 8000-0313 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby
2734 further amended by inserting after the word "data" the following words:- and such funds shall be
2735 made available until June 30, 2026.
2736 SECTION 144. Said item 8000-0313 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby
2737 further amended by striking out the words "for the purchase of a rescue truck for the fire
2738 department" and inserting in place thereof the following words:- for the fire department and such
2739 funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
2740 SECTION 145. Said item 8000-0313 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby
2741 further amended by inserting after the word “department”, the sixth time it appears, the following
2742 words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30, 2026.
128 of 146

2743 SECTION 146. Item 8100-0111 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2744 by inserting after the word “offenses” the following words:- and such funds shall be made
2745 available until June 30, 2026.
2746 SECTION 147. Item 8100-0102 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2747 by striking out the figure “$49,000,000”, both times it appears, and inserting in place thereof, in
2748 each instance, the following figure:- $55,000,000.
2749 SECTION 148. Item 8324-0050 of said section 2 of said chapter 140, as amended by
2750 section 125 of chapter 248 of the acts of 2024, is hereby further amended by inserting after the
2751 word “Hanover” the following words:- and such funds shall be made available until June 30,
2752 2026.
2753 SECTION 149. Item 9110-9002 of said section 2 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended
2754 by striking out the words “for an electronic sign at the Council on Aging” and inserting in place
2755 thereof the following words:- for the Council on Aging and such funds shall be made available
2756 until June 30, 2026.
2757 SECTION 150. Item 1596-2406 of section 2F of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by
2758 inserting after the word “Program” the following words:- and such funds shall be made available
2759 until June 30, 2026.
2760 SECTION 151. Section 127 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by striking out the
2761 words “managed care organization reinvestment” and inserting in place thereof the following
2762 words:- Medicaid managed care organization.
129 of 146

2763 SECTION 152. Said section 127 of said chapter 140 is hereby further amended by
2764 striking out the words “total managed care organization services assessment” and inserting in
2765 place thereof the following words:- non-Medicaid managed care organization revenue.
2766 SECTION 153. Section 198 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by striking out the
2767 words “June 30, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- June 30, 2026.
2768 SECTION 154. Subsection (g) of section 205 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by
2769 striking out the figure “2025” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2026.
2770 SECTION 155. Subsection (c) of section 206 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by
2771 striking out the words “October 1, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
2772 June 1, 2026.
2773 SECTION 156. Section 213 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by striking out the
2774 words “December 31, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- December 31,
2775 2026.
2776 SECTION 157. Section 222 of said chapter 140 is hereby amended by striking out
2777 subsection (a).
2778 SECTION 158. Said chapter 140 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 253
2779 the following section:-
2780 Section 253A. Section 19 of said chapter 15D, as inserted by section 36, shall take effect
2781 on July 1, 2023.
130 of 146

2782 SECTION 159. Section 306 of chapter 238 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by
2783 striking out the words “December 1, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
2784 January 31, 2026.
2785 SECTION 160. Item 1599-2625 of section 2A of chapter 1 of the acts of 2025 is hereby
2786 amended by inserting after the word “item”, the tenth time it appears, the following words:- ; and
2787 provided further, that the comptroller shall transfer $5,995,058 from this item to the Federal
2788 Grants Fund for the purposes of item 4000-0004 in the Massachusetts management, accounting
2789 and reporting system.
2790 SECTION 161. Section 1 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2025 is hereby amended by adding
2791 the following sentence:- These sums shall be made available through the fiscal year ending June
2792 30, 2026.
2793 SECTION 162. Item 1596-2517 of section 2A of said chapter 7 is hereby amended by
2794 striking out the words “June 30, 2025” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- June
2795 30, 2027; provided further, that a preliminary report for outlining capital needs at only
2796 educational collaboratives shall be submitted not later than June 30, 2026.
2797 SECTION 163. Item 0321-1510 of section 2 of chapter 9 of the acts of 2025, as amended
2798 by section 81 of chapter 14 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by striking out the
2799 figure “$2,000,000” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $3,000,000.
2800 SECTION 164. Item 0910-0200 of said section 2 of said chapter 9, as amended by
2801 section 82 of chapter 14 of the acts of 2025, is hereby further amended by inserting after the
2802 words “indigent defendants”, the second time it appears, the following words:- ; provided
2803 further, that the inspector general shall conduct an investigation and submit a report to the house
131 of 146

2804 and senate clerks, the joint committee on public safety and homeland security and the house and
2805 senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) a detailed
2806 accounting of expenditures made by the sheriffs’ offices in fiscal year 2025; (ii) an analysis of
2807 sheriffs’ offices’ compliance with chapter 29 of the General Laws in fiscal year 2025; (iii) a
2808 review of spending by sheriffs’ offices on activities not specifically required by statue, case law
2809 or court order and how such spending has changed over time; (iv) an analysis of compensation
2810 levels and changes over the preceding 3 fiscal years, including comparisons among sheriffs’
2811 offices and to the department of correction; and (v) recommendations to ensure compliance with
2812 said chapter 29, if necessary, among sheriffs’ offices; provided further, that each sheriff’s office
2813 shall comply with all requests from the office of the inspector general for any information
2814 deemed necessary to conducting said investigation and submitting said report, including, but not
2815 limited to, requests for the production of records; provided further, that the sheriffs’ offices shall
2816 not, absent an appropriation from the general court, receive supplemental funding beyond the
2817 funding appropriated in this act; and provided further, a preliminary report shall be filed not later
2818 than February 27, 2026 and a final report shall be filed not later than May 31, 2026.
2819 SECTION 165. Said item 0910-0200 of said section 2 of said chapter 9, as amended by
2820 section 83 of said chapter 14, is hereby further amended by striking out the figure “$6,256,039”
2821 and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- $6,756,039.
2822 SECTION 166. Item 2300-0100 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby amended by
2823 inserting after the word “Chelmsford” the following words:- ; provided further, that not less than
2824 $87,373 shall be expended by the department’s office of biodiversity for efforts to increase
2825 biodiversity and to protect and prepare vulnerable maritime ecosystems from climate impacts
2826 and unlock their potential for carbon sequestration.
132 of 146

2827 SECTION 167. Said item 2300-0100 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby further
2828 amended by striking out the figure “$2,547,475” and inserting in place thereof the following
2829 figure:- $2,634,848.
2830 SECTION 168. Item 4200-0100 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby amended by
2831 striking out the words “the Connecticut Valley YouthBuild program” and inserting in place
2832 thereof the following words:- New North Citizens Council, Inc. Youth Services.
2833 SECTION 169. Item 4510-0110 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby amended by
2834 striking out the words “a state primary care association qualified under section 330A(f)(1) of the
2835 Public Health Service Act, as codified at 42 U.S.C. section 254c(f)(1)” and inserting in place
2836 thereof the following words:- a state primary care association qualified under section 42 U.S.C.
2837 254b(l).
2838 SECTION 170. Item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby amended by
2839 inserting after the word “analysis” the following words:- ; provided further, that not less than
2840 $23,500 shall be expended to The Coast Guard Heritage Museum in the town of Barnstable to
2841 fund the final payment of the Massachusetts State House Coast Guard Memorial Mural on the
2842 2nd floor of the State House
2843 SECTION 171. Said item 7008-1116 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby further
2844 amended by striking the figure “$25,826,000” and inserting in place thereof the following
2845 figure:- $25,849,500
2846 SECTION 172. Item 7506-0100 of said section 2 of said chapter 9 is hereby amended by
2847 inserting after the word “College” the following words:- ; provided, that not less than $75,000
133 of 146

2848 shall be expended for a workforce development program called Skill Surge at Holyoke
2849 community college.
2850 SECTION 173. Section 88 of chapter 14 of the acts of 2025 is hereby amended by
2851 striking out the words “October 15”, both times they appear, and inserting in place thereof, in
2852 each instance, the following words:- December 31.
2853 SECTION 174. Section 97 of said chapter 14 is hereby amended by striking out the word
2854 “January” and inserting in place thereof the following word:- September.
2855 SECTION 175. Notwithstanding section 23 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, section 31
2856 of chapter 44 of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, a city,
2857 town or district that was a member unit of the Hampshire County Group Insurance Trust in fiscal
2858 years 2026 or 2027 or before may amortize over the subsequent 5 fiscal years, in equal
2859 installments or more rapidly, the amount of its unanticipated Hampshire County Group Insurance
2860 Trust health insurance-related deficit for either fiscal year 2026 or fiscal year 2027, but not both;
2861 provided, however, that the member unit shall certify in writing to the division of local services
2862 of the department of revenue not later than June 30, 2027 that the member unit has withdrawn
2863 from the trust. The commissioner of revenue shall issue guidelines or instructions: (i) as to the
2864 amount that constitutes unanticipated health insurance-related deficit for fiscal year 2026 or 2027
2865 under this section; and (ii) for reporting the amortization of deficits authorized by this section.
2866 The local appropriating authority, as defined in section 21C of said chapter 59, shall adopt a
2867 deficit amortization schedule in accordance with the department of revenue’s guidelines or
2868 instructions under this section before setting the municipality’s fiscal year 2027 tax rate.
134 of 146

2869 SECTION 176. Notwithstanding section 16B of chapter 62C of the General laws, no
2870 penalty shall be imposed for an underpayment of tax due on or after April 1, 2021 pursuant to
2871 said section 16B of said chapter 62C if the penalty would cause undue financial hardship, as
2872 determined by the commissioner of revenue. The commissioner shall publish guidance related to
2873 undue financial hardship not later than 30 days after the effective date of this act.
2874 SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in fiscal year
2875 2025, the comptroller shall transfer $100,000,000 from income surtax revenue, as defined by
2876 subsection (a) of section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the General Laws, to the Student
2877 Opportunity Act Investment Fund established in section 35RRR of chapter 10 of the General
2878 Laws.
2879 SECTION 178. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
2880 comptroller shall, after making the required transfer under section 229 of chapter 140 of the acts
2881 of 2024, transfer the fiscal year 2025 consolidated net surplus pursuant to section 5C of chapter
2882 29 of the General Laws to the Transitional Escrow Fund established in section 16 of chapter 76
2883 of the acts of 2021, as amended by section 4 of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022.
2884 SECTION 179. Notwithstanding section 68 of chapter 118E of the General Laws or any
2885 other general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of health and human services shall
2886 implement the health care-related assessment on managed care organization services, established
2887 under said section 68 of said chapter 118E, as a broad-based and uniform assessment, in
2888 accordance with 42 C.F.R. 433.68(b), with the managed care organization services assessment
2889 rate, as such term is defined in section 64 of said chapter 118E, implemented as the single broad-
2890 based and uniform rate applicable to all managed care organization services subject to
2891 assessment, as such term is defined in said section 64 of said chapter 118E. Upon converting the
135 of 146

2892 health care related assessment on managed care organization services to a broad-based and
2893 uniform assessment applicable to all managed care services subject to assessment, as such term
2894 is defined in said section 64 of said chapter 118E, the initial managed care organization services
2895 assessment rate shall be equal to the rate that had been applicable to the tax group containing
2896 commercial managed care services immediately preceding the implementation of the broad-
2897 based and uniform application of the assessment. The managed care organization services
2898 assessment rate for each calendar year, beginning the first January 1 following the conversion of
2899 the health care related assessment on managed care organization services to a broad-based and
2900 uniform assessment, shall be broad-based and uniform across all managed care services subject
2901 to assessment and shall continue to be implemented in a manner consistent with 42 CFR 433.68.
2902 SECTION 180. Notwithstanding section 2 of chapter 128A of the General Laws, sections
2903 1, 2, 2A, 4 and 9 of chapter 128C of the General Laws or any other general or special law to the
2904 contrary, the running race horse meeting licensee located in Suffolk county licensed to conduct
2905 live racing pursuant to said chapter 128A and simulcast wagering pursuant to said chapter 128C
2906 in calendar year 2025 shall remain licensed as a running horse racing meeting licensee and shall
2907 remain authorized to conduct simulcast wagering pursuant to said chapter 128C until December
2908 15, 2027; provided, however, that the days between January 1, 2025 and December 31, 2027
2909 shall be dark days pursuant to said chapter 128C and the licensee shall be precluded from
2910 conducting live racing during that period unless it applies for and is granted a supplemental live
2911 racing license pursuant to said chapter 128A; provided further, that the licensee shall not
2912 simulcast or accept a wager on greyhound dog racing on or after August 10, 2023 pursuant to
2913 section 9 of said chapter 128C; provided further, that all simulcasts shall comply with the
2914 Interstate Horse Racing Act of 1978, 15 U.S.C. 3001 et seq. or other applicable federal law;
136 of 146

2915 provided further, that all simulcasts from states that have racing associations that do not require
2916 approval in compliance with the Interstate Horse Racing Act of 1978, 15 U.S.C. 3004(a)(1)(A)
2917 shall require the approval of the New England Horsemen’s Benevolent & Protective Association
2918 prior to being simulcast to a racing meeting licensee within the commonwealth; and provided
2919 further, that if the association agrees to approve the simulcast for 1 racing meeting licensee, it
2920 shall approve the simulcast for all otherwise eligible racing meeting licensees.
2921 SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, section 18 of
2922 chapter 28 of the acts of 2023 shall not be in effect for the purposes of establishing the annual
2923 spending threshold set pursuant to subsection (f) of section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the
2924 General Laws for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027.
2925 SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary,
2926 employees of the economic development and industrial corporation of Boston who became
2927 employed by the city of Boston on or after June 29, 2024 with no break in service between the
2928 corporation and the city shall have a 1-time opportunity to purchase as creditable service in the
2929 Boston retirement system prior service to such organization rendered before the member joined
2930 the system; provided, that prior to the date any retirement allowance becomes effective, the
2931 member shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the system in 1 sum, or in installments, upon
2932 such terms and conditions as the system may prescribe, make-up payments of an amount equal to
2933 that which would have been withheld as regular deductions from the member’s regular
2934 compensation had the member been eligible for membership and been a member of the system
2935 during such previous period, together with buyback interest. Former employees of the economic
2936 development and industrial corporation shall be members in service of the system when they
137 of 146

2937 apply for the purchase of service credit and may request an estimate of the cost of their service
2938 purchase from the system prior to becoming an employee of the city of Boston.
2939 SECTION 183. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, to the extent
2940 that immunization recommendations and requirements established in the commonwealth are
2941 conditioned upon alignment with the recommendations made by the Advisory Committee on
2942 Immunization Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the
2943 commissioner of public health shall review said recommendations and requirements established
2944 in the commonwealth and shall, in consultation with the committee on immunization
2945 recommendations established in section 24N of chapter 111 of the General Laws, establish
2946 alternative standards as the commissioner may deem necessary to assure the maintenance of
2947 public health and the prevention of disease in the commonwealth.
2948 SECTION 184. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be
2949 a moratorium on the destruction of hospital records pursuant to section 36 of chapter 123 of the
2950 General Laws until such time as the department of mental health promulgates regulations
2951 defining a public notice process for the destruction of such records, as required under said
2952 section 36 of said chapter 123.
2953 SECTION 185. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be
2954 a moratorium on the destruction of hospital records pursuant to section 17 of chapter 123B of the
2955 General Laws until such time as the department of developmental services promulgates
2956 regulations defining a public notice process for the destruction of such records, as required under
2957 said section 17 of said chapter 123B.
138 of 146

2958 SECTION 186. (a) Notwithstanding sections 32 to 37, inclusive, of chapter 7C of the
2959 General Laws or any other general or special law to the contrary, the commissioner of capital
2960 asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the court administrator of the trial court
2961 of the commonwealth, may convey certain adjacent parcels of land in the city of Framingham
2962 acquired for the purpose of erecting a building for the first district court of southern Middlesex
2963 for nominal consideration to the city of Framingham; provided, however, that the commissioner
2964 shall not convey said parcels until: (i) the completion of a regional justice center at 121 Union
2965 avenue in the city of Framingham; and (ii) a determination by the commissioner, in consultation
2966 with the court administrator, that the parcels are surplus to the needs of the trial court. The
2967 parcels are located at 600 and 602 Concord street in the city of Framingham and are further
2968 described in deeds recorded in the Middlesex southern district registry of deeds in book 7816,
2969 page 107 and book 9859, page 328. The parcels shall be conveyed by deed without warranties or
2970 representations by the commonwealth and without restrictions on use or future conveyance by
2971 the city. The conveyance shall be subject to such additional conditions and restrictions as the
2972 commissioner, in consultation with the court administrator, may determine. The commissioner
2973 may, in consultation with the court administrator, determine the exact boundaries of the parcels
2974 prior to conveyance.
2975 (b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the city of Framingham
2976 shall be responsible for all costs and expenses of any transaction authorized by this section as
2977 determined by the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, including, but
2978 not limited to, the costs of any engineering, surveys, appraisals, title examinations, recording fees
2979 and deed preparation.
139 of 146

2980 SECTION 187. The Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority, in consultation with
2981 the advisory board established in section 7A of chapter 161A of the General Laws, shall
2982 investigate, study and issue recommendations regarding the local assessments on cities and
2983 towns paid pursuant to section 9 of said chapter 161A. The investigation shall include, but not be
2984 limited to: (i) a review of the assessment formula; (ii) a review of annual assessment increases
2985 and amounts; (iii) the impact of local assessments on municipal budgets and the budget of the
2986 authority; (iv) comparisons to local funding assessments received by peer transit systems; and (v)
2987 possible adjustments, modifications or revisions to the assessment formula or municipal
2988 payments, including both the annual assessment amount and revised allocations, consistent with
2989 considerations of the relative service frequency, ridership, economic benefits and fiscal capacity
2990 of the contributing cities and towns. Not later than December 31, 2026, the authority shall submit
2991 a report of its findings and its recommendations to the clerks of the house of representatives and
2992 the senate and to the board of directors of the authority.
2993 SECTION 188. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, at the
2994 direction of the secretary of administration and finance, the comptroller shall make tax revenue
2995 collected from capital gains income above the threshold established in section 5G of chapter 29
2996 of the General Laws in fiscal year 2025 available to the General Fund in the amount necessary to
2997 eliminate any deficits in the budgetary funds pursuant to section 5C of said chapter 29. After
2998 satisfying the previous provision, the comptroller shall transfer any remaining excess capital
2999 gains income as follows: (i) 90 per cent to the Transitional Escrow Fund established in section 16
3000 of chapter 76 of the acts of 2021, as amended by section 4 of chapter 98 of the acts of 2022; (ii) 5
3001 per cent to the Commonwealth’s Pension Liability Fund established in paragraph (e) of
140 of 146

3002 subdivision (8) of section 22 of chapter 32 of the General Laws; and (iii) 5 per cent to the State
3003 Retiree Benefits Trust Fund established in section 24 of chapter 32A of the General Laws.
3004 SECTION 189. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, in fiscal year
3005 2025, the comptroller shall transfer $10,000,000 from the General Fund to the Massachusetts
3006 Life Sciences Center established in section 3 of chapter 23I of the General Laws for
3007 programming and operations that advance efforts related to life sciences and spur economic
3008 growth in the commonwealth.
3009 SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the secretary
3010 of health and human services shall seek all required federal approvals the secretary deems
3011 necessary to implement sections 15, 16, 17, 32, 35, 38 and 39, including any required waivers
3012 under 42 C.F.R. 433.68 necessary to implement the updates to the hospital assessment described
3013 in section 67 of chapter 118E of the General Laws. If, after having received any required federal
3014 approval necessary to implement said sections 15, 16, 17, 32, 35, 38 and 39, such approval is
3015 withdrawn or is otherwise not in effect or if the secretary determines that a change in federal law
3016 or regulations or the administration of any such federal law or regulation requires a modification
3017 to the hospital assessment described in said section 67 of said chapter 118E or to the
3018 implementation of the Health Safety Net Trust Fund established in section 66 of said chapter
3019 118E, the Non-Acute Care Hospital Reimbursement Trust Fund established in section 2WWWW
3020 of chapter 29 of the General Laws, the Safety Net Provider Trust Fund established in section
3021 2AAAAA of said chapter 29, the Hospital Investment and Performance Trust Fund established in
3022 section 2TTTTT of said chapter 29 or the Population Health Investment Trust Fund established
3023 in section 2UUUUU of said chapter 29, the secretary shall provide written notification to the
3024 joint committee on health care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and
141 of 146

3025 means and shall collaborate with Massachusetts Health and Hospital Association, Inc. to develop
3026 and consult on the implementation of alternatives.
3027 Not later than February 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, the secretary shall report to the
3028 joint committee on health care financing and the house and senate committees on ways and
3029 means: (i) the amount of the assessment made and collected from each hospital pursuant to said
3030 section 67 of said chapter 118E; and (ii) the amounts transferred to, deposited in, expended from
3031 and transferred from the Hospital Investment and Performance Trust Fund established in said
3032 section 2TTTTT of said chapter 29 and the Population Health Investment Trust Fund established
3033 in said section 2UUUUU of said chapter 29.
3034 SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
3035 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, shall transfer in both
3036 fiscal year 2026 and 2027 $50,000,000 each such fiscal year from the Commonwealth Care Trust
3037 Fund established in section 2OOO of chapter 29 of the General Laws to the Health Safety Net
3038 Trust Fund established in section 66 of chapter 118E of the General Laws; provided, however,
3039 that such transfers shall be in addition to any other transfers from said Commonwealth Care
3040 Trust Fund to said Health Safety Net Trust Fund required in fiscal years 2026 or 2027; provided
3041 further, that such funds shall be used first to reduce the shortfall, as described in subsection (b) of
3042 section 69 of said chapter 118E, for health safety net fiscal years 2026 and 2027, and that any
3043 remaining funds may be used to reduce the shortfall in any other open health safety net fiscal
3044 year; and provided further, that the amount equal to any federal financial participation revenues
3045 claimed and received by the commonwealth for eligible expenditures made from said Health
3046 Safety Net Trust Fund with these funds transferred from said Commonwealth Care Trust Fund
3047 shall be credited to said Health Safety Net Trust Fund.
142 of 146

3048 SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, prior to
3049 certifying the fiscal year 2025 consolidated net surplus, pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of
3050 the General Laws, and issuing the fiscal year 2025 statutory basis financial report, the
3051 comptroller, at the direction of the secretary of administration and finance, shall make available
3052 the amounts necessary from the fiscal year 2026 appropriations of items under the purview of the
3053 sheriffs’ offices to eliminate any deficits in said items for fiscal year 2025 and shall adjust the
3054 fiscal 2026 appropriations for those items accordingly.
3055 SECTION 193. On or before November 30, 2025, the secretary of administration and
3056 finance, in consultation with the executive office of health and human services, shall estimate the
3057 amount of federal reimbursements claimed or anticipated to be claimed but not yet received in
3058 connection with costs incurred or balances designated in fiscal year 2025 from chapter 33 of the
3059 acts of 2025. For the purposes of certifying the amount of the consolidated net surplus in the
3060 budgetary funds at the close of fiscal year 2025 pursuant to section 5C of chapter 29 of the
3061 General Laws, the comptroller shall record the estimates for each budgetary fund made pursuant
3062 to this section as statutory receivables in fiscal year 2025.
3063 SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, for fiscal year
3064 2025, all abandoned property net revenue, as defined by section 5H of chapter 29 of the General
3065 Laws, shall remain in the General Fund.
3066 SECTION 195. The salary adjustments and other economic benefits authorized by the
3067 following collective bargaining agreements shall be effective for the purposes of section 7 of
3068 chapter 150E of the General Laws:
143 of 146

3069 (1) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the Clerical/Technical
3070 Unit (CTU), MTA, Unit L92, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
3071 (2) the agreement between the Barnstable County Sheriff's Office (BCSO) and the
3072 Barnstable County Captain Union, National Correctional Employees Union (NCEU), Unit L152,
3073 effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
3074 (3) the agreement between the Berkshire County Sheriff's Office (BCSO) and the
3075 National Correctional Employees Union, Unit SB1, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
3076 2027;
3077 (4) the agreement between the Barnstable County Sheriff's Office and the National
3078 Correctional Employees Union Local 150, Unit S10, effective from July 1, 2024 through June
3079 30, 2027;
3080 (5) the agreement between the Dukes County Sheriff's Office and the Massachusetts
3081 Correction Officers Federated Union (MCOFU), Unit SD1, effective from July 1, 2025 to June
3082 30, 2028;
3083 (6) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the Massachusetts
3084 Teachers Association/Department Chairs (DCU), Boston Campus, Unit B50, effective from July
3085 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
3086 (7) the agreement between the Plymouth County Sheriff's Office and the New England
3087 Police Benevolent Association (NEPBA) Local 193, Unit SP5, effective from July 1, 2024
3088 through June 30, 2027;
144 of 146

3089 (8) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the International
3090 Brotherhood of Police Officers (IBPO) Local 399, Dartmouth Campus, Unit D84, effective from
3091 July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027;
3092 (9) the agreement between the Essex County Sheriff's Department and the Essex County
3093 Correctional Officers Association (ECCOA), Unit SE2, effective from July 1, 2025 through June
3094 30, 2028;
3095 (10) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the Maintenance and
3096 Trade Union (MTU), Lowell Campus, Unit L93, effective from July 1, 2024 through June 30,
3097 2027;
3098 (11) the agreement between the Barnstable County Sheriff's Office (BCSO) and the
3099 Barnstable County Lieutenants Union, National Correctional Employees Union (NCEU), Unit
3100 S11, effective from January 1, 2025 through June 30, 2027;
3101 (12) the agreement between the Board of Higher Education and the Massachusetts
3102 Community College Council Day Bargaining Unit, effective from July 1, 2025 through June 30,
3103 2025;
3104 (13) the agreement between the Sheriff of Middlesex County and the New England
3105 Benevolent Association (NEPBA) Local 525, Unit SM5, effective from July 1, 2025 through
3106 June 30, 2028; and
3107 (14) the agreement between the University of Massachusetts and the International
3108 Brotherhood of Police Officers (IBPO) Local 432, Amherst Campus, Unit A06, effective from
3109 July 1, 2024 through June 30, 2027.
145 of 146

3110 SECTION 196. Section 176 is hereby repealed.
3111 SECTION 197. Sections 18, 33, 34, 36, 37, 151, 152 and 179 shall take effect on the later
3112 of: (i) the effective date of amendments to 42 CFR 433.68 disallowing the higher taxation of
3113 Medicaid taxable units as compared to non-Medicaid taxable units; or (ii) the end of any
3114 federally established or approved transition period applicable to the health care related
3115 assessment on managed care organization services, established under section 68 of chapter 118E
3116 of the General Laws, as amended by section 130 of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024. The
3117 executive office of health and human services shall notify the clerks of the house of
3118 representatives and the senate not later than 10 days after the effective date pursuant to this
3119 section.
3120 SECTION 198. Sections 15, 16, 17, 32, 35, 38 and 39, shall take effect upon the later of:
3121 (i) the date for which the secretary receives all federal approvals deemed necessary to implement
3122 said sections; or (ii) October 1, 2025.
3123 SECTION 199. Section 191 shall take effect October 1, 2025.
3124 SECTION 200. Section 196 shall take effect on March 1, 2026.
146 of 146